The Project Gutenberg EBook of Grimms' Fairy Tales, by The Brothers Grimm This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with almost no restrictions whatsoever.
You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org.
Title: Grimms' Fairy Tales Author: The Brothers Grimm Translator: Edgar Taylor and Marian Edwardes Posting Date: December 14, 2008 [EBook #2591] Release Date: April, 2001 Language: English *** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK GRIMMS' FAIRY TALES *** Produced by Emma Dudding, John Bickers, and Dagny FAIRY TALES By The Brothers Grimm PREPARER'S NOTE The text is based on translations from the Grimms' Kinder und Hausmarchen by Edgar Taylor and Marian Edwardes.
HOW THEY WENT TO THE MOUNTAINS TO EAT NUTS.
2.
HOW CHANTICLEER AND PARTLET WENT TO VISIT MR KORBES.
RAPUNZEL FUNDEVOGEL THE VALIANT LITTLE TAILOR HANSEL AND GRETEL THE MOUSE, THE BIRD, AND THE SAUSAGE MOTHER HOLLE LITTLE RED-CAP [LITTLE RED RIDING HOOD] THE ROBBER BRIDEGROOM TOM THUMB RUMPELSTILTSKIN CLEVER GRETEL THE OLD MAN AND HIS GRANDSON THE LITTLE PEASANT FREDERICK AND CATHERINE SWEETHEART ROLAND SNOWDROP THE PINK CLEVER ELSIE THE MISER IN THE BUSH ASHPUTTEL THE WHITE SNAKE THE WOLF AND THE SEVEN LITTLE KIDS THE QUEEN BEE THE ELVES AND THE SHOEMAKER THE JUNIPER-TREE the juniper-tree.
THE TURNIP CLEVER HANS THE THREE LANGUAGES THE FOX AND THE CAT THE FOUR CLEVER BROTHERS LILY AND THE LION THE FOX AND THE HORSE THE BLUE LIGHT THE RAVEN THE GOLDEN GOOSE THE WATER OF LIFE THE TWELVE HUNTSMEN THE KING OF THE GOLDEN MOUNTAIN DOCTOR KNOWALL THE SEVEN RAVENS THE WEDDING OF MRS FOX FIRST STORY SECOND STORY THE SALAD THE STORY OF THE YOUTH WHO WENT FORTH TO LEARN WHAT FEAR WAS KING GRISLY-BEARD IRON HANS CAT-SKIN SNOW-WHITE AND ROSE-RED THE BROTHERS GRIMM FAIRY TALES THE GOLDEN BIRD A certain king had a beautiful garden, and in the garden stood a tree which bore golden apples.
These apples were always counted, and about the time when they began to grow ripe it was found that every night one of them was gone.
The king became very angry at this, and ordered the gardener to keep watch all night under the tree.
The gardener set his eldest son to watch; but about twelve o'clock he fell asleep, and in the morning another of the apples was missing.
As the clock struck twelve he heard a rustling noise in the air, and a bird came flying that was of pure gold; and as it was snapping at one of the apples with its beak, the gardener's son jumped up and shot an arrow at it.
But the arrow did the bird no harm; only it dropped a golden feather from its tail, and then flew away.
The golden feather was brought to the king in the morning, and all the council was called together.
Then the gardener's eldest son set out and thought to find the golden bird very easily; and when he had gone but a little way, he came to a wood, and by the side of the wood he saw a fox sitting; so he took his bow and made ready to shoot at it.
You will reach a village in the evening; and when you get there, you will see two inns opposite to each other, one of which is very pleasant and beautiful to look at: go not in there, but rest for the night in the other, though it may appear to you to be very poor and mean.
' But the son thought to himself, 'What can.
the fox; but he missed it, and it set up its tail above its back and ran into the wood.
Time passed on; and as the eldest son did not come back, and no tidings were heard of him, the second son set out, and the same thing happened to him.
He met the fox, who gave him the good advice: but when he came to the two inns, his eldest brother was standing at the window where the merrymaking was, and called to him to come in; and he could not withstand the temptation, but went in, and forgot the golden bird and his country in the same manner.
Time passed on again, and the youngest son too wished to set out into the wide world to seek for the golden bird; but his father would not listen to it for a long while, for he was very fond of his son, and was afraid that some ill luck might happen to him also, and prevent his coming back.
However, at last it was agreed he should go, for he would not rest at home; and as he came to the wood, he met the fox, and heard the same good counsel.
But he was thankful to the fox, and did not attempt his life as his brothers had done; so the fox said, 'Sit upon my tail, and you will travel faster.
' So he sat down, and the fox began to.
run, and away they went over stock and stone so quick that their hair whistled in the wind.
When they came to the village, the son followed the fox's counsel, and without looking about him went to the shabby inn and rested there all night at his ease.
' Then the fox stretched out his tail again, and the.
young man sat himself down, and away they went over stock and stone till their hair whistled in the wind.
Then thought he to himself, 'It will be a very droll thing to bring away such a fine bird in this shabby cage'; so he opened the door and took hold of it and put it into the golden cage.
But the bird set up such a loud scream that all the soldiers awoke, and they took him prisoner and carried him before the king.
The next morning the court sat to judge him; and when all was heard, it sentenced him to die, unless he should bring the king the golden horse which could run as swiftly as the wind; and if he did this, he was to have the golden bird given him for his own.
So he set out once more on his journey, sighing, and in great despair, when on a sudden his friend the fox met him, and said, 'You see now what has happened on account of your not listening to my counsel.
You must go straight on till you come to the castle where the horse stands in his stall: by his side will lie the groom fast asleep and snoring: take away the horse quietly, but be sure to put the old leathern saddle upon him, and not the golden one that is close by it.
Then the son sat down on the fox's tail, and away they went over stock and stone till their hair whistled in the wind.
All went right, and the groom lay snoring with his hand upon the golden saddle.
'I will give him the good one,'.
said he; 'I am sure he deserves it.
' As he took up the golden saddle the.
groom awoke and cried out so loud, that all the guards ran in and took him prisoner, and in the morning he was again brought before the court to be judged, and was sentenced to die.
But it was agreed, that, if he could bring thither the beautiful princess, he should live, and have the bird and the horse given him for his own.
Then he went his way very sorrowful; but the old fox came and said, 'Why did not you listen to me?
If you had, you would have carried away both the bird and the horse; yet will I once more give you counsel.
Go straight on, and in the evening you will arrive at a castle.
At twelve o'clock at night the princess goes to the bathing-house: go up to her and give her a kiss, and she will let you lead her away; but take care you do not suffer her to go and take leave of her father and mother.
As they came to the castle, all was as the fox had said, and at twelve o'clock the young man met the princess going to the bath and gave her the kiss, and she agreed to run away with him, but begged with many tears that he would let her take leave of her father.
Then he was brought before the king, and the king said, 'You shall never have my daughter unless in eight days you dig away the hill that stops the view from my window.
' Now this hill was so big that the whole world.
could not take it away: and when he had worked for seven days, and had done very little, the fox came and said.
'Lie down and go to sleep; I.
' And in the morning he awoke and the hill was gone;.
so he went merrily to the king, and told him that now that it was removed he must give him the princess.
Then the king was obliged to keep his word, and away went the young man and the princess; and the fox came and said to him, 'We will have all three, the princess, the horse, and the bird.
' 'Ah!' said the young man,.
'that would be a great thing, but how can you contrive it?
'If you will only listen,' said the fox, 'it can be done.
" Then he will be very joyful; and you will mount the golden!
horse that they are to give you, and put out your hand to take leave of them; but shake hands with the princess last.
All went right: then the fox said, 'When you come to the castle where the bird is, I will stay with the princess at the door, and you will ride in and speak to the king; and when he sees that it is the right horse, he will bring out the bird; but you must sit still, and say that you want to look at it, to see whether it is the true golden bird; and when you get it into your hand, ride away.
This, too, happened as the fox said; they carried off the bird, the princess mounted again, and they rode on to a great wood.
young man refused to do it: so the fox said, 'I will at any rate give you good counsel: beware of two things; ransom no one from the gallows, and sit down by the side of no river.
' Then away he went.
thought the young man, 'it is no hard matter to keep that advice.
his brothers, who had turned robbers; so he said, 'Cannot they in any way be saved?
money upon the rascals and buy their liberty.
Then he did not stay to think about the matter, but paid what was asked, and his brothers were given up, and went on with him towards their home.
And as they came to the wood where the fox first met them, it was so cool and pleasant that the two brothers said, 'Let us sit down by the side of the river, and rest a while, to eat and drink.
' So he said,.
'All this have we won by our.
labour.
' Then there was great rejoicing made; but the horse would not.
eat, the bird would not sing, and the princess wept.
' Then he pulled him out of the river, and said.
to him, as he got upon the bank, 'Your brothers have set watch to kill you, if they find you in the kingdom.
' So he dressed himself as a poor.
man, and came secretly to the king's court, and was scarcely within the doors when the horse began to eat, and the bird to sing, and the princess left off weeping.
Then he went to the king, and told him all his brothers' roguery; and they were seized and punished, and he had the princess given to him again; and after the king's death he was heir to his kingdom.
A long while after, he went to walk one day in the wood, and the old fox met him, and besought him with tears in his eyes to kill him, and cut off his head and feet.
HANS IN LUCK Some men are born to good luck: all they do or try to do comes right--all that falls to them is so much gain--all their geese are swans--all their cards are trumps--toss them which way you will, they will always, like poor puss, alight upon their legs, and only move on so much the faster.
The world may very likely not always think of them as they think of themselves, but what care they for the world?
what can it?
know about the matter?
One of these lucky beings was neighbour Hans.
Seven long years he had worked hard for his master.
At last he said, 'Master, my time is up; I must go home and see my poor mother once more: so pray pay me my wages and let me go.
' And the master said, 'You have been a faithful and good.
' Then he gave him a lump.
Hans took out his pocket-handkerchief, put the piece of silver into it, threw it over his shoulder, and jogged off on his road homewards.
As he went lazily on, dragging one foot after another, a man came in sight, trotting gaily along on a capital horse.
'Ah!' said Hans aloud, 'what a.
fine thing it is to ride on horseback!
There he sits as easy and happy as if he was at home, in the chair by his fireside; he trips against no stones, saves shoe-leather, and gets on he hardly knows how.
' Hans did.
not speak so softly but the horseman heard it all, and said, 'Well, friend, why do you go on foot then?' 'Ah!
' said he, 'I have this load to!
carry: to be sure it is silver, but it is so heavy that I can't hold up my head, and you must know it hurts my shoulder sadly.
of making an exchange?' said the horseman.
'I will give you my horse,.
and you shall give me the silver; which will save you a great deal of trouble in carrying such a heavy load about with you.
' 'With all my.
heart,' said Hans: 'but as you are so kind to me, I must tell you one thing--you will have a weary task to draw that silver about with you.
However, the horseman got off, took the silver, helped Hans up, gave him the bridle into one hand and the whip into the other, and said, 'When you want to go very fast, smack your lips loudly together, and cry "Jip!
"'!
Hans was delighted as he sat on the horse, drew himself up, squared his elbows, turned out his toes, cracked his whip, and rode merrily off, one minute whistling a merry tune, and another singing, 'No care and no sorrow, A fig for the morrow!
We'll laugh and be merry, Sing neigh down derry!
After a time he thought he should like to go a little faster, so he smacked his lips and cried 'Jip!
' Away went the horse full gallop; and!
His horse would have ran off, if a shepherd who was coming by, driving a cow, had not stopped it.
Hans soon came to himself, and got upon his legs again, sadly vexed, and said to the shepherd, 'This riding is no joke, when a man has the luck to get upon a beast like this that stumbles and flings him off as if it would break his neck.
However, I'm off now once for all: I like your cow now a great deal better than this smart beast that played me this trick, and has spoiled my best coat, you see, in this puddle; which, by the by, smells not very like a nosegay.
One can walk along at one's leisure behind that cow--keep good company, and have milk, butter, and cheese, every day, into the bargain.
What would I give to have such a prize!
' 'Well,' said!
the shepherd, 'if you are so fond of her, I will change my cow for your horse; I like to do good to my neighbours, even though I lose by it myself.
' 'Done!' said Hans, merrily.
'What a noble heart that good man.
has!' thought he.
Then the shepherd jumped upon the horse, wished Hans and the cow good morning, and away he rode.
Hans brushed his coat, wiped his face and hands, rested a while, and then drove off his cow quietly, and thought his bargain a very lucky one.
'If I have only a piece of bread (and I certainly shall always be.
able to get that), I can, whenever I like, eat my butter and cheese with it; and when I am thirsty I can milk my cow and drink the milk: and what can I wish for more?
bread, and gave away his last penny for a glass of beer.
When he had rested himself he set off again, driving his cow towards his mother's village.
But the heat grew greater as soon as noon came on, till at last, as he found himself on a wide heath that would take him more than an hour to cross, he began to be so hot and parched that his tongue clave to the roof of his mouth.
he; 'now I will milk my cow and quench my thirst': so he tied her to the stump of a tree, and held his leathern cap to milk into; but not a drop was to be had.
While he was trying his luck in milking, and managing the matter very clumsily, the uneasy beast began to think him very troublesome; and at last gave him such a kick on the head as knocked him down; and there he lay a long while senseless.
Luckily a butcher soon came by, driving a pig in a wheelbarrow.
'What is the matter with you, my man?' said the.
butcher, as he helped him up.
Hans told him what had happened, how he was dry, and wanted to milk his cow, but found the cow was dry too.
Then the butcher gave him a flask of ale, saying, 'There, drink and refresh yourself; your cow will give you no milk: don't you see she is an old beast, good for nothing but the slaughter-house?' 'Alas, alas!
Hans, 'who would have thought it?
If I kill her, what will she be good for?
I hate cow-beef; it is not tender enough for me.
If it were a pig now--like that fat gentleman you are driving along at his ease--one could do something with it; it would at any rate make sausages.
' 'Well,' said.
To please you I will change, and give you my fine fat pig for the cow.
' 'Heaven reward you for your kindness and self-denial!'.
said Hans, as he gave the butcher the cow; and taking the pig off the wheel-barrow, drove it away, holding it by the string that was tied to its leg.
So on he jogged, and all seemed now to go right with him: he had met with some misfortunes, to be sure; but he was now well repaid for all.
How could it be otherwise with such a travelling companion as he had at last got?
'Feel,' said he, 'how heavy it is, and yet it is only eight.
weeks old.
Whoever roasts and eats it will find plenty of fat upon it, it has lived so well!
' 'You're right,' said Hans, as he weighed it in!
his hand; 'but if you talk of fat, my pig is no trifle.
countryman began to look grave, and shook his head.
'Hark ye!' said he,.
'my worthy friend, you seem a good sort of fellow, so I can't help doing you a kind turn.
Your pig may get you into a scrape.
In the village I just came from, the squire has had a pig stolen out of his sty.
I was dreadfully afraid when I saw you that you had got the squire's pig.
If you have, and they catch you, it will be a bad job for you.
The least they will do will be to throw you into the horse-pond.
Can you swim?
Poor Hans was sadly frightened.
of this scrape.
I know nothing of where the pig was either bred or born; but he may have been the squire's for aught I can tell: you know this country better than I do, take my pig and give me the goose.
' 'I ought.
'Tis not everyone would do so much for you as!
However, I will not be hard upon you, as you are in trouble.
he took the string in his hand, and drove off the pig by a side path; while Hans went on the way homewards free from care.
'After all,'.
I don't care whose pig it is, but wherever it came from it has been a very good friend to me.
I have much the best of the bargain.
First there will be a capital roast; then the fat will find me in goose-grease for six months; and then there are all the beautiful white feathers.
I will put them into my pillow, and then I am sure I shall sleep soundly without rocking.
How happy my mother will be!
Talk of a pig, indeed!
Give me a fine fat goose.
As he came to the next village, he saw a scissor-grinder with his wheel, working and singing, 'O'er hill and o'er dale So happy I roam, Work light and live well, All the world is my home; Then who so blythe, so merry as I?
Hans stood looking on for a while, and at last said, 'You must be well off, master grinder! you seem so happy at your work.
' 'Yes,' said the.
' 'And where.
did you get the pig?' 'I gave a cow for it.
' 'And the cow?' 'I gave a.
horse for it.
' 'And the horse?' 'I gave a lump of silver as big as my.
head for it.
' 'And the silver?' 'Oh!.
I worked hard for that seven long years.
' 'You have thriven well in the world hitherto,' said the grinder,.
'now if you could find money in your pocket whenever you put your hand in it, your fortune would be made.
' 'Very true: but how is that to be.
managed?
' 'How?
Why, you must turn grinder like myself,' said the other; 'you only want a grindstone; the rest will come of itself.
Here is one that is but little the worse for wear: I would not ask more than the value of your goose for it--will you buy?
' 'How can you ask?
' said?
there's?
the goose.
' 'Now,' said the grinder, as he gave him a common rough stone.
that lay by his side, 'this is a most capital stone; do but work it well enough, and you can make an old nail cut with it.
Hans took the stone, and went his way with a light heart: his eyes sparkled for joy, and he said to himself, 'Surely I must have been born in a lucky hour; everything I could want or wish for comes of itself.
People are so kind; they seem really to think I do them a favour in letting them make me rich, and giving me good bargains.
For a while he watched it sinking in the deep clear water; then sprang up and danced for joy, and again fell upon his knees and thanked Heaven, with tears in his eyes, for its kindness in taking away his only plague, the ugly heavy stone.
'How happy am I!' cried he; 'nobody was ever so lucky as I.
' Then up he.
JORINDA AND JORINDEL There was once an old castle, that stood in the middle of a deep gloomy wood, and in the castle lived an old fairy.
Now this fairy could take any shape she pleased.
All the day long she flew about in the form of an owl, or crept about the country like a cat; but at night she always became an old woman again.
When any young man came within a hundred paces of her castle, he became quite fixed, and could not move a step till she came and set him free; which she would not do till he had given her his word never to come there again: but when any pretty maiden came within that space she was changed into a bird, and the fairy put her into a cage, and hung her up in a chamber in the castle.
There were seven hundred of these cages hanging in the castle, and all with beautiful birds in them.
Now there was once a maiden whose name was Jorinda.
She was prettier than all the pretty girls that ever were seen before, and a shepherd lad, whose name was Jorindel, was very fond of her, and they were soon to be married.
One day they went to walk in the wood, that they might be alone; and Jorindel said, 'We must take care that we don't go too near to the fairy's castle.
' It was a beautiful evening; the last rays of the.
setting sun shone bright through the long stems of the trees upon the green underwood beneath, and the turtle-doves sang from the tall birches.
Jorinda sat down to gaze upon the sun; Jorindel sat by her side; and both felt sad, they knew not why; but it seemed as if they were to be parted from one another for ever.
They had wandered a long way; and when they looked to see which way they should go home, they found themselves at a loss to know what path to take.
The sun was setting fast, and already half of its circle had sunk behind the hill: Jorindel on a sudden looked behind him, and saw through the bushes that they had, without knowing it, sat down close under the old walls of the castle.
Then he shrank for fear, turned pale, and trembled.
Jorinda was just singing, 'The ring-dove sang from the willow spray, Well-a-day!
Well-a-day!
when her song stopped suddenly.
Jorindel turned to see the reason, and beheld his Jorinda changed into a nightingale, so that her song ended with a mournful _jug, jug_.
An owl with fiery eyes flew three times round them, and three times screamed: 'Tu whu!
Tu whu!
Tu whu!
Jorindel could not move; he stood fixed as a stone, and could neither weep, nor speak, nor stir hand or foot.
Poor Jorindel saw the nightingale was gone--but what could he do?
He could not speak, he could not move from the spot where he stood.
At last the fairy came back and sang with a hoarse voice: 'Till the prisoner is fast, And her doom is cast, There stay!
Oh, stay!
When the charm is around her, And the spell has bound her, Hie away!
away!
On a sudden Jorindel found himself free.
He prayed, he wept, he sorrowed, but all in vain.
'Alas!' he said, 'what.
will become of me?
' He could not go back to his own home, so he went to?
a strange village, and employed himself in keeping sheep.
Many a time did he walk round and round as near to the hated castle as he dared go, but all in vain; he heard or saw nothing of Jorinda.
At last he dreamt one night that he found a beautiful purple flower, and that in the middle of it lay a costly pearl; and he dreamt that he plucked the flower, and went with it in his hand into the castle, and that everything he touched with it was disenchanted, and that there he found his Jorinda again.
In the morning when he awoke, he began to search over hill and dale for this pretty flower; and eight long days he sought for it in vain: but on the ninth day, early in the morning, he found the beautiful purple flower; and in the middle of it was a large dewdrop, as big as a costly pearl.
Then he plucked the flower, and set out and travelled day and night, till he came again to the castle.
He walked nearer than a hundred paces to it, and yet he did not become fixed as before, but found that he could go quite close up to the door.
Jorindel was very glad indeed to see this.
Then he touched the door with the flower, and it sprang open; so that he went in through the court, and listened when he heard so many birds singing.
At last he came to the chamber where the fairy sat, with the seven hundred birds singing in the seven hundred cages.
He looked around at the birds, but alas!
there were many, many nightingales, and how then!
While he was thinking what to do, he saw the fairy had taken down one of the cages, and was making the best of her way off through the door.
Then he touched all the other birds with the flower, so that they all took their old forms again; and he took Jorinda home, where they were married, and lived happily together many years: and so did a good many other lads, whose maidens had been forced to sing in the old fairy's cages by themselves, much longer than they liked.
THE TRAVELLING MUSICIANS An honest farmer had once an ass that had been a faithful servant to him a great many years, but was now growing old and every day more and more unfit for work.
His master therefore was tired of keeping him and began to think of putting an end to him; but the ass, who saw that some mischief was in the wind, took himself slyly off, and began his journey towards the great city, 'For there,' thought he, 'I may turn musician.
After he had travelled a little way, he spied a dog lying by the roadside and panting as if he were tired.
'What makes you pant so, my.
friend?' said the ass.
knock me on the head, because I am old and weak, and can no longer make myself useful to him in hunting; so I ran away; but what can I do to earn my livelihood?' 'Hark ye!
' The dog said he was willing, and they jogged on?
together.
They had not gone far before they saw a cat sitting in the middle of the road and making a most rueful face.
'Pray, my good lady,' said the ass,.
'what's the matter with you?
You look quite out of spirits!
' 'Ah, me!
said the cat, 'how can one be in good spirits when one's life is in danger?
Because I am beginning to grow old, and had rather lie at my ease by the fire than run about the house after the mice, my mistress laid hold of me, and was going to drown me; and though I have been lucky enough to get away from her, I do not know what I am to live upon.
'Oh,' said the ass, 'by all means go with us to the great city; you are a good night singer, and may make your fortune as a musician.
' The cat.
was pleased with the thought, and joined the party.
'Bravo!
is all this about?
we should have fine weather for our washing-day, and yet my mistress and the cook don't thank me for my pains, but threaten to cut off my head tomorrow, and make broth of me for the guests that are coming on Sunday!
' 'Heaven forbid!
Chanticleer; it will be better, at any rate, than staying here to have your head cut off!
Besides, who knows?
If we care to sing in tune, we may get up some kind of a concert; so come along with us.
' 'With all my.
heart,' said the cock: so they all four went on jollily together.
They could not, however, reach the great city the first day; so when night came on, they went into a wood to sleep.
The ass and the dog laid themselves down under a great tree, and the cat climbed up into the branches; while the cock, thinking that the higher he sat the safer he should be, flew up to the very top of the tree, and then, according to his custom, before he went to sleep, looked out on all sides of him to see that everything was well.
In doing this, he saw afar off something bright and shining and calling to his companions said, 'There must be a house no great way off, for I see a light.
' 'If that be the case,' said.
the ass, 'we had better change our quarters, for our lodging is not the best in the world!
' 'Besides,' added the dog, 'I should not be the!
worse for a bone or two, or a bit of meat.
' So they walked off together.
The ass, being the tallest of the company, marched up to the window and peeped in.
do I see?' replied the ass.
'Why, I see a table spread with all kinds of.
good things, and robbers sitting round it making merry.
' 'That would.
be a noble lodging for us,' said the cock.
'Yes,' said the ass, 'if we.
could only get in'; so they consulted together how they should contrive to get the robbers out; and at last they hit upon a plan.
The ass placed himself upright on his hind legs, with his forefeet resting against the window; the dog got upon his back; the cat scrambled up to the dog's shoulders, and the cock flew up and sat upon the cat's head.
When all was ready a signal was given, and they began their music.
The ass brayed, the dog barked, the cat mewed, and the cock screamed; and then they all broke through the window at once, and came tumbling into the room, amongst the broken glass, with a most hideous clatter!
The robbers, who had been not a little frightened by the opening concert, had now no doubt that some frightful hobgoblin had broken in upon them, and scampered away as fast as they could.
The coast once clear, our travellers soon sat down and dispatched what the robbers had left, with as much eagerness as if they had not expected to eat again for a month.
As soon as they had satisfied themselves, they put out the lights, and each once more sought out a resting-place to his own liking.
But about midnight, when the robbers saw from afar that the lights were out and that all seemed quiet, they began to think that they had been in too great a hurry to run away; and one of them, who was bolder than the rest, went to see what was going on.
Finding everything still, he marched into the kitchen, and groped about till he found a match in order to light a candle; and then, espying the glittering fiery eyes of the cat, he mistook them for live coals, and held the match to them to light it.
At this the robber ran back as fast as he could to his comrades, and told the captain how a horrid witch had got into the house, and had spat at him and scratched his face with her long bony fingers; how a man with a knife in his hand had hidden himself behind the door, and stabbed him in the leg; how a black monster stood in the yard and struck him with a club, and how the devil had sat upon the top of the house and cried out, 'Throw the rascal up here!
' After this the robbers never dared to go!
back to the house; but the musicians were so pleased with their quarters that they took up their abode there; and there they are, I dare say, at this very day.
OLD SULTAN A shepherd had a faithful dog, called Sultan, who was grown very old, and had lost all his teeth.
And one day when the shepherd and his wife were standing together before the house the shepherd said, 'I will shoot old Sultan tomorrow morning, for he is of no use now.
' But his wife.
said, 'Pray let the poor faithful creature live; he has served us well a great many years, and we ought to give him a livelihood for the rest of his days.
' 'But what can we do with him?' said the shepherd, 'he has not.
a tooth in his head, and the thieves don't care for him at all; to be sure he has served us, but then he did it to earn his livelihood; tomorrow shall be his last day, depend upon it.
Poor Sultan, who was lying close by them, heard all that the shepherd and his wife said to one another, and was very much frightened to think tomorrow would be his last day; so in the evening he went to his good friend the wolf, who lived in the wood, and told him all his sorrows, and how his master meant to kill him in the morning.
'Make yourself.
easy,' said the wolf, 'I will give you some good advice.
Your master, you know, goes out every morning very early with his wife into the field; and they take their little child with them, and lay it down behind the hedge in the shade while they are at work.
Now do you lie down close by the child, and pretend to be watching it, and I will come out of the wood and run away with it; you must run after me as fast as you can, and I will let it drop; then you may carry it back, and they will think you have saved their child, and will be so thankful to you that they will take care of you as long as you live.
' The dog liked this.
plan very well; and accordingly so it was managed.
The wolf ran with the child a little way; the shepherd and his wife screamed out; but Sultan soon overtook him, and carried the poor little thing back to his master and mistress.
Then the shepherd patted him on the head, and said, 'Old Sultan has saved our child from the wolf, and therefore he shall live and be well taken care of, and have plenty to eat.
Wife, go home, and give him a good dinner, and let him have my old cushion to sleep on as long as he lives.
could wish for.
' 'No,'.
thought he was in joke, and came one night to get a dainty morsel.
But Sultan had told his master what the wolf meant to do; so he laid wait for him behind the barn door, and when the wolf was busy looking out for a good fat sheep, he had a stout cudgel laid about his back, that combed his locks for him finely.
Then the wolf was very angry, and called Sultan 'an old rogue,' and swore he would have his revenge.
The wolf and the wild boar were first on the ground; and when they espied their enemies coming, and saw the cat's long tail standing straight in the air, they thought she was carrying a sword for Sultan to fight with; and every time she limped, they thought she was picking up a stone to throw at them; so they said they should not like this way of fighting, and the boar lay down behind a bush, and the wolf jumped up into a tree.
Sultan and the cat soon came up, and looked about and wondered that no one was there.
' So they looked up, and espied the wolf.
sitting amongst the branches; and they called him a cowardly rascal, and would not suffer him to come down till he was heartily ashamed of himself, and had promised to be good friends again with old Sultan.
THE STRAW, THE COAL, AND THE BEAN In a village dwelt a poor old woman, who had gathered together a dish of beans and wanted to cook them.
So she made a fire on her hearth, and that it might burn the quicker, she lighted it with a handful of straw.
When she was emptying the beans into the pan, one dropped without her observing it, and lay on the ground beside a straw, and soon afterwards a burning coal from the fire leapt down to the two.
Then the straw began and said: 'Dear friends, from whence do you come here?
' The coal?
replied: 'I fortunately sprang out of the fire, and if I had not escaped by sheer force, my death would have been certain,--I should have been burnt to ashes.
' The bean said: 'I too have escaped with a whole skin,.
but if the old woman had got me into the pan, I should have been made into broth without any mercy, like my comrades.
' 'And would a better.
fate have fallen to my lot?' said the straw.
'The old woman has.
destroyed all my brethren in fire and smoke; she seized sixty of them at once, and took their lives.
I luckily slipped through her fingers.
'But what are we to do now?' said the coal.
'I think,' answered the bean, 'that as we have so fortunately escaped death, we should keep together like good companions, and lest a new mischance should overtake us here, we should go away together, and repair to a foreign country.
The proposition pleased the two others, and they set out on their way together.
Soon, however, they came to a little brook, and as there was no bridge or foot-plank, they did not know how they were to get over it.
The straw hit on a good idea, and said: 'I will lay myself straight across, and then you can walk over on me as on a bridge.
' The straw.
therefore stretched itself from one bank to the other, and the coal, who was of an impetuous disposition, tripped quite boldly on to the newly-built bridge.
But when she had reached the middle, and heard the water rushing beneath her, she was after all, afraid, and stood still, and ventured no farther.
The straw, however, began to burn, broke in two pieces, and fell into the stream.
The coal slipped after her, hissed when she got into the water, and breathed her last.
The bean, who had prudently stayed behind on the shore, could not but laugh at the event, was unable to stop, and laughed so heartily that she burst.
As he had a compassionate heart he pulled out his needle and thread, and sewed her together.
The bean thanked him most prettily, but as the tailor used black thread, all beans since then have a black seam.
Now this king and queen had plenty of money, and plenty of fine clothes to wear, and plenty of good things to eat and drink, and a coach to ride out in every day: but though they had been married many years they had no children, and this grieved them very much indeed.
Then the queen took pity on the little fish, and threw it back again into the river; and before it swam away it lifted its head out of the water and said, 'I know what your wish is, and it shall be fulfilled, in return for your kindness to me--you will soon have a daughter.
' What the little fish had foretold soon came to.
pass; and the queen had a little girl, so very beautiful that the king could not cease looking on it for joy, and said he would hold a great feast and make merry, and show the child to all the land.
So he asked his kinsmen, and nobles, and friends, and neighbours.
but as the king and queen had only twelve golden dishes for them to eat out of, they were forced to leave one of the fairies without asking her.
So twelve fairies came, each with a high red cap on her head, and red shoes with high heels on her feet, and a long white wand in her hand: and after the feast was over they gathered round in a ring and gave all their best gifts to the little princess.
Just as eleven of them had done blessing her, a great noise was heard in the courtyard, and word was brought that the thirteenth fairy was come, with a black cap on her head, and black shoes on her feet, and a broomstick in her hand: and presently up she came into the dining-hall.
Now, as she had not been asked to the feast she was very angry, and scolded the king and queen very much, and set to work to take her revenge.
So she cried out, 'The king's daughter shall, in her fifteenth year, be wounded by a spindle, and fall down dead.
' Then the twelfth of.
But all the gifts of the first eleven fairies were in the meantime fulfilled; for the princess was so beautiful, and well behaved, and good, and wise, that everyone who knew her loved her.
It happened that, on the very day she was fifteen years old, the king and queen were not at home, and she was left alone in the palace.
In the door there was a golden key, and when she turned it the door sprang open, and there sat an old lady spinning away very busily.
'Why, how now, good mother,' said the princess; 'what.
are you doing there?
' 'Spinning,' said the old lady, and nodded her?
head, humming a tune, while buzz! went the wheel.
'How prettily that.
little thing turns round!
' said the princess, and took the spindle!
and began to try and spin.
But scarcely had she touched it, before the fairy's prophecy was fulfilled; the spindle wounded her, and she fell down lifeless on the ground.
However, she was not dead, but had only fallen into a deep sleep; and the king and the queen, who had just come home, and all their court, fell asleep too; and the horses slept in the stables, and the dogs in the court, the pigeons on the house-top, and the very flies slept upon the walls.
Even the fire on the hearth left off blazing, and went to sleep; the jack stopped, and the spit that was turning about with a goose upon it for the king's dinner stood still; and the cook, who was at that moment pulling the kitchen-boy by the hair to give him a box on the ear for something he had done amiss, let him go, and both fell asleep; the butler, who was slyly tasting the ale, fell asleep with the jug at his lips: and thus everything stood still, and slept soundly.
A large hedge of thorns soon grew round the palace, and every year it became higher and thicker; till at last the old palace was surrounded and hidden, so that not even the roof or the chimneys could be seen.
But there went a report through all the land of the beautiful sleeping Briar Rose (for so the king's daughter was called): so that, from time to time, several kings' sons came, and tried to break through the thicket into the palace.
This, however, none of them could ever do; for the thorns and bushes laid hold of them, as it were with hands; and there they stuck fast, and died wretchedly.
After many, many years there came a king's son into that land: and an old man told him the story of the thicket of thorns; and how a beautiful palace stood behind it, and how a wonderful princess, called Briar Rose, lay in it asleep, with all her court.
He told, too, how he had heard from his grandfather that many, many princes had come, and had tried to break through the thicket, but that they had all stuck fast in it, and died.
Then the young prince said, 'All this shall not frighten me; I will go and see this Briar Rose.
' The old man tried to hinder him, but.
he was bent upon going.
Then he came at last to the palace, and there in the court lay the dogs asleep; and the horses were standing in the stables; and on the roof sat the pigeons fast asleep, with their heads under their wings.
And when he came into the palace, the flies were sleeping on the walls; the spit was standing still; the butler had the jug of ale at his lips, going to drink a draught; the maid sat with a fowl in her lap ready to be plucked; and the cook in the kitchen was still holding up her hand, as if she was going to beat the boy.
She looked so beautiful that he could not take his eyes off her, so he stooped down and gave her a kiss.
But the moment he kissed her she opened her eyes and awoke, and smiled upon him; and they went out together; and soon the king and queen also awoke, and all the court, and gazed on each other with great wonder.
And the horses shook themselves, and the dogs jumped up and barked; the pigeons took their heads from under their wings, and looked about and flew into the fields; the flies on the walls buzzed again; the fire in the kitchen blazed up; round went the jack, and round went the spit, with the goose for the king's dinner upon it; the butler finished his draught of ale; the maid went on plucking the fowl; and the cook gave the boy the box on his ear.
And then the prince and Briar Rose were married, and the wedding feast was given; and they lived happily together all their lives long.
THE DOG AND THE SPARROW A shepherd's dog had a master who took no care of him, but often let him suffer the greatest hunger.
At last he could bear it no longer; so he took to his heels, and off he ran in a very sad and sorrowful mood.
On the road he met a sparrow that said to him, 'Why are you so sad, my friend?
' 'Because,' said the dog, 'I am very very hungry, and have?
' 'If that be all,' answered the sparrow, 'come with me.
into the next town, and I will soon find you plenty of food.
' So on they.
' So the sparrow perched upon the shelf: and having.
first looked carefully about her to see if anyone was watching her, she pecked and scratched at a steak that lay upon the edge of the shelf, till at last down it fell.
Then the dog snapped it up, and scrambled away with it into a corner, where he soon ate it all up.
the sparrow, 'you shall have some more if you will; so come with me to the next shop, and I will peck you down another steak.
' When the dog had.
eaten this too, the sparrow said to him, 'Well, my good friend, have you had enough now?
' 'I have had plenty of meat,' answered he, 'but I should?
like to have a piece of bread to eat after it.
' 'Come with me then,'.
said the sparrow, 'and you shall soon have that too.
' So she took him.
to a baker's shop, and pecked at two rolls that lay in the window, till they fell down: and as the dog still wished for more, she took him to another shop and pecked down some more for him.
When that was eaten, the sparrow asked him whether he had had enough now.
'Yes,' said he; 'and.
now let us take a walk a little way out of the town.
' So they both went.
out upon the high road; but as the weather was warm, they had not gone far before the dog said, 'I am very much tired--I should like to take a nap.
' 'Very well,' answered the sparrow, 'do so, and in the meantime.
I will perch upon that bush.
' So the dog stretched himself out on the.
road, and fell fast asleep.
Whilst he slept, there came by a carter with a cart drawn by three horses, and loaded with two casks of wine.
stop!
carter, grumbling to himself, 'You make it the worse for me, indeed!
' cracked his whip, and drove his cart over the poor?
dog, so that the wheels crushed him to death.
'There,' cried the.
sparrow, 'thou cruel villain, thou hast killed my friend the dog.
Now mind what I say.
This deed of thine shall cost thee all thou art worth.
and passed on.
But the sparrow crept under the tilt of the cart, and pecked at the bung of one of the casks till she loosened it; and then all the wine ran out, without the carter seeing it.
At last he looked round, and saw that the cart was dripping, and the cask quite empty.
'What an unlucky wretch I am!' cried he.
When the carter saw this, he drew out his hatchet and aimed a blow at the sparrow, meaning to kill her; but she flew away, and the blow fell upon the poor horse's head with such force, that he fell down dead.
'Unlucky wretch that I am!'.
cried he.
'Not wretch enough yet!' said the sparrow.
And as the carter went on with the other two horses, she again crept under the tilt of the cart, and pecked out the bung of the second cask, so that all the wine ran out.
When the carter saw this, he again cried out, 'Miserable wretch that I am!
' But the sparrow answered, 'Not wretch enough yet!
' and!
perched on the head of the second horse, and pecked at him too.
The carter ran up and struck at her again with his hatchet; but away she flew, and the blow fell upon the second horse and killed him on the spot.
'Unlucky wretch that I am!' said he.
the sparrow; and perching upon the third horse, she began to peck him too.
The carter was mad with fury; and without looking about him, or caring what he was about, struck again at the sparrow; but killed his third horse as he done the other two.
'Alas! miserable wretch that I.
am!' cried he.
'Not wretch enough yet!' answered the sparrow as she flew.
'Alas!' said he to his wife, 'what.
ill luck has befallen me!
--my wine is all spilt, and my horses all three!
dead.
' 'Alas! husband,' replied she, 'and a wicked bird has come into.
the house, and has brought with her all the birds in the world, I am sure, and they have fallen upon our corn in the loft, and are eating it up at such a rate!
' Away ran the husband upstairs, and saw thousands of!
birds sitting upon the floor eating up his corn, with the sparrow in the midst of them.
that the corn was almost all gone.
'Not wretch enough yet!' said the.
sparrow; 'thy cruelty shall cost thee thy life yet!' and away she flew.
The carter seeing that he had thus lost all that he had, went down into his kitchen; and was still not sorry for what he had done, but sat himself angrily and sulkily in the chimney corner.
But the sparrow sat on the outside of the window, and cried 'Carter!
thee thy life!
' With that he jumped up in a rage, seized his hatchet,!
and threw it at the sparrow; but it missed her, and only broke the window.
The sparrow now hopped in, perched upon the window-seat, and cried, 'Carter!
it shall cost thee thy life!
' Then he became mad and!
blind with rage, and struck the window-seat with such force that he cleft it in two: and as the sparrow flew from place to place, the carter and his wife were so furious, that they broke all their furniture, glasses, chairs, benches, the table, and at last the walls, without touching the bird at all.
' 'No,' cried he, 'that is letting?
her off too easily: she shall die a much more cruel death; I will eat her.
' But the sparrow began to flutter about, and stretch out her neck.
and cried, 'Carter!
it shall cost thee thy life yet!
' With that he!
could wait no longer: so he gave his wife the hatchet, and cried, 'Wife, strike at the bird and kill her in my hand.
' And the wife struck; but.
she missed her aim, and hit her husband on the head so that he fell down dead, and the sparrow flew quietly home to her nest.
THE TWELVE DANCING PRINCESSES There was a king who had twelve beautiful daughters.
They slept in twelve beds all in one room; and when they went to bed, the doors were shut and locked up; but every morning their shoes were found to be quite worn through as if they had been danced in all night; and yet nobody could find out how it happened, or where they had been.
Then the king made it known to all the land, that if any person could discover the secret, and find out where it was that the princesses danced in the night, he should have the one he liked best for his wife, and should be king after his death; but whoever tried and did not succeed, after three days and nights, should be put to death.
A king's son soon came.
He was well entertained, and in the evening was taken to the chamber next to the one where the princesses lay in their twelve beds.
There he was to sit and watch where they went to dance; and, in order that nothing might pass without his hearing it, the door of his chamber was left open.
But the king's son soon fell asleep; and when he awoke in the morning he found that the princesses had all been dancing, for the soles of their shoes were full of holes.
The same thing happened the second and third night: so the king ordered his head to be cut off.
After him came several others; but they had all the same luck, and all lost their lives in the same manner.
Now it chanced that an old soldier, who had been wounded in battle and could fight no longer, passed through the country where this king reigned: and as he was travelling through a wood, he met an old woman, who asked him where he was going.
'I hardly know where I am going, or.
what I had better do,' said the soldier; 'but I think I should like very well to find out where it is that the princesses dance, and then in time I might be a king.
' 'Well,' said the old dame, 'that is no very hard.
task: only take care not to drink any of the wine which one of the princesses will bring to you in the evening; and as soon as she leaves you pretend to be fast asleep.
Then she gave him a cloak, and said, 'As soon as you put that on you will become invisible, and you will then be able to follow the princesses wherever they go.
' When the soldier heard all this good.
counsel, he determined to try his luck: so he went to the king, and said he was willing to undertake the task.
He was as well received as the others had been, and the king ordered fine royal robes to be given him; and when the evening came he was led to the outer chamber.
Just as he was going to lie down, the eldest of the princesses brought him a cup of wine; but the soldier threw it all away secretly, taking care not to drink a drop.
When the twelve princesses heard this they laughed heartily; and the eldest said, 'This fellow too might have done a wiser thing than lose his life in this way!
' Then they rose up and opened!
their drawers and boxes, and took out all their fine clothes, and dressed themselves at the glass, and skipped about as if they were eager to begin dancing.
But the youngest said, 'I don't know how it is, while you are so happy I feel very uneasy; I am sure some mischance will befall us.
' 'You simpleton,' said the eldest, 'you are always afraid;.
And as for this soldier, even if I had not given him his sleeping draught, he would have slept soundly enough.
When they were all ready, they went and looked at the soldier; but he snored on, and did not stir hand or foot: so they thought they were quite safe; and the eldest went up to her own bed and clapped her hands, and the bed sank into the floor and a trap-door flew open.
The soldier saw them going down through the trap-door one after another, the eldest leading the way; and thinking he had no time to lose, he jumped up, put on the cloak which the old woman had given him, and followed them; but in the middle of the stairs he trod on the gown of the youngest princess, and she cried out to her sisters, 'All is not right; someone took hold of my gown.
nothing but a nail in the wall.
' Then down they all went, and at the.
' But the eldest said, 'It.
is only our princes, who are shouting for joy at our approach.
Then they came to another grove of trees, where all the leaves were of gold; and afterwards to a third, where the leaves were all glittering diamonds.
And the soldier broke a branch from each; and every time there was a loud noise, which made the youngest sister tremble with fear; but the eldest still said, it was only the princes, who were crying for joy.
So they went on till they came to a great lake; and at the side of the lake there lay twelve little boats with twelve handsome princes in them, who seemed to be waiting there for the princesses.
One of the princesses went into each boat, and the soldier stepped into the same boat with the youngest.
There they all landed, and went into the castle, and each prince danced with his princess; and the soldier, who was all the time invisible, danced with them too; and when any of the princesses had a cup of wine set by her, he drank it all up, so that when she put the cup to her mouth it was empty.
They danced on till three o'clock in the morning, and then all their shoes were worn out, so that they were obliged to leave off.
The princes rowed them back again over the lake (but this time the soldier placed himself in the boat with the eldest princess); and on the opposite shore they took leave of each other, the princesses promising to come again the next night.
When they came to the stairs, the soldier ran on before the princesses, and laid himself down; and as the twelve sisters slowly came up very much tired, they heard him snoring in his bed; so they said, 'Now all is quite safe'; then they undressed themselves, put away their fine clothes, pulled off their shoes, and went to bed.
In the morning the soldier said nothing about what had happened, but determined to see more of this strange adventure, and went again the second and third night; and every thing happened just as before; the princesses danced each time till their shoes were worn to pieces, and then returned home.
However, on the third night the soldier carried away one of the golden cups as a token of where he had been.
As soon as the time came when he was to declare the secret, he was taken before the king with the three branches and the golden cup; and the twelve princesses stood listening behind the door to hear what he would say.
And when the king asked him.
'Where do my twelve daughters dance at.
night?' he answered, 'With twelve princes in a castle under ground.
' And.
then he told the king all that had happened, and showed him the three branches and the golden cup which he had brought with him.
Then the king called for the princesses, and asked them whether what the soldier said was true: and when they saw that they were discovered, and that it was of no use to deny what had happened, they confessed it all.
'--And they.
were married that very day, and the soldier was chosen to be the king's heir.
THE FISHERMAN AND HIS WIFE There was once a fisherman who lived with his wife in a pigsty, close by the seaside.
The fisherman used to go out all day long a-fishing; and one day, as he sat on the shore with his rod, looking at the sparkling waves and watching his line, all on a sudden his float was dragged away deep into the water: and in drawing it up he pulled out a great fish.
But the fish said, 'Pray let me live!
I am not a real fish; I am an enchanted prince: put me in the water again, and let me go!
' 'Oh, ho!
said the man, 'you need not make so many words about the matter; I will have nothing to do with a fish that can talk: so swim away, sir, as soon as you please!
' Then he put him back into the water, and the fish darted!
straight down to the bottom, and left a long streak of blood behind him on the wave.
When the fisherman went home to his wife in the pigsty, he told her how he had caught a great fish, and how it had told him it was an enchanted prince, and how, on hearing it speak, he had let it go again.
'Did not.
you ask it for anything?
' said the wife, 'we live very wretchedly here,?
in this nasty dirty pigsty; do go back and tell the fish we want a snug little cottage.
The fisherman did not much like the business: however, he went to the seashore; and when he came back there the water looked all yellow and green.
And he stood at the water's edge, and said: 'O man of the sea!
My wife Ilsabill Will have her own will, And hath sent me to beg a boon of thee!
' said the fisherman, 'she says that when!
I had caught you, I ought to have asked you for something before I let you go; she does not like living any longer in the pigsty, and wants a snug little cottage.
' 'Go home, then,' said the fish; 'she is in the.
cottage already!
' So the man went home, and saw his wife standing at the!
door of a nice trim little cottage.
'Come in, come in!' said she; 'is.
not this much better than the filthy pigsty we had?
parlour, and a bedchamber, and a kitchen; and behind the cottage there was a little garden, planted with all sorts of flowers and fruits; and there was a courtyard behind, full of ducks and chickens.
'Ah!' said the.
' 'We will try to do so, at!
least,' said his wife.
Everything went right for a week or two, and then Dame Ilsabill said, 'Husband, there is not near room enough for us in this cottage; the courtyard and the garden are a great deal too small; I should like to have a large stone castle to live in: go to the fish again and tell him to give us a castle.
' 'Wife,' said the fisherman, 'I don't like to go to.
' 'Nonsense!' said the wife; 'he will do it.
The fisherman went, but his heart was very heavy: and when he came to the sea, it looked blue and gloomy, though it was very calm; and he went close to the edge of the waves, and said: 'O man of the sea!
My wife Ilsabill Will have her own will, And hath sent me to beg a boon of thee!
'Well, what does she want now?' said the fish.
'Ah!' said the man,.
dolefully, 'my wife wants to live in a stone castle.
said the fish; 'she is standing at the gate of it already.
the fisherman, and found his wife standing before the gate of a great castle.
'See,' said she, 'is not this grand?' With that they went into.
the castle together, and found a great many servants there, and the rooms all richly furnished, and full of golden chairs and tables; and behind the castle was a garden, and around it was a park half a mile long, full of sheep, and goats, and hares, and deer; and in the courtyard were stables and cow-houses.
'Well,' said the man, 'now we.
' 'Perhaps we may,' said the wife; 'but let us sleep upon it,.
' So they went to bed.
The next morning when Dame Ilsabill awoke it was broad daylight, and she jogged the fisherman with her elbow, and said, 'Get up, husband, and bestir yourself, for we must be king of all the land.
' 'Wife, wife,'.
said the man, 'why should we wish to be the king?
I will not be king.
'Then I will,' said she.
'But, wife,' said the fisherman, 'how can you.
no more about it, but go and try!
I will be king.
This time the sea looked a dark grey colour, and was overspread with curling waves and the ridges of foam as he cried out: 'O man of the sea!
My wife Ilsabill Will have her own will, And hath sent me to beg a boon of thee!
'Well, what would she have now?' said the fish.
'Alas!' said the poor.
man, 'my wife wants to be king.
' 'Go home,' said the fish; 'she is king.
already.
Then the fisherman went home; and as he came close to the palace he saw a troop of soldiers, and heard the sound of drums and trumpets.
And when he went in he saw his wife sitting on a throne of gold and diamonds, with a golden crown upon her head; and on each side of her stood six fair maidens, each a head taller than the other.
'Well, wife,' said the.
' And when he had.
looked at her for a long time, he said, 'Ah, wife!
what a fine thing it!
is to be king!
time.
I am king, it is true; but I begin to be tired of that, and I think I should like to be emperor.
be emperor?' said the fisherman.
'Husband,' said she, 'go to the fish!.
' 'Ah, wife!' replied the fisherman, 'the fish.
cannot make an emperor, I am sure, and I should not like to ask him for such a thing.
' 'I am king,' said Ilsabill, 'and you are my slave; so go.
at once!
So the fisherman was forced to go; and he muttered as he went along, 'This will come to no good, it is too much to ask; the fish will be tired at last, and then we shall be sorry for what we have done.
soon came to the seashore; and the water was quite black and muddy, and a mighty whirlwind blew over the waves and rolled them about, but he went as near as he could to the water's brink, and said: 'O man of the sea!
My wife Ilsabill Will have her own will, And hath sent me to beg a boon of thee!
'Ah!' said the fisherman,.
'she wants to be emperor.
' 'Go home,' said the fish; 'she is emperor.
already.
So he went home again; and as he came near he saw his wife Ilsabill sitting on a very lofty throne made of solid gold, with a great crown on her head full two yards high; and on each side of her stood her guards and attendants in a row, each one smaller than the other, from the tallest giant down to a little dwarf no bigger than my finger.
emperor.
' 'Ah!' said the man, as he gazed upon her, 'what a fine thing.
I will be pope next.
' 'O wife, wife!' said he, 'how can you be.
pope? there is but one pope at a time in Christendom.
' 'Husband,' said.
she, 'I will be pope this very day.
' 'But,' replied the husband, 'the.
fish cannot make you pope.
' 'What nonsense!' said she; 'if he can make.
an emperor, he can make a pope: go and try him.
So the fisherman went.
But when he came to the shore the wind was raging and the sea was tossed up and down in boiling waves, and the ships were in trouble, and rolled fearfully upon the tops of the billows.
In the middle of the heavens there was a little piece of blue sky, but towards the south all was red, as if a dreadful storm was rising.
My wife Ilsabill Will have her own will, And hath sent me to beg a boon of thee!
'What does she want now?' said the fish.
'Ah!' said the fisherman, 'my.
' 'Go home,' said the fish; 'she is pope already.
And she had three great crowns on her head, and around her stood all the pomp and power of the Church.
And on each side of her were two rows of burning lights, of all sizes, the greatest as large as the highest and biggest tower in the world, and the least no larger than a small rushlight.
'Wife,' said the fisherman, as he looked.
at all this greatness, 'are you pope?' 'Yes,' said she, 'I am pope.
'Well, wife,' replied he, 'it is a grand thing to be pope; and now you must be easy, for you can be nothing greater.
' 'I will think about.
that,' said the wife.
'Ha!' thought she,.
as she woke up and looked at it through the window, 'after all I cannot prevent the sun rising.
' At this thought she was very angry, and wakened.
her husband, and said, 'Husband, go to the fish and tell him I must be lord of the sun and moon.
' The fisherman was half asleep, but the.
thought frightened him so much that he started and fell out of bed.
' said he, 'cannot you be easy with being pope?' 'No,'!
Go to the fish at once!
Then the man went shivering with fear; and as he was going down to the shore a dreadful storm arose, so that the trees and the very rocks shook.
And all the heavens became black with stormy clouds, and the lightnings played, and the thunders rolled; and you might have seen in the sea great black waves, swelling up like mountains with crowns of white foam upon their heads.
My wife Ilsabill Will have her own will, And hath sent me to beg a boon of thee!
'What does she want now?' said the fish.
'Ah!' said he, 'she wants to.
be lord of the sun and moon.
again.
THE WILLOW-WREN AND THE BEAR Once in summer-time the bear and the wolf were walking in the forest, and the bear heard a bird singing so beautifully that he said: 'Brother wolf, what bird is it that sings so well?
said the wolf, 'before whom we must bow down.
' In reality the bird was.
much like to see his royal palace; come, take me thither.
' So they took stock of the hole where the.
The bear, however, could not rest until he had seen the royal palace, and when a short time had passed, went to it again.
'Is that the royal palace?' cried.
the bear; 'it is a wretched palace, and you are not King's children, you are disreputable children!
' When the young wrens heard that, they were!
Our parents are honest people!
The bear and the wolf grew uneasy, and turned back and went into their holes.
The young willow-wrens, however, continued to cry and scream, and when their parents again brought food they said: 'We will not so much as touch one fly's leg, no, not if we were dying of hunger, until you have settled whether we are respectable children or not; the bear has been here and has insulted us!
' Then the old King said: 'Be easy, he shall!
You shall suffer for it--we will punish you by a bloody war.
' Thus war was.
announced to the Bear, and all four-footed animals were summoned to take part in it, oxen, asses, cows, deer, and every other animal the earth contained.
And the willow-wren summoned everything which flew in the air, not only birds, large and small, but midges, and hornets, bees and flies had to come.
When the time came for the war to begin, the willow-wren sent out spies to discover who was the enemy's commander-in-chief.
The gnat, who was the most crafty, flew into the forest where the enemy was assembled, and hid herself beneath a leaf of the tree where the password was to be announced.
There stood the bear, and he called the fox before him and said: 'Fox, you are the most cunning of all animals, you shall be general and lead us.
' 'Good,' said the fox, 'but what signal shall we.
' No one knew that, so the fox said: 'I have a fine long?
bushy tail, which almost looks like a plume of red feathers.
' When the gnat had heard.
When day broke, and the battle was to begin, all the four-footed animals came running up with such a noise that the earth trembled.
The willow-wren with his army also came flying through the air with such a humming, and whirring, and swarming that every one was uneasy and afraid, and on both sides they advanced against each other.
But the willow-wren sent down the hornet, with orders to settle beneath the fox's tail, and sting with all his might.
When the fox felt the first string, he started so that he lifted one leg, from pain, but he bore it, and still kept his tail high in the air; at the second sting, he was forced to put it down for a moment; at the third, he could hold out no longer, screamed, and put his tail between his legs.
When the animals saw that, they thought all was lost, and began to flee, each into his hole, and the birds had won the battle.
Then the King and Queen flew home to their children and cried: 'Children, rejoice, eat and drink to your heart's content, we have won the battle!
' But the young wrens said: 'We will not eat yet, the bear!
must come to the nest, and beg for pardon and say that we are honourable children, before we will do that.
bear's hole and cried: 'Growler, you are to come to the nest to my children, and beg their pardon, or else every rib of your body shall be broken.
' So the bear crept thither in the greatest fear, and begged.
their pardon.
And now at last the young wrens were satisfied, and sat down together and ate and drank, and made merry till quite late into the night.
THE FROG-PRINCE One fine evening a young princess put on her bonnet and clogs, and went out to take a walk by herself in a wood; and when she came to a cool spring of water, that rose in the midst of it, she sat herself down to rest a while.
give all my fine clothes and jewels, and everything that I have in the world.
' said she, 'what can you!
do for me, you nasty frog?
My golden ball has fallen into the spring.
The frog said, 'I want not your pearls, and jewels, and fine clothes; but if you will love me, and let me live with you and eat from off your golden plate, and sleep upon your bed, I will bring you your ball again.
talking!
He can never even get out of the spring to visit me, though he may be able to get my ball for me, and therefore I will tell him he shall have what he asks.
' So she said to the frog, 'Well, if you will.
bring me my ball, I will do all you ask.
' Then the frog put his head.
down, and dived deep under the water; and after a little while he came up again, with the ball in his mouth, and threw it on the edge of the spring.
As soon as the young princess saw her ball, she ran to pick it up; and she was so overjoyed to have it in her hand again, that she never thought of the frog, but ran home with it as fast as she could.
The frog called after her, 'Stay, princess, and take me with you as you said,' But she did not stop to hear a word.
The next day, just as the princess had sat down to dinner, she heard a strange noise--tap, tap--plash, plash--as if something was coming up the marble staircase: and soon afterwards there was a gentle knock at the door, and a little voice cried out and said: 'Open the door, my princess dear, Open the door to thy true love here!
And mind the words that thou and I said By the fountain cool, in the greenwood shade.
Then the princess ran to the door and opened it, and there she saw the frog, whom she had quite forgotten.
At this sight she was sadly frightened, and shutting the door as fast as she could came back to her seat.
'There is a nasty frog,' said she, 'at.
the door, that lifted my ball for me out of the spring this morning: I told him that he should live with me here, thinking that he could never get out of the spring; but there he is at the door, and he wants to come in.
While she was speaking the frog knocked again at the door, and said: 'Open the door, my princess dear, Open the door to thy true love here!
And mind the words that thou and I said By the fountain cool, in the greenwood shade.
' She did so, and the frog hopped.
into the room, and then straight on--tap, tap--plash, plash--from the bottom of the room to the top, till he came up close to the table where the princess sat.
'Pray lift me upon chair,' said he to the princess,.
'and let me sit next to you.
said, 'Put your plate nearer to me, that I may eat out of it.
' This.
she did, and when he had eaten as much as he could, he said, 'Now I am tired; carry me upstairs, and put me into your bed.
though very unwilling, took him up in her hand, and put him upon the pillow of her own bed, where he slept all night long.
As soon as it was light he jumped up, hopped downstairs, and went out of the house.
'Now, then,' thought the princess, 'at last he is gone, and I shall be troubled with him no more.
But she was mistaken; for when night came again she heard the same tapping at the door; and the frog came once more, and said: 'Open the door, my princess dear, Open the door to thy true love here!
And mind the words that thou and I said By the fountain cool, in the greenwood shade.
And when the princess opened the door the frog came in, and slept upon her pillow as before, till the morning broke.
But when the princess awoke on the following morning she was astonished to see, instead of the frog, a handsome prince, gazing on her with the most beautiful eyes she had ever seen, and standing at the head of her bed.
prince, 'have broken his cruel charm, and now I have nothing to wish for but that you should go with me into my father's kingdom, where I will marry you, and love you as long as you live.
The young princess, you may be sure, was not long in saying 'Yes' to all this; and as they spoke a gay coach drove up, with eight beautiful horses, decked with plumes of feathers and a golden harness; and behind the coach rode the prince's servant, faithful Heinrich, who had bewailed the misfortunes of his dear master during his enchantment so long and so bitterly, that his heart had well-nigh burst.
CAT AND MOUSE IN PARTNERSHIP A certain cat had made the acquaintance of a mouse, and had said so much to her about the great love and friendship she felt for her, that at length the mouse agreed that they should live and keep house together.
' The good advice.
At length, after much consideration, the cat said: 'I know no place where it will be better stored up than in the church, for no one dares take anything away from there.
We will set it beneath the altar, and not touch it until we are really in need of it.
' So the pot was.
placed in safety, but it was not long before the cat had a great yearning for it, and said to the mouse: 'I want to tell you something, little mouse; my cousin has brought a little son into the world, and has asked me to be godmother; he is white with brown spots, and I am to hold him over the font at the christening.
Let me go out today, and you look after the house by yourself.
' 'Yes, yes,' answered the mouse, 'by all.
means go, and if you get anything very good to eat, think of me.
' All this,.
however, was untrue; the cat had no cousin, and had not been asked to be godmother.
She went straight to the church, stole to the pot of fat, began to lick at it, and licked the top of the fat off.
Then she took a walk upon the roofs of the town, looked out for opportunities, and then stretched herself in the sun, and licked her lips whenever she thought of the pot of fat, and not until it was evening did she return home.
'Well, here you are again,' said the mouse, 'no doubt you have had a merry day.
' 'All went off well,' answered the cat.
give the child?' 'Top off!' said the cat quite coolly.
'Top off!' cried.
' 'What does that matter,' said the cat, 'it is no worse?
than Crumb-stealer, as your godchildren are called.
Before long the cat was seized by another fit of yearning.
' The good mouse consented,.
but the cat crept behind the town walls to the church, and devoured half the pot of fat.
oneself,' said she, and was quite satisfied with her day's work.
When she went home the mouse inquired: 'And what was the child christened?
What are you saying?
The cat's mouth soon began to water for some more licking.
'All good.
things go in threes,' said she, 'I am asked to stand godmother again.
Half-done!
fur coat and long tail, and are filled with fancies, that's because you do not go out in the daytime.
' During the cat's absence the mouse.
cleaned the house, and put it in order, but the greedy cat entirely emptied the pot of fat.
'When everything is eaten up one has some.
The mouse at once asked what name had been given to the third child.
'It will not please you more than the others,' said the.
cat.
'He is called All-gone.
' 'All-gone,' cried the mouse 'that is the.
most suspicious name of all!
I have never seen it in print.
All-gone; what can that mean?
' and she shook her head, curled herself up, and lay?
down to sleep.
From this time forth no one invited the cat to be godmother, but when the winter had come and there was no longer anything to be found outside, the mouse thought of their provision, and said: 'Come, cat, we will go to our pot of fat which we have stored up for ourselves--we shall enjoy that.
' 'Yes,' answered the cat, 'you will enjoy it as much.
as you would enjoy sticking that dainty tongue of yours out of the window.
fat certainly was still in its place, but it was empty.
'Alas!' said the.
mouse, 'now I see what has happened, now it comes to light!
You are a true friend!
You have devoured all when you were standing godmother.
First top off, then half-done, then--' 'Will you hold your tongue,' cried the cat, 'one word more, and I will eat you too.
' 'All-gone' was already on.
THE GOOSE-GIRL The king of a great land died, and left his queen to take care of their only child.
This child was a daughter, who was very beautiful; and her mother loved her dearly, and was very kind to her.
When she grew up, she was betrothed to a prince who lived a great way off; and as the time drew near for her to be married, she got ready to set off on her journey to his country.
Then the queen her mother, packed up a great many costly things; jewels, and gold, and silver; trinkets, fine dresses, and in short everything that became a royal bride.
And she gave her a waiting-maid to ride with her, and give her into the bridegroom's hands; and each had a horse for the journey.
Now the princess's horse was the fairy's gift, and it was called Falada, and could speak.
When the time came for them to set out, the fairy went into her bed-chamber, and took a little knife, and cut off a lock of her hair, and gave it to the princess, and said, 'Take care of it, dear child; for it is a charm that may be of use to you on the road.
' Then they all took.
a sorrowful leave of the princess; and she put the lock of hair into her bosom, got upon her horse, and set off on her journey to her bridegroom's kingdom.
One day, as they were riding along by a brook, the princess began to feel very thirsty: and she said to her maid, 'Pray get down, and fetch me some water in my golden cup out of yonder brook, for I want to drink.
stoop down by the water and drink; I shall not be your waiting-maid any longer.
' Then she was so thirsty that she got down, and knelt over the.
little brook, and drank; for she was frightened, and dared not bring out her golden cup; and she wept and said, 'Alas!
what will become of me?'!
And the lock answered her, and said: 'Alas!
Then all rode farther on their journey, till the day grew so warm, and the sun so scorching, that the bride began to feel very thirsty again; and at last, when they came to a river, she forgot her maid's rude speech, and said, 'Pray get down, and fetch me some water to drink in my golden cup.
' But the maid answered her, and even spoke more haughtily.
than before: 'Drink if you will, but I shall not be your waiting-maid.
Then the princess was so thirsty that she got off her horse, and lay down, and held her head over the running stream, and cried and said, 'What will become of me?
' And the lock of hair answered her again:?
'Alas!
And as she leaned down to drink, the lock of hair fell from her bosom, and floated away with the water.
So when the bride had done drinking, and would have got upon Falada again, the maid said, 'I shall ride upon Falada, and you may have my horse instead'; so she was forced to give up her horse, and soon afterwards to take off her royal clothes and put on her maid's shabby ones.
At last, as they drew near the end of their journey, this treacherous servant threatened to kill her mistress if she ever told anyone what had happened.
Then the waiting-maid got upon Falada, and the real bride rode upon the other horse, and they went on in this way till at last they came to the royal court.
There was great joy at their coming, and the prince flew to meet them, and lifted the maid from her horse, thinking she was the one who was to be his wife; and she was led upstairs to the royal chamber; but the true princess was told to stay in the court below.
Now the old king happened just then to have nothing else to do; so he amused himself by sitting at his kitchen window, looking at what was going on; and he saw her in the courtyard.
'I brought her with me for the sake of her.
company on the road,' said she; 'pray give the girl some work to do, that she may not be idle.
' The old king could not for some time think.
of any work for her to do; but at last he said, 'I have a lad who takes care of my geese; she may go and help him.
' Now the name of this lad,.
that the real bride was to help in watching the king's geese, was Curdken.
' 'That I will,' said the prince.
'Then tell one of.
your slaughterers to cut off the head of the horse I rode upon, for it was very unruly, and plagued me sadly on the road'; but the truth was, she was very much afraid lest Falada should some day or other speak, and tell all she had done to the princess.
She carried her point, and the faithful Falada was killed; but when the true princess heard of it, she wept, and begged the man to nail up Falada's head against a large dark gate of the city, through which she had to pass every morning and evening, that there she might still see him sometimes.
Then the slaughterer said he would do as she wished; and cut off the head, and nailed it up under the dark gate.
Early the next morning, as she and Curdken went out through the gate, she said sorrowfully: 'Falada, Falada, there thou hangest!
and the head answered: 'Bride, bride, there thou gangest!
Alas!
Then they went out of the city, and drove the geese on.
And when she came to the meadow, she sat down upon a bank there, and let down her waving locks of hair, which were all of pure silver; and when Curdken saw it glitter in the sun, he ran up, and would have pulled some of the locks out, but she cried: 'Blow, breezes, blow!
Let Curdken's hat go!
Blow, breezes, blow!
Let him after it go!
O'er hills, dales, and rocks, Away be it whirl'd Till the silvery locks Are all comb'd and curl'd!
Then there came a wind, so strong that it blew off Curdken's hat; and away it flew over the hills: and he was forced to turn and run after it; till, by the time he came back, she had done combing and curling her hair, and had put it up again safe.
The next morning, as they were going through the dark gate, the poor girl looked up at Falada's head, and cried: 'Falada, Falada, there thou hangest!
and the head answered: 'Bride, bride, there thou gangest!
Alas!
Then she drove on the geese, and sat down again in the meadow, and began to comb out her hair as before; and Curdken ran up to her, and wanted to take hold of it; but she cried out quickly: 'Blow, breezes, blow!
Let Curdken's hat go!
Blow, breezes, blow!
Let him after it go!
O'er hills, dales, and rocks, Away be it whirl'd Till the silvery locks Are all comb'd and curl'd!
Then the wind came and blew away his hat; and off it flew a great way, over the hills and far away, so that he had to run after it; and when he came back she had bound up her hair again, and all was safe.
So they watched the geese till it grew dark.
In the evening, after they came home, Curdken went to the old king, and said, 'I cannot have that strange girl to help me to keep the geese any longer.
' 'Why?' said the king.
'Because, instead of doing any good, she.
' Then the king made him tell him.
what had happened.
And Curdken said, 'When we go in the morning through the dark gate with our flock of geese, she cries and talks with the head of a horse that hangs upon the wall, and says: 'Falada, Falada, there thou hangest!
and the head answers: 'Bride, bride, there thou gangest!
Alas!
And Curdken went on telling the king what had happened upon the meadow where the geese fed; how his hat was blown away; and how he was forced to run after it, and to leave his flock of geese to themselves.
But the old king told the boy to go out again the next day: and when morning came, he placed himself behind the dark gate, and heard how she spoke to Falada, and how Falada answered.
Then he went into the field, and hid himself in a bush by the meadow's side; and he soon saw with his own eyes how they drove the flock of geese; and how, after a little time, she let down her hair that glittered in the sun.
Let Curdken's hat go!
Blow, breezes, blow!
Let him after it go!
O'er hills, dales, and rocks, Away be it whirl'd Till the silvery locks Are all comb'd and curl'd!
All this the old king saw: so he went home without being seen; and when the little goose-girl came back in the evening he called her aside, and asked her why she did so: but she burst into tears, and said, 'That I must not tell you or any man, or I shall lose my life.
But the old king begged so hard, that she had no peace till she had told him all the tale, from beginning to end, word for word.
And the young king rejoiced when he saw her beauty, and heard how meek and patient she had been; and without saying anything to the false bride, the king ordered a great feast to be got ready for all his court.
The bridegroom sat at the top, with the false princess on one side, and the true one on the other; but nobody knew her again, for her beauty was quite dazzling to their eyes; and she did not seem at all like the little goose-girl, now that she had her brilliant dress on.
When they had eaten and drank, and were very merry, the old king said he would tell them a tale.
So he began, and told all the story of the princess, as if it was one that he had once heard; and he asked the true waiting-maid what she thought ought to be done to anyone who would behave thus.
'Nothing better,' said this false bride, 'than that she.
should be thrown into a cask stuck round with sharp nails, and that two white horses should be put to it, and should drag it from street to street till she was dead.
thou has judged thyself, so shall it be done to thee.
' And the young.
king was then married to his true wife, and they reigned over the kingdom in peace and happiness all their lives; and the good fairy came to see them, and restored the faithful Falada to life again.
THE ADVENTURES OF CHANTICLEER AND PARTLET 1.
HOW THEY WENT TO THE MOUNTAINS TO EAT NUTS.
'The nuts are quite ripe now,' said Chanticleer to his wife Partlet, 'suppose we go together to the mountains, and eat as many as we can, before the squirrel takes them all away.
' 'With all my heart,' said.
Partlet, 'let us go and make a holiday of it together.
So they went to the mountains; and as it was a lovely day, they stayed there till the evening.
Now, whether it was that they had eaten so many nuts that they could not walk, or whether they were lazy and would not, I do not know: however, they took it into their heads that it did not become them to go home on foot.
So Chanticleer began to build a little carriage of nutshells: and when it was finished, Partlet jumped into it and sat down, and bid Chanticleer harness himself to it and draw her home.
'That's a good joke!' said Chanticleer; 'no, that will never do;.
' While this was passing, a duck came.
quacking up and cried out, 'You thieving vagabonds, what business have you in my grounds?
I'll give it you well for your insolence!
' and upon!
that she fell upon Chanticleer most lustily.
This she agreed to do; and Chanticleer got upon the box, and drove, crying, 'Now, duck, get on as fast as you can.
pace.
After they had travelled along a little way, they met a needle and a pin walking together along the road: and the needle cried out, 'Stop, stop!
and said it was so dark that they could hardly find their way, and such dirty walking they could not get on at all: he told them that he and his friend, the pin, had been at a public-house a few miles off, and had sat drinking till they had forgotten how late it was; he begged therefore that the travellers would be so kind as to give them a lift in their carriage.
Chanticleer observing that they were but thin fellows, and not likely to take up much room, told them they might ride, but made them promise not to dirty the wheels of the carriage in getting in, nor to tread on Partlet's toes.
Early in the morning, before it was quite light, and when nobody was stirring in the inn, Chanticleer awakened his wife, and, fetching the egg, they pecked a hole in it, ate it up, and threw the shells into the fireplace: they then went to the pin and needle, who were fast asleep, and seizing them by the heads, stuck one into the landlord's easy chair and the other into his handkerchief; and, having done this, they crept away as softly as possible.
However, the duck, who slept in the open air in the yard, heard them coming, and jumping into the brook which ran close by the inn, soon swam out of their reach.
An hour or two afterwards the landlord got up, and took his handkerchief to wipe his face, but the pin ran into him and pricked him: then he walked into the kitchen to light his pipe at the fire, but when he stirred it up the eggshells flew into his eyes, and almost blinded him.
'Bless me!
' said he, 'all the world seems to have a design against my!
the needle ran into him; and this time the!
pain was not in his head.
He now flew into a very great passion, and, suspecting the company who had come in the night before, he went to look after them, but they were all off; so he swore that he never again would take in such a troop of vagabonds, who ate a great deal, paid no reckoning, and gave him nothing for his trouble but their apish tricks.
2.
HOW CHANTICLEER AND PARTLET WENT TO VISIT MR KORBES.
Another day, Chanticleer and Partlet wished to ride out together; so Chanticleer built a handsome carriage with four red wheels, and harnessed six mice to it; and then he and Partlet got into the carriage, and away they drove.
Soon afterwards a cat met them, and said, 'Where are you going?
' And Chanticleer replied,?
'All on our way A visit to pay To Mr Korbes, the fox, today.
'Take care of this handsome coach of mine, Nor dirty my pretty red wheels so fine!
For we are going a visit to pay To Mr Korbes, the fox, today.
When they arrived at Mr Korbes's house, he was not at home; so the mice drew the carriage into the coach-house, Chanticleer and Partlet flew upon a beam, the cat sat down in the fireplace, the duck got into the washing cistern, the pin stuck himself into the bed pillow, the millstone laid himself over the house door, and the egg rolled himself up in the towel.
Then he was very angry, and went without his supper to bed; but when he laid his head on the pillow, the pin ran into his cheek: at this he became quite furious, and, jumping up, would have run out of the house; but when he came to the door, the millstone fell down on his head, and killed him on the spot.
HOW PARTLET DIED AND WAS BURIED, AND HOW CHANTICLEER DIED OF GRIEF.
Another day Chanticleer and Partlet agreed to go again to the mountains to eat nuts; and it was settled that all the nuts which they found should be shared equally between them.
said, 'River, give me some water, for Partlet lies in the mountain, and will be choked by a great nut.
' The river said, 'Run first to the bride,.
and ask her for a silken cord to draw up the water.
' Chanticleer ran to.
the bride, and said, 'Bride, you must give me a silken cord, for then the river will give me water, and the water I will carry to Partlet, who lies on the mountain, and will be choked by a great nut.
' But the bride.
' Then Chanticleer ran to the garden, and took the garland.
from the bough where it hung, and brought it to the bride; and then the bride gave him the silken cord, and he took the silken cord to the river, and the river gave him water, and he carried the water to Partlet; but in the meantime she was choked by the great nut, and lay quite dead, and never moved any more.
Then Chanticleer was very sorry, and cried bitterly; and all the beasts came and wept with him over poor Partlet.
On the way they met the fox.
'Where are you going, Chanticleer?' said he.
'To bury my.
Partlet,' said the other.
'May I go with you?' said the fox.
'Yes; but.
you must get up behind, or my horses will not be able to draw you.
the fox got up behind; and presently the wolf, the bear, the goat, and all the beasts of the wood, came and climbed upon the hearse.
So on they went till they came to a rapid stream.
'How shall we get.
over?' said Chanticleer.
Then said a straw, 'I will lay myself across, and you may pass over upon me.
' But as the mice were going over, the.
straw slipped away and fell into the water, and the six mice all fell in and were drowned.
What was to be done?
Then a large log of wood came and said, 'I am big enough; I will lay myself across the stream, and you shall pass over upon me.
' So he laid himself down; but they managed.
Then he sat down by the grave, and wept and mourned, till at last he died too; and so all were dead.
At length the woman hoped that God was about to grant her desire.
These people had a little window at the back of their house from which a splendid garden could be seen, which was full of the most beautiful flowers and herbs.
One day the woman was standing by this window and looking down into the garden, when she saw a bed which was planted with the most beautiful rampion (rapunzel), and it looked so fresh and green that she longed for it, she quite pined away, and began to look pale and miserable.
Then her husband was alarmed, and asked: 'What ails you, dear wife?
' 'Ah,' she replied, 'if I can't eat?
' The man, who loved her, thought: 'Sooner than let your wife die,.
bring her some of the rampion yourself, let it cost what it will.
At twilight, he clambered down over the wall into the garden of the enchantress, hastily clutched a handful of rampion, and took it to his wife.
She at once made herself a salad of it, and ate it greedily.
It tasted so good to her--so very good, that the next day she longed for it three times as much as before.
If he was to have any rest, her husband must once more descend into the garden.
In the gloom of evening therefore, he let himself down again; but when he had clambered down the wall he was terribly afraid, for he saw the enchantress standing before him.
'How can you dare,' said she with angry look, 'descend into my.
garden and steal my rampion like a thief?
You shall suffer for it!
'Ah,' answered he, 'let mercy take the place of justice, I only made up my mind to do it out of necessity.
My wife saw your rampion from the window, and felt such a longing for it that she would have died if she had not got some to eat.
' Then the enchantress allowed her anger to be.
softened, and said to him: 'If the case be as you say, I will allow you to take away with you as much rampion as you will, only I make one condition, you must give me the child which your wife will bring into the world; it shall be well treated, and I will care for it like a mother.
' The man in his terror consented to everything, and when the.
woman was brought to bed, the enchantress appeared at once, gave the child the name of Rapunzel, and took it away with her.
Rapunzel grew into the most beautiful child under the sun.
When the enchantress wanted to go in, she placed herself beneath it and cried: 'Rapunzel, Rapunzel, Let down your hair to me.
Rapunzel had magnificent long hair, fine as spun gold, and when she heard the voice of the enchantress she unfastened her braided tresses, wound them round one of the hooks of the window above, and then the hair fell twenty ells down, and the enchantress climbed up by it.
After a year or two, it came to pass that the king's son rode through the forest and passed by the tower.
Then he heard a song, which was so charming that he stood still and listened.
The king's son wanted to climb up to her, and looked for the door of the tower, but none was to be found.
He rode home, but the singing had so deeply touched his heart, that every day he went out into the forest and listened to it.
Once when he was thus standing behind a tree, he saw that an enchantress came there, and he heard how she cried: 'Rapunzel, Rapunzel, Let down your hair to me.
Then Rapunzel let down the braids of her hair, and the enchantress climbed up to her.
'If that is the ladder by which one mounts, I too.
will try my fortune,' said he, and the next day when it began to grow dark, he went to the tower and cried: 'Rapunzel, Rapunzel, Let down your hair to me.
At first Rapunzel was terribly frightened when a man, such as her eyes had never yet beheld, came to her; but the king's son began to talk to her quite like a friend, and told her that his heart had been so stirred that it had let him have no rest, and he had been forced to see her.
She said: 'I will willingly go away with you, but I do not know how to get down.
Bring with you a skein of silk every time that you come, and I will weave a ladder with it, and when that is ready I will descend, and you will take me on your horse.
' They.
agreed that until that time he should come to her every evening, for the old woman came by day.
The enchantress remarked nothing of this, until once Rapunzel said to her: 'Tell me, Dame Gothel, how it happens that you are so much heavier for me to draw up than the young king's son--he is with me in a moment.
' 'Ah! you wicked child,' cried the enchantress.
'What do I hear you say!
I thought I had separated you from all the world, and yet you have deceived me!
Rapunzel's beautiful tresses, wrapped them twice round her left hand, seized a pair of scissors with the right, and snip, snap, they were cut off, and the lovely braids lay on the ground.
And she was so pitiless that she took poor Rapunzel into a desert where she had to live in great grief and misery.
On the same day that she cast out Rapunzel, however, the enchantress fastened the braids of hair, which she had cut off, to the hook of the window, and when the king's son came and cried: 'Rapunzel, Rapunzel, Let down your hair to me.
The king's son ascended, but instead of finding his dearest Rapunzel, he found the enchantress, who gazed at him with wicked and venomous looks.
'Aha!' she cried mockingly, 'you would fetch.
your dearest, but the beautiful bird sits no longer singing in the nest; the cat has got it, and will scratch out your eyes as well.
Rapunzel is lost to you; you will never see her again.
' The king's son was beside.
He escaped with his life, but the thorns into which he fell pierced his eyes.
Then he wandered quite blind about the forest, ate nothing but roots and berries, and did naught but lament and weep over the loss of his dearest wife.
He heard a voice, and it seemed so familiar to him that he went towards it, and when he approached, Rapunzel knew him and fell on his neck and wept.
Two of her tears wetted his eyes and they grew clear again, and he could see with them as before.
He led her to his kingdom where he was joyfully received, and they lived for a long time afterwards, happy and contented.
FUNDEVOGEL There was once a forester who went into the forest to hunt, and as he entered it he heard a sound of screaming as if a little child were there.
He followed the sound, and at last came to a high tree, and at the top of this a little child was sitting, for the mother had fallen asleep under the tree with the child, and a bird of prey had seen it in her arms, had flown down, snatched it away, and set it on the high tree.
took it home, therefore, and the two children grew up together.
And the one, which he had found on a tree was called Fundevogel, because a bird had carried it away.
Fundevogel and Lina loved each other so dearly that when they did not see each other they were sad.
Now the forester had an old cook, who one evening took two pails and began to fetch water, and did not go once only, but many times, out to the spring.
Lina saw this and said, 'Listen, old Sanna, why are you fetching so much water?
' 'If you will never repeat it to anyone, I will?
tell you why.
and then the cook said: 'Early tomorrow morning, when the forester is out hunting, I will heat the water, and when it is boiling in the kettle, I will throw in Fundevogel, and will boil him in it.
Early next morning the forester got up and went out hunting, and when he was gone the children were still in bed.
' Fundevogel.
said: 'Neither now, nor ever will I leave you.
' Then said Lina: 'Then.
will I tell you.
Last night, old Sanna carried so many buckets of water into the house that I asked her why she was doing that, and she said that if I would promise not to tell anyone, and she said that early tomorrow morning when father was out hunting, she would set the kettle full of water, throw you into it and boil you; but we will get up quickly, dress ourselves, and go away together.
The two children therefore got up, dressed themselves quickly, and went away.
When the water in the kettle was boiling, the cook went into the bedroom to fetch Fundevogel and throw him into it.
But when she came in, and went to the beds, both the children were gone.
They must be followed instantly to get them back again.
Then the cook sent three servants after them, who were to run and overtake the children.
The children, however, were sitting outside the forest, and when they saw from afar the three servants running, Lina said to Fundevogel: 'Never leave me, and I will never leave you.
' Then said Lina: 'Do you become.
a rose-tree, and I the rose upon it.
Then said they: 'There is nothing to be done here,' and they went home and told the cook that they had seen nothing in the forest but a little rose-bush with one rose on it.
Then the old cook scolded and said: 'You simpletons, you should have cut the rose-bush in two, and have broken off the rose and brought it home with you; go, and do it at once.
The children, however, saw them coming from a distance.
Then Lina said: 'Fundevogel, never leave me, and I will never leave you.
' Fundevogel said: 'Neither now; nor ever.
' Said Lina: 'Then do you.
become a church, and I'll be the chandelier in it.
' So when the three.
servants came, nothing was there but a church, with a chandelier in it.
They said therefore to each other: 'What can we do here, let us go home.
' When they got home, the cook asked if they had not found them;.
so they said no, they had found nothing but a church, and there was a chandelier in it.
And the cook scolded them and said: 'You fools!
why!
did you not pull the church to pieces, and bring the chandelier home with you?
' And now the old cook herself got on her legs, and went with?
the three servants in pursuit of the children.
The children, however, saw from afar that the three servants were coming, and the cook waddling after them.
Then said Lina: 'Fundevogel, never leave me, and I will never leave you.
' Then said Fundevogel: 'Neither now, nor ever.
Said Lina: 'Be a fishpond, and I will be the duck upon it.
' The cook,.
however, came up to them, and when she saw the pond she lay down by it, and was about to drink it up.
But the duck swam quickly to her, seized her head in its beak and drew her into the water, and there the old witch had to drown.
Then the children went home together, and were heartily delighted, and if they have not died, they are living still.
THE VALIANT LITTLE TAILOR One summer's morning a little tailor was sitting on his table by the window; he was in good spirits, and sewed with all his might.
Then came a peasant woman down the street crying: 'Good jams, cheap!
' This rang pleasantly in the tailor's ears; he stretched his!
delicate head out of the window, and called: 'Come up here, dear woman; here you will get rid of your goods.
' The woman came up the three steps.
to the tailor with her heavy basket, and he made her unpack all the pots for him.
' The woman who had hoped to find a good sale, gave him.
what he desired, but went away quite angry and grumbling.
'Now, this jam.
shall be blessed by God,' cried the little tailor, 'and give me health and strength'; so he brought the bread out of the cupboard, cut himself a piece right across the loaf and spread the jam over it.
'This won't.
taste bitter,' said he, 'but I will just finish the jacket before I take a bite.
' He laid the bread near him, sewed on, and in his joy, made.
bigger and bigger stitches.
In the meantime the smell of the sweet jam rose to where the flies were sitting in great numbers, and they were attracted and descended on it in hosts.
'Hi! who invited you?' said the.
little tailor, and drove the unbidden guests away.
The flies, however, who understood no German, would not be turned away, but came back again in ever-increasing companies.
The little tailor at last lost all patience, and drew a piece of cloth from the hole under his work-table, and saying: 'Wait, and I will give it to you,' struck it mercilessly on them.
When he drew it away and counted, there lay before him no fewer than seven, dead and with legs stretched out.
'Are you a fellow of that.
'The whole.
town shall know of this!
' And the little tailor hastened to cut himself!
' 'What, the town!
' he continued, 'the whole world shall hear!
The tailor put on the girdle, and resolved to go forth into the world, because he thought his workshop was too small for his valour.
It had to go into his pocket with the cheese.
The road led him up a mountain, and when he had reached the highest point of it, there sat a powerful giant looking peacefully about him.
' The giant looked contemptuously?
at the tailor, and said: 'You ragamuffin!
You miserable creature!
'Oh, indeed?
' answered the little tailor, and unbuttoned his coat, and?
been men whom the tailor had killed, and began to feel a little respect for the tiny fellow.
Nevertheless, he wished to try him first, and took a stone in his hand and squeezed it together so that water dropped out of it.
'Do that likewise,' said the giant, 'if you have strength.
' 'Is.
' and put his!
hand into his pocket, brought out the soft cheese, and pressed it until the liquid ran out of it.
'Faith,' said he, 'that was a little better,.
of the little man.
Then the giant picked up a stone and threw it so high that the eye could scarcely follow it.
'Now, little mite of a man, do.
that likewise,' 'Well thrown,' said the tailor, 'but after all the stone came down to earth again; I will throw you one which shall never come back at all,' and he put his hand into his pocket, took out the bird, and threw it into the air.
'How does that shot please you,.
comrade?' asked the tailor.
took the little tailor to a mighty oak tree which lay there felled on the ground, and said: 'If you are strong enough, help me to carry the tree out of the forest.
the trunk on your shoulders, and I will raise up the branches and twigs; after all, they are the heaviest.
' The giant took the trunk on his.
shoulder, but the tailor seated himself on a branch, and the giant, who could not look round, had to carry away the whole tree, and the little tailor into the bargain: he behind, was quite merry and happy, and whistled the song: 'Three tailors rode forth from the gate,' as if carrying the tree were child's play.
The giant, after he had dragged the heavy burden part of the way, could go no further, and cried: 'Hark you, I shall have to let the tree fall!
' The tailor sprang nimbly down,!
seized the tree with both arms as if he had been carrying it, and said to the giant: 'You are such a great fellow, and yet cannot even carry the tree!
They went on together, and as they passed a cherry-tree, the giant laid hold of the top of the tree where the ripest fruit was hanging, bent it down, gave it into the tailor's hand, and bade him eat.
But the little tailor was much too weak to hold the tree, and when the giant let it go, it sprang back again, and the tailor was tossed into the air with it.
When he had fallen down again without injury, the giant said: 'What is this?
lack of strength,' answered the little tailor.
' The giant made the attempt but he.
could not get over the tree, and remained hanging in the branches, so that in this also the tailor kept the upper hand.
' The little tailor was willing, and.
followed him.
When they went into the cave, other giants were sitting there by the fire, and each of them had a roasted sheep in his hand and was eating it.
' The giant showed him a bed, and.
said he was to lie down in it and sleep.
When it was midnight, and the giant thought that the little tailor was lying in a sound sleep, he got up, took a great iron bar, cut through the bed with one blow, and thought he had finished off the grasshopper for good.
The giants were terrified, they were afraid that he would strike them all dead, and ran away in a great hurry.
The little tailor went onwards, always following his own pointed nose.
Whilst he lay there, the people came and inspected him on all sides, and read on his girdle: 'Seven at one stroke.
' 'Ah!' said they, 'what does.
the great warrior want here in the midst of peace?
He must be a mighty lord.
' They went and announced him to the king, and gave it as their.
opinion that if war should break out, this would be a weighty and useful man who ought on no account to be allowed to depart.
The counsel pleased the king, and he sent one of his courtiers to the little tailor to offer him military service when he awoke.
The ambassador remained standing by the sleeper, waited until he stretched his limbs and opened his eyes, and then conveyed to him this proposal.
I come here,' the tailor replied, 'I am ready to enter the king's service.
' He was therefore honourably received, and a special dwelling.
was assigned him.
The soldiers, however, were set against the little tailor, and wished him a thousand miles away.
'What is to be the end of this?' they said.
among themselves.
'If we quarrel with him, and he strikes about him,.
' They came therefore to a decision, betook themselves in a body to.
the king, and begged for their dismissal.
'We are not prepared,' said.
they, 'to stay with a man who kills seven at one stroke.
' The king was.
sorry that for the sake of one he should lose all his faithful servants, wished that he had never set eyes on the tailor, and would willingly have been rid of him again.
But he did not venture to give him his dismissal, for he dreaded lest he should strike him and all his people dead, and place himself on the royal throne.
He thought about it for a long time, and at last found good counsel.
He sent to the little tailor and caused him to be informed that as he was a great warrior, he had one request to make to him.
In a forest of his country lived two giants, who caused great mischief with their robbing, murdering, ravaging, and burning, and no one could approach them without putting himself in danger of death.
If the tailor conquered and killed these two giants, he would give him his only daughter to wife, and half of his kingdom as a dowry, likewise one hundred horsemen should go with him to assist him.
'That would indeed be a fine thing for a man like me!
' thought the!
little tailor.
'One is not offered a beautiful princess and half a.
kingdom every day of one's life!
' 'Oh, yes,' he replied, 'I will soon!
subdue the giants, and do not require the help of the hundred horsemen to do it; he who can hit seven with one blow has no need to be afraid of two.
The little tailor went forth, and the hundred horsemen followed him.
When he came to the outskirts of the forest, he said to his followers: 'Just stay waiting here, I alone will soon finish off the giants.
he bounded into the forest and looked about right and left.
After a while he perceived both giants.
They lay sleeping under a tree, and snored so that the branches waved up and down.
When he was halfway up, he slipped down by a branch, until he sat just above the sleepers, and then let one stone after another fall on the breast of one of the giants.
For a long time the giant felt nothing, but at last he awoke, pushed his comrade, and said: 'Why are you knocking me?
you.
' They laid themselves down to sleep again, and then the tailor.
threw a stone down on the second.
the other 'Why are you pelting me?
the first, growling.
They disputed about it for a time, but as they were weary they let the matter rest, and their eyes closed once more.
'That.
is too bad!
' cried he, and sprang up like a madman, and pushed his!
The other paid him back in the same coin, and they got into such a rage that they tore up trees and belaboured each other so long, that at last they both fell down dead on the ground at the same time.
Then the little tailor leapt down.
a lucky thing,' said he, 'that they did not tear up the tree on which I was sitting, or I should have had to sprint on to another like a squirrel; but we tailors are nimble.
' He drew out his sword and gave.
each of them a couple of thrusts in the breast, and then went out to the horsemen and said: 'The work is done; I have finished both of them off, but it was hard work!
They tore up trees in their sore need, and defended themselves with them, but all that is to no purpose when a man like myself comes, who can kill seven at one blow.
' 'But are you not.
'You need not concern yourself about.
that,' answered the tailor, 'they have not bent one hair of mine.
horsemen would not believe him, and rode into the forest; there they found the giants swimming in their blood, and all round about lay the torn-up trees.
The little tailor demanded of the king the promised reward; he, however, repented of his promise, and again bethought himself how he could get rid of the hero.
'Before you receive my daughter, and the half of my.
kingdom,' said he to him, 'you must perform one more heroic deed.
In the forest roams a unicorn which does great harm, and you must catch it first.
' 'I fear one unicorn still less than two giants.
Seven at one blow, is my kind of affair.
' He took a rope and an axe with him, went.
forth into the forest, and again bade those who were sent with him to wait outside.
The unicorn soon came towards him, and rushed directly on the tailor, as if it would gore him with its horn without more ado.
'Softly, softly; it can't be done as quickly as.
that,' said he, and stood still and waited until the animal was quite close, and then sprang nimbly behind the tree.
The unicorn ran against the tree with all its strength, and stuck its horn so fast in the trunk that it had not the strength enough to draw it out again, and thus it was caught.
'Now, I have got the bird,' said the tailor, and came out.
Before the wedding the tailor was to catch him a wild boar that made great havoc in the forest, and the huntsmen should give him their help.
'Willingly,' said the tailor, 'that is child's play!' He did not.
take the huntsmen with him into the forest, and they were well pleased that he did not, for the wild boar had several times received them in such a manner that they had no inclination to lie in wait for him.
When the boar perceived the tailor, it ran on him with foaming mouth and whetted tusks, and was about to throw him to the ground, but the hero fled and sprang into a chapel which was near and up to the window at once, and in one bound out again.
The boar ran after him, but the tailor ran round outside and shut the door behind it, and then the raging beast, which was much too heavy and awkward to leap out of the window, was caught.
The little tailor called the huntsmen thither that they might see the prisoner with their own eyes.
The hero, however, went to the king, who was now, whether he liked it or not, obliged to keep his promise, and gave his daughter and the half of his kingdom.
Had he known that it was no warlike hero, but a little tailor who was standing before him, it would have gone to his heart still more than it did.
After some time the young queen heard her husband say in his dreams at night: 'Boy, make me the doublet, and patch the pantaloons, or else I will rap the yard-measure over your ears.
state of life the young lord had been born, and next morning complained of her wrongs to her father, and begged him to help her to get rid of her husband, who was nothing else but a tailor.
The king comforted her and said: 'Leave your bedroom door open this night, and my servants shall stand outside, and when he has fallen asleep shall go in, bind him, and take him on board a ship which shall carry him into the wide world.
' The woman was satisfied with this; but the king's armour-bearer,.
who had heard all, was friendly with the young lord, and informed him of the whole plot.
'I'll put a screw into that business,' said the little.
tailor.
At night he went to bed with his wife at the usual time, and when she thought that he had fallen asleep, she got up, opened the door, and then lay down again.
I smote seven at one blow.
I killed two giants, I brought away one unicorn, and caught a wild boar, and am I to fear those who are standing outside the room.
So the little tailor was and remained a king to the end of his life.
The boy was called Hansel and the girl Gretel.
He had little to bite and to break, and once when great dearth fell on the land, he could no longer procure even daily bread.
Now when he thought over this by night in his bed, and tossed about in his anxiety, he groaned and said to his wife: 'What is to become of us?
How are we to feed our poor children, when we no longer have anything even for ourselves?
' 'I'll tell you what, husband,' answered the woman, 'early?
tomorrow morning we will take the children out into the forest to where it is the thickest; there we will light a fire for them, and give each of them one more piece of bread, and then we will go to our work and leave them alone.
' 'No, wife,' said the man, 'I will not do that; how can I.
bear to leave my children alone in the forest?
--the wild animals would?
soon come and tear them to pieces.
' 'O, you fool!' said she, 'then we.
must all four die of hunger, you may as well plane the planks for our coffins,' and she left him no peace until he consented.
'But I feel very.
sorry for the poor children, all the same,' said the man.
The two children had also not been able to sleep for hunger, and had heard what their stepmother had said to their father.
Gretel wept bitter tears, and said to Hansel: 'Now all is over with us.
' 'Be quiet,.
Gretel,' said Hansel, 'do not distress yourself, I will soon find a way to help us.
The moon shone brightly, and the white pebbles which lay in front of the house glittered like real silver pennies.
Hansel stooped and stuffed the little pocket of his coat with as many as he could get in.
Then he went back and said to Gretel: 'Be comforted, dear little sister, and sleep in peace, God will not forsake us,' and he lay down again in his bed.
When day dawned, but before the sun had risen, the woman came and awoke the two children, saying: 'Get up, you sluggards!
forest to fetch wood.
'There is something for your dinner, but do not eat it up before then, for you will get nothing else.
' Gretel took the bread under her apron,.
as Hansel had the pebbles in his pocket.
Then they all set out together on the way to the forest.
His father said: 'Hansel, what are you looking at there and staying behind for?
Pay attention, and do not forget how to use your legs.
father,' said Hansel, 'I am looking at my little white cat, which is sitting up on the roof, and wants to say goodbye to me.
' The wife said:.
'Fool, that is not your little cat, that is the morning sun which is shining on the chimneys.
the cat, but had been constantly throwing one of the white pebble-stones out of his pocket on the road.
When they had reached the middle of the forest, the father said: 'Now, children, pile up some wood, and I will light a fire that you may not be cold.
' Hansel and Gretel gathered brushwood together, as high as a.
little hill.
The brushwood was lighted, and when the flames were burning very high, the woman said: 'Now, children, lay yourselves down by the fire and rest, we will go into the forest and cut some wood.
When we have done, we will come back and fetch you away.
Hansel and Gretel sat by the fire, and when noon came, each ate a little piece of bread, and as they heard the strokes of the wood-axe they believed that their father was near.
It was not the axe, however, but a branch which he had fastened to a withered tree which the wind was blowing backwards and forwards.
When at last they awoke, it was already dark night.
Gretel began to cry and said: 'How are we to get out of the forest now?
' But Hansel comforted?
' And when the full moon had risen, Hansel took.
They walked the whole night long, and by break of day came once more to their father's house.
They knocked at the door, and when the woman opened it and saw that it was Hansel and Gretel, she said: 'You naughty children, why have you slept so long in the forest?
--we thought you were?
never coming back at all!
' The father, however, rejoiced, for it had cut!
him to the heart to leave them behind alone.
Not long afterwards, there was once more great dearth throughout the land, and the children heard their mother saying at night to their father: 'Everything is eaten again, we have one half loaf left, and that is the end.
The children must go, we will take them farther into the wood, so that they will not find their way out again; there is no other means of saving ourselves!
' The man's heart was heavy, and he thought:!
'It would be better for you to share the last mouthful with your children.
say, but scolded and reproached him.
He who says A must say B, likewise, and as he had yielded the first time, he had to do so a second time also.
The children, however, were still awake and had heard the conversation.
When the old folks were asleep, Hansel again got up, and wanted to go out and pick up pebbles as he had done before, but the woman had locked the door, and Hansel could not get out.
Nevertheless he comforted his little sister, and said: 'Do not cry, Gretel, go to sleep quietly, the good God will help us.
Their piece of bread was given to them, but it was still smaller than the time before.
On the way into the forest Hansel crumbled his in his pocket, and often stood still and threw a morsel on the ground.
'Hansel, why do you stop and look round?' said the father, 'go on.
am looking back at my little pigeon which is sitting on the roof, and wants to say goodbye to me,' answered Hansel.
'Fool!' said the woman,.
'that is not your little pigeon, that is the morning sun that is shining on the chimney.
' Hansel, however little by little, threw all the crumbs.
on the path.
The woman led the children still deeper into the forest, where they had never in their lives been before.
Then a great fire was again made, and the mother said: 'Just sit there, you children, and when you are tired you may sleep a little; we are going into the forest to cut wood, and in the evening when we are done, we will come and fetch you away.
it was noon, Gretel shared her piece of bread with Hansel, who had scattered his by the way.
They did not awake until it was dark night, and Hansel comforted his little sister and said: 'Just wait, Gretel, until the moon rises, and then we shall see the crumbs of bread which I have strewn about, they will show us our way home again.
the moon came they set out, but they found no crumbs, for the many thousands of birds which fly about in the woods and fields had picked them all up.
Hansel said to Gretel: 'We shall soon find the way,' but they did not find it.
They walked the whole night and all the next day too from morning till evening, but they did not get out of the forest, and were very hungry, for they had nothing to eat but two or three berries, which grew on the ground.
It was now three mornings since they had left their father's house.
And when its song was over, it spread its wings and flew away before them, and they followed it until they reached a little house, on the roof of which it alighted; and when they approached the little house they saw that it was built of bread and covered with cakes, but that the windows were of clear sugar.
have a good meal.
broke off a little of the roof to try how it tasted, and Gretel leant against the window and nibbled at the panes.
Then a soft voice cried from the parlour: 'Nibble, nibble, gnaw, Who is nibbling at my little house?
The children answered: 'The wind, the wind, The heaven-born wind,' and went on eating without disturbing themselves.
Hansel, who liked the taste of the roof, tore down a great piece of it, and Gretel pushed out the whole of one round window-pane, sat down, and enjoyed herself with it.
Suddenly the door opened, and a woman as old as the hills, who supported herself on crutches, came creeping out.
Hansel and Gretel were so terribly frightened that they let fall what they had in their hands.
' She took them both by the hand, and led them.
into her little house.
Then good food was set before them, milk and pancakes, with sugar, apples, and nuts.
Afterwards two pretty little beds were covered with clean white linen, and Hansel and Gretel lay down in them, and thought they were in heaven.
The old woman had only pretended to be so kind; she was in reality a wicked witch, who lay in wait for children, and had only built the little house of bread in order to entice them there.
When a child fell into her power, she killed it, cooked and ate it, and that was a feast day with her.
Witches have red eyes, and cannot see far, but they have a keen scent like the beasts, and are aware when human beings draw near.
When Hansel and Gretel came into her neighbourhood, she laughed with malice, and said mockingly: 'I have them, they shall not escape me again!
already up, and when she saw both of them sleeping and looking so pretty, with their plump and rosy cheeks she muttered to herself: 'That will be a dainty mouthful!
' Then she seized Hansel with her shrivelled!
Scream as he might, it would not help him.
Then she went to Gretel, shook her till she awoke, and cried: 'Get up, lazy thing, fetch some water, and cook something good for your brother, he is in the stable outside, and is to be made fat.
Gretel began to weep bitterly, but it was all in vain, for she was forced to do what the wicked witch commanded.
And now the best food was cooked for poor Hansel, but Gretel got nothing but crab-shells.
Every morning the woman crept to the little stable, and cried: 'Hansel, stretch out your finger that I may feel if you will soon be fat.
the old woman, who had dim eyes, could not see it, and thought it was Hansel's finger, and was astonished that there was no way of fattening him.
When four weeks had gone by, and Hansel still remained thin, she was seized with impatience and would not wait any longer.
'Now, then,.
Let Hansel be fat or lean, tomorrow I will kill him, and cook him.
' Ah,.
how the poor little sister did lament when she had to fetch the water, and how her tears did flow down her cheeks!
'Dear God, do help us,' she!
cried.
'If the wild beasts in the forest had but devoured us, we should.
at any rate have died together.
' 'Just keep your noise to yourself,'.
said the old woman, 'it won't help you at all.
'We will bake first,' said the old woman,.
'I have already heated the oven, and kneaded the dough.
' She pushed poor.
Gretel out to the oven, from which flames of fire were already darting.
'Creep in,' said the witch, 'and see if it is properly heated, so that we can put the bread in.
' And once Gretel was inside, she intended to.
But Gretel saw what she had in mind, and said: 'I do not know how I am to do it; how do I get in?' 'Silly goose,' said the old woman.
'The door.
is big enough; just look, I can get in myself!
thrust her head into the oven.
Then Gretel gave her a push that drove her far into it, and shut the iron door, and fastened the bolt.
Oh!
then!
she began to howl quite horribly, but Gretel ran away and the godless witch was miserably burnt to death.
Gretel, however, ran like lightning to Hansel, opened his little stable, and cried: 'Hansel, we are saved!
' Then Hansel!
sprang like a bird from its cage when the door is opened.
How they did rejoice and embrace each other, and dance about and kiss each other!
And as they had no longer any need to fear her, they went into the witch's house, and in every corner there stood chests full of pearls and jewels.
' said Hansel, and thrust into his!
'But now we must.
be off,' said Hansel, 'that we may get out of the witch's forest.
When they had walked for two hours, they came to a great stretch of water.
bridge.
' 'And there is also no ferry,' answered Gretel, 'but a white.
duck is swimming there: if I ask her, she will help us over.
The duck came to them, and Hansel seated himself on its back, and told his sister to sit by him.
for the little duck; she shall take us across, one after the other.
good little duck did so, and when they were once safely across and had walked for a short time, the forest seemed to be more and more familiar to them, and at length they saw from afar their father's house.
Then they began to run, rushed into the parlour, and threw themselves round their father's neck.
The man had not known one happy hour since he had left the children in the forest; the woman, however, was dead.
Gretel emptied her pinafore until pearls and precious stones ran about the room, and Hansel threw one handful after another out of his pocket to add to them.
Then all anxiety was at an end, and they lived together in perfect happiness.
My tale is done, there runs a mouse; whosoever catches it, may make himself a big fur cap out of it.
THE MOUSE, THE BIRD, AND THE SAUSAGE Once upon a time, a mouse, a bird, and a sausage, entered into partnership and set up house together.
For a long time all went well; they lived in great comfort, and prospered so far as to be able to add considerably to their stores.
The bird's duty was to fly daily into the wood and bring in fuel; the mouse fetched the water, and the sausage saw to the cooking.
When people are too well off they always begin to long for something new.
And so it came to pass, that the bird, while out one day, met a fellow bird, to whom he boastfully expatiated on the excellence of his household arrangements.
But the other bird sneered at him for being a poor simpleton, who did all the hard work, while the other two stayed at home and had a good time of it.
For, when the mouse had made the fire and fetched in the water, she could retire into her little room and rest until it was time to set the table.
Then, when the bird came home and had laid aside his burden, they sat down to table, and when they had finished their meal, they could sleep their fill till the following morning: and that was really a very delightful life.
Influenced by those remarks, the bird next morning refused to bring in the wood, telling the others that he had been their servant long enough, and had been a fool into the bargain, and that it was now time to make a change, and to try some other way of arranging the work.
Beg and pray as the mouse and the sausage might, it was of no use; the bird remained master of the situation, and the venture had to be made.
They therefore drew lots, and it fell to the sausage to bring in the wood, to the mouse to cook, and to the bird to fetch the water.
The sausage started in search of wood, the bird made the fire, and the mouse put on the pot, and then these two waited till the sausage returned with the fuel for the following day.
He had not flown far, however, when he came across a dog who, having met the sausage, had regarded him as his legitimate booty, and so seized and swallowed him.
The bird complained to the dog of this bare-faced robbery, but nothing he said was of any avail, for the dog answered that he found false credentials on the sausage, and that was the reason his life had been forfeited.
He picked up the wood, and flew sadly home, and told the mouse all he had seen and heard.
They were both very unhappy, but agreed to make the best of things and to remain with one another.
Presently the bird came in and wanted to serve up the dinner, but he could nowhere see the cook.
Then some of the wood that had been carelessly thrown down, caught fire and began to blaze.
The bird hastened to fetch some water, but his pail fell into the well, and he after it, and as he was unable to recover himself, he was drowned.
MOTHER HOLLE Once upon a time there was a widow who had two daughters; one of them was beautiful and industrious, the other ugly and lazy.
Her stepmother sent her out every day to sit by the well in the high road, there to spin until she made her fingers bleed.
Now it chanced one day that some blood fell on to the spindle, and as the girl stopped over the well to wash it off, the spindle suddenly sprang out of her hand and fell into the well.
She ran home crying to tell of her misfortune, but her stepmother spoke harshly to her, and after giving her a violent scolding, said unkindly, 'As you have let the spindle fall into the well you may go yourself and fetch it out.
The girl went back to the well not knowing what to do, and at last in her distress she jumped into the water after the spindle.
She remembered nothing more until she awoke and found herself in a beautiful meadow, full of sunshine, and with countless flowers blooming in every direction.
She walked over the meadow, and presently she came upon a baker's oven full of bread, and the loaves cried out to her, 'Take us out, take us out, or alas!
we shall be burnt to a cinder; we were baked through long!
' So she took the bread-shovel and drew them all out.
She went on a little farther, till she came to a tree full of apples.
' So she shook the tree, and the apples came falling down upon.
her like rain; but she continued shaking until there was not a single apple left upon it.
Then she carefully gathered the apples together in a heap and walked on again.
The next thing she came to was a little house, and there she saw an old woman looking out, with such large teeth, that she was terrified, and turned to run away.
But the old woman called after her, 'What are you afraid of, dear child?
Stay with me; if you will do the work of my house properly for me, I will make you very happy.
You must be very careful, however, to make my bed in the right way, for I wish you always to shake it thoroughly, so that the feathers fly about; then they say, down there in the world, that it is snowing; for I am Mother Holle.
' The old woman.
spoke so kindly, that the girl summoned up courage and agreed to enter into her service.
She took care to do everything according to the old woman's bidding and every time she made the bed she shook it with all her might, so that the feathers flew about like so many snowflakes.
The old woman was as good as her word: she never spoke angrily to her, and gave her roast and boiled meats every day.
So she stayed on with Mother Holle for some time, and then she began to grow unhappy.
She could not at first tell why she felt sad, but she became conscious at last of great longing to go home; then she knew she was homesick, although she was a thousand times better off with Mother Holle than with her mother and sister.
After waiting awhile, she went to Mother Holle and said, 'I am so homesick, that I cannot stay with you any longer, for although I am so happy here, I must return to my own people.
Then Mother Holle said, 'I am pleased that you should want to go back to your own people, and as you have served me so well and faithfully, I will take you home myself.
Thereupon she led the girl by the hand up to a broad gateway.
The gate was opened, and as the girl passed through, a shower of gold fell upon her, and the gold clung to her, so that she was covered with it from head to foot.
The gate was then closed, and the girl found herself back in the old world close to her mother's house.
As she entered the courtyard, the cock who was perched on the well, called out: 'Cock-a-doodle-doo!
Your golden daughter's come back to you.
Then she went in to her mother and sister, and as she was so richly covered with gold, they gave her a warm welcome.
She related to them all that had happened, and when the mother heard how she had come by her great riches, she thought she should like her ugly, lazy daughter to go and try her fortune.
So she made the sister go and sit by the well and spin, and the girl pricked her finger and thrust her hand into a thorn-bush, so that she might drop some blood on to the spindle; then she threw it into the well, and jumped in herself.
be burnt to a cinder; we were baked through long ago,' cried the loaves as before.
But the lazy girl answered, 'Do you think I am going to dirty my hands for you?' and walked on.
'Shake me, shake me, I pray; my.
apples, one and all, are ripe,' it cried.
But she only answered, 'A nice thing to ask me to do, one of the apples might fall on my head,' and passed on.
At last she came to Mother Holle's house, and as she had heard all about the large teeth from her sister, she was not afraid of them, and engaged herself without delay to the old woman.
The first day she was very obedient and industrious, and exerted herself to please Mother Holle, for she thought of the gold she should get in return.
The lazy girl was delighted at this, and thought to herself, 'The gold will soon be mine.
as she had led her sister, to the broad gateway; but as she was passing through, instead of the shower of gold, a great bucketful of pitch came pouring over her.
So the lazy girl had to go home covered with pitch, and the cock on the well called out as she saw her: 'Cock-a-doodle-doo!
Your dirty daughter's come back to you.
But, try what she would, she could not get the pitch off and it stuck to her as long as she lived.
Once she gave her a little cap of red velvet, which suited her so well that she would never wear anything else; so she was always called 'Little Red-Cap.
One day her mother said to her: 'Come, Little Red-Cap, here is a piece of cake and a bottle of wine; take them to your grandmother, she is ill and weak, and they will do her good.
Set out before it gets hot, and when you are going, walk nicely and quietly and do not run off the path, or you may fall and break the bottle, and then your grandmother will get nothing; and when you go into her room, don't forget to say, "Good morning", and don't peep into every corner before you do it.
'I will take great care,' said Little Red-Cap to her mother, and gave her hand on it.
The grandmother lived out in the wood, half a league from the village, and just as Little Red-Cap entered the wood, a wolf met her.
Red-Cap did not know what a wicked creature he was, and was not at all afraid of him.
'Good day, Little Red-Cap,' said he.
'Thank you kindly, wolf.
'Whither away so early, Little Red-Cap?
'To my grandmother's.
'What have you got in your apron?
'Cake and wine; yesterday was baking-day, so poor sick grandmother is to have something good, to make her stronger.
'Where does your grandmother live, Little Red-Cap?
'A good quarter of a league farther on in the wood; her house stands under the three large oak-trees, the nut-trees are just below; you surely must know it,' replied Little Red-Cap.
The wolf thought to himself: 'What a tender young creature!
plump mouthful--she will be better to eat than the old woman.
I must act craftily, so as to catch both.
' So he walked for a short time by.
the side of Little Red-Cap, and then he said: 'See, Little Red-Cap, how pretty the flowers are about here--why do you not look round?
I believe, too, that you do not hear how sweetly the little birds are singing; you walk gravely along as if you were going to school, while everything else out here in the wood is merry.
Little Red-Cap raised her eyes, and when she saw the sunbeams dancing here and there through the trees, and pretty flowers growing everywhere, she thought: 'Suppose I take grandmother a fresh nosegay; that would please her too.
It is so early in the day that I shall still get there in good time'; and so she ran from the path into the wood to look for flowers.
And whenever she had picked one, she fancied that she saw a still prettier one farther on, and ran after it, and so got deeper and deeper into the wood.
Meanwhile the wolf ran straight to the grandmother's house and knocked at the door.
'Who is there?
'Little Red-Cap,' replied the wolf.
'She is bringing cake and wine; open.
the door.
'Lift the latch,' called out the grandmother, 'I am too weak, and cannot get up.
The wolf lifted the latch, the door sprang open, and without saying a word he went straight to the grandmother's bed, and devoured her.
Then he put on her clothes, dressed himself in her cap laid himself in bed and drew the curtains.
Little Red-Cap, however, had been running about picking flowers, and when she had gathered so many that she could carry no more, she remembered her grandmother, and set out on the way to her.
She was surprised to find the cottage-door standing open, and when she went into the room, she had such a strange feeling that she said to herself: 'Oh dear!
how uneasy I feel today, and at other times I like!
being with grandmother so much.
' She called out: 'Good morning,' but.
There lay her grandmother with her cap pulled far over her face, and looking very strange.
'Oh!
grandmother,' she said, 'what big ears you have!
'But, grandmother, what big eyes you have!' she said.
'The better to see you with, my dear.
'The better to hug you with.
'Oh!
but, grandmother, what a terrible big mouth you have!
'The better to eat you with!
When the wolf had appeased his appetite, he lay down again in the bed, fell asleep and began to snore very loud.
The huntsman was just passing the house, and thought to himself: 'How the old woman is snoring!
I must just see if she wants anything.
' So he went into the room, and when he.
came to the bed, he saw that the wolf was lying in it.
'Do I find you.
here, you old sinner!' said he.
'I have long sought you!' Then just as.
he was going to fire at him, it occurred to him that the wolf might have devoured the grandmother, and that she might still be saved, so he did not fire, but took a pair of scissors, and began to cut open the stomach of the sleeping wolf.
How dark it was inside the wolf'; and after that the aged grandmother came out alive also, but scarcely able to breathe.
Red-Cap, however, quickly fetched great stones with which they filled the wolf's belly, and when he awoke, he wanted to run away, but the stones were so heavy that he collapsed at once, and fell dead.
Then all three were delighted.
The huntsman drew off the wolf's skin and went home with it; the grandmother ate the cake and drank the wine which Red-Cap had brought, and revived, but Red-Cap thought to herself: 'As long as I live, I will never by myself leave the path, to run into the wood, when my mother has forbidden me to do so.
It also related that once when Red-Cap was again taking cakes to the old grandmother, another wolf spoke to her, and tried to entice her from the path.
Red-Cap, however, was on her guard, and went straight forward on her way, and told her grandmother that she had met the wolf, and that he had said 'good morning' to her, but with such a wicked look in his eyes, that if they had not been on the public road she was certain he would have eaten her up.
'Well,' said the grandmother, 'we will shut the door,.
that he may not come in.
'Open the door, grandmother, I am Little Red-Cap, and am bringing you some cakes.
' But they did not speak, or open the door, so the grey-beard.
But the grandmother saw what was in his thoughts.
In front of the house was a great stone trough, so she said to the child: 'Take the pail, Red-Cap; I made some sausages yesterday, so carry the water in which I boiled them to the trough.
' Red-Cap carried until the great trough was quite full.
Then the smell of the sausages reached the wolf, and he sniffed and peeped down, and at last stretched out his neck so far that he could no longer keep his footing and began to slip, and slipped down from the roof straight into the great trough, and was drowned.
But Red-Cap went joyously home, and no one ever did anything to harm her again.
THE ROBBER BRIDEGROOM There was once a miller who had one beautiful daughter, and as she was grown up, he was anxious that she should be well married and provided for.
He said to himself, 'I will give her to the first suitable man who comes and asks for her hand.
' Not long after a suitor appeared, and as.
he appeared to be very rich and the miller could see nothing in him with which to find fault, he betrothed his daughter to him.
But the girl did not care for the man as a girl ought to care for her betrothed husband.
She did not feel that she could trust him, and she could not look at him nor think of him without an inward shudder.
One day he said to her, 'You have not yet paid me a visit, although we have been betrothed for some time.
' 'I do not know where your house is,' she answered.
'My house is.
out there in the dark forest,' he said.
She tried to excuse herself by saying that she would not be able to find the way thither.
Her betrothed only replied, 'You must come and see me next Sunday; I have already invited guests for that day, and that you may not mistake the way, I will strew ashes along the path.
When Sunday came, and it was time for the girl to start, a feeling of dread came over her which she could not explain, and that she might be able to find her path again, she filled her pockets with peas and lentils to sprinkle on the ground as she went along.
There she saw a lonely house, looking so grim and mysterious, that it did not please her at all.
She stepped inside, but not a soul was to be seen, and a great silence reigned throughout.
Suddenly a voice cried: 'Turn back, turn back, young maiden fair, Linger not in this murderers' lair.
The girl looked up and saw that the voice came from a bird hanging in a cage on the wall.
Again it cried: 'Turn back, turn back, young maiden fair, Linger not in this murderers' lair.
At last she came to the cellar, and there sat a very, very old woman, who could not keep her head from shaking.
'Can you tell me,' asked the girl, 'if my betrothed husband.
'Ah, you poor child,' answered the old woman, 'what a place for you to come to!
This is a murderers' den.
You think yourself a promised bride, and that your marriage will soon take place, but it is with death that you will keep your marriage feast.
Look, do you see that large cauldron of water which I am obliged to keep on the fire!
If I did not take pity on you and save you, you would be lost.
Thereupon the old woman led her behind a large cask, which quite hid her from view.
'Keep as still as a mouse,' she said; 'do not move or speak,.
or it will be all over with you.
Tonight, when the robbers are all asleep, we will flee together.
I have long been waiting for an opportunity to escape.
The words were hardly out of her mouth when the godless crew returned, dragging another young girl along with them.
They gave her wine to drink, three glasses full, one of white wine, one of red, and one of yellow, and with that her heart gave way and she died.
The poor betrothed girl crouched trembling and shuddering behind the cask, for she saw what a terrible fate had been intended for her by the robbers.
One of them now noticed a gold ring still remaining on the little finger of the murdered girl, and as he could not draw it off easily, he took a hatchet and cut off the finger; but the finger sprang into the air, and fell behind the cask into the lap of the girl who was hiding there.
The robber took a light and began looking for it, but he could not find it.
'Have you looked behind the large cask?' said one of.
the others.
'The old woman is right,' said the robbers, and they ceased looking for the finger and sat down.
As soon as the girl was assured of this, she came from behind the cask.
But God helped her, so that she passed safely over them, and then she and the old woman went upstairs, opened the door, and hastened as fast as they could from the murderers' den.
They found the ashes scattered by the wind, but the peas and lentils had sprouted, and grown sufficiently above the ground, to guide them in the moonlight along the path.
All night long they walked, and it was morning before they reached the mill.
Then the girl told her father all that had happened.
The day came that had been fixed for the marriage.
The bridegroom arrived and also a large company of guests, for the miller had taken care to invite all his friends and relations.
'And you, my love,' said the bridegroom, turning to her, 'is there no tale you know?
Tell us something.
'I will tell you a dream, then,' said the bride.
'I went alone through a.
forest and came at last to a house; not a soul could I find within, but a bird that was hanging in a cage on the wall cried: 'Turn back, turn back, young maiden fair, Linger not in this murderers' lair.
and again a second time it said these words.
'My darling, this is only a dream.
'I went on through the house from room to room, but they were all empty, and everything was so grim and mysterious.
At last I went down to the cellar, and there sat a very, very old woman, who could not keep her head still.
"'.
'My darling, this is only a dream.
They gave her three kinds of wine to drink, white, red, and yellow, and with that she died.
'My darling, this is only a dream.
'Then they tore off her dainty clothing, and cut her beautiful body into pieces and sprinkled salt upon it.
'My darling, this is only a dream.
'And one of the robbers saw that there was a gold ring still left on her finger, and as it was difficult to draw off, he took a hatchet and cut off her finger; but the finger sprang into the air and fell behind the great cask into my lap.
' And.
with these words the bride drew forth the finger and shewed it to the assembled guests.
The bridegroom, who during this recital had grown deadly pale, up and tried to escape, but the guests seized him and held him fast.
They delivered him up to justice, and he and all his murderous band were condemned to death for their wicked deeds.
TOM THUMB A poor woodman sat in his cottage one night, smoking his pipe by the fireside, while his wife sat by his side spinning.
'How lonely it is,.
wife,' said he, as he puffed out a long curl of smoke, 'for you and me to sit here by ourselves, without any children to play about and amuse us while other people seem so happy and merry with their children!
'What you say is very true,' said the wife, sighing, and turning round her wheel; 'how happy should I be if I had but one child!
If it were ever so small--nay, if it were no bigger than my thumb--I should be very happy, and love it dearly.
pass that this good woman's wish was fulfilled, just in the very way she had wished it; for, not long afterwards, she had a little boy, who was quite healthy and strong, but was not much bigger than my thumb.
So they said, 'Well, we cannot say we have not got what we wished for, and, little as he is, we will love him dearly.
Thumb.
They gave him plenty of food, yet for all they could do he never grew bigger, but kept just the same size as he had been when he was born.
Still, his eyes were sharp and sparkling, and he soon showed himself to be a clever little fellow, who always knew well what he was about.
' 'Oh, father,' cried Tom, 'I will take care of that;.
the cart shall be in the wood by the time you want it.
' Then the woodman.
laughed, and said, 'How can that be?
you cannot reach up to the horse's?
bridle.
' 'Never mind that, father,' said Tom; 'if my mother will only.
harness the horse, I will get into his ear and tell him which way to go.
' 'Well,' said the father, 'we will try for once.
When the time came the mother harnessed the horse to the cart, and put Tom into his ear; and as he sat there the little man told the beast how to go, crying out, 'Go on!
' as he wanted: and thus the horse!
went on just as well as if the woodman had driven it himself into the wood.
'What an odd.
thing that is!
' said one: 'there is a cart going along, and I hear a!
carter talking to the horse, but yet I can see no one.
' 'That is queer,.
' So they went on into the wood, till at last they came to the.
place where the woodman was.
Then Tom Thumb, seeing his father, cried out, 'See, father, here I am with the cart, all right and safe!
now take!
me down!
' So his father took hold of the horse with one hand, and with!
At last one took the other aside, and said, 'That little urchin will make our fortune, if we can get him, and carry him about from town to town as a show; we must buy him.
' So they went up to.
the woodman, and asked him what he would take for the little man.
'He.
him at all,' said the father; 'my own flesh and blood is dearer to me than all the silver and gold in the world.
bargain they wanted to make, crept up his father's coat to his shoulder and whispered in his ear, 'Take the money, father, and let them have me; I'll soon come back to you.
So the woodman at last said he would sell Tom to the strangers for a large piece of gold, and they paid the price.
'Where would you like to.
sit?' said one of them.
'Oh, put me on the rim of your hat; that will be.
' So they did as he wished; and when Tom had taken leave of his.
father they took him away with them.
They journeyed on till it began to be dusky, and then the little man said, 'Let me get down, I'm tired.
' So the man took off his hat, and.
But Tom ran about amongst the furrows, and at last slipped into an old mouse-hole.
'Good night, my masters!' said he, 'I'm off! mind and.
look sharp after me the next time.
' Then they ran at once to the place,.
When Tom found they were gone, he came out of his hiding-place.
'What.
dangerous walking it is,' said he, 'in this ploughed field!
If I were to fall from one of these great clods, I should undoubtedly break my neck.
'This is.
lucky,' said he, 'I can sleep here very well'; and in he crept.
Just as he was falling asleep, he heard two men passing by, chatting together; and one said to the other, 'How can we rob that rich parson's house of his silver and gold?' 'I'll tell you!' cried Tom.
'What noise.
was that?' said the thief, frightened; 'I'm sure I heard someone speak.
They stood still listening, and Tom said, 'Take me with you, and I'll soon show you how to get the parson's money.
' 'But where are you?' said.
they.
'Look about on the ground,' answered he, 'and listen where the.
' At last the thieves found him out, and lifted him.
up in their hands.
'You little urchin!' they said, 'what can you do for.
us?
' 'Why, I can get between the iron window-bars of the parson's house,?
and throw you out whatever you want.
thieves; 'come along, we shall see what you can do.
When they came to the parson's house, Tom slipped through the window-bars into the room, and then called out as loud as he could bawl, 'Will you have all that is here?
' At this the thieves were frightened,?
Speak low, that you may not awaken anybody.
Shall I throw it all out?
' Now the cook lay in?
Meantime the thieves were frightened, and ran off a little way; but at last they plucked up their hearts, and said, 'The little urchin is only trying to make fools of us.
' So they came back and.
whispered softly to him, saying, 'Now let us have no more of your roguish jokes; but throw us out some of the money.
' Then Tom called out.
as loud as he could, 'Very well! hold your hands! here it comes.
By the time she came back, Tom had slipped off into the barn; and when she had looked about and searched every hole and corner, and found nobody, she went to bed, thinking she must have been dreaming with her eyes open.
The little man crawled about in the hay-loft, and at last found a snug place to finish his night's rest in; so he laid himself down, meaning to sleep till daylight, and then find his way home to his father and mother.
But alas!
how woefully he was undone!
what crosses and sorrows!
happen to us all in this world!
The cook got up early, before daybreak, to feed the cows; and going straight to the hay-loft, carried away a large bundle of hay, with the little man in the middle of it, fast asleep.
He still, however, slept on, and did not awake till he found himself in the mouth of the cow; for the cook had put the hay into the cow's rick, and the cow had taken Tom up in a mouthful of it.
lack-a-day!
' said he, 'how came I to tumble into the mill?' But he soon!
'It is rather dark,' said.
he; 'they forgot to build windows in this room to let the sun in; a candle would be no bad thing.
Though he made the best of his bad luck, he did not like his quarters at all; and the worst of it was, that more and more hay was always coming down, and the space left for him became smaller and smaller.
At last he cried out as loud as he could, 'Don't bring me any more hay!
Don't bring me any more hay!
The maid happened to be just then milking the cow; and hearing someone speak, but seeing nobody, and yet being quite sure it was the same voice that she had heard in the night, she was so frightened that she fell off her stool, and overset the milk-pail.
As soon as she could pick herself up out of the dirt, she ran off as fast as she could to her master the parson, and said, 'Sir, sir, the cow is talking!
' But the parson!
said, 'Woman, thou art surely mad!
' However, he went with her into the!
cow-house, to try and see what was the matter.
Scarcely had they set foot on the threshold, when Tom called out, 'Don't bring me any more hay!
thinking the cow was surely bewitched, told his man to kill her on the spot.
So the cow was killed, and cut up; and the stomach, in which Tom lay, was thrown out upon a dunghill.
Tom, however, was still not disheartened; and thinking the wolf would not dislike having some chat with him as he was going along, he called out, 'My good friend, I can show you a famous treat.
said the wolf.
'In such and such a house,' said Tom, describing his own.
father's house.
then into the pantry, and there you will find cakes, ham, beef, cold chicken, roast pig, apple-dumplings, and everything that your heart can wish.
The wolf did not want to be asked twice; so that very night he went to the house and crawled through the drain into the kitchen, and then into the pantry, and ate and drank there to his heart's content.
As soon as he had had enough he wanted to get away; but he had eaten so much that he could not go out by the same way he came in.
This was just what Tom had reckoned upon; and now he began to set up a great shout, making all the noise he could.
'Will you be easy?' said the.
wolf; 'you'll awaken everybody in the house if you make such a clatter.
'What's that to me?
' said the little man; 'you have had your frolic, now?
I've a mind to be merry myself'; and he began, singing and shouting as loud as he could.
The woodman and his wife, being awakened by the noise, peeped through a crack in the door; but when they saw a wolf was there, you may well suppose that they were sadly frightened; and the woodman ran for his axe, and gave his wife a scythe.
'Do you stay behind,' said the woodman,.
'and when I have knocked him on the head you must rip him up with the scythe.
' Tom heard all this, and cried out, 'Father, father!.
I am here, the wolf has swallowed me.
' And his father said, 'Heaven be praised! we.
Then he aimed a great blow, and struck the wolf on the head, and killed him on the spot!
dead they cut open his body, and set Tommy free.
'Ah!' said the father,.
' 'Yes, father,' answered he; 'I have!
travelled all over the world, I think, in one way or other, since we parted; and now I am very glad to come home and get fresh air again.
'I have been in a.
mouse-hole--and in a snail-shell--and down a cow's throat--and in the wolf's belly; and yet here I am again, safe and sound.
'Well,' said they, 'you are come back, and we will not sell you again for all the riches in the world.
Then they hugged and kissed their dear little son, and gave him plenty to eat and drink, for he was very hungry; and then they fetched new clothes for him, for his old ones had been quite spoiled on his journey.
RUMPELSTILTSKIN By the side of a wood, in a country a long way off, ran a fine stream of water; and upon the stream there stood a mill.
The miller's house was close by, and the miller, you must know, had a very beautiful daughter.
She was, moreover, very shrewd and clever; and the miller was so proud of her, that he one day told the king of the land, who used to come and hunt in the wood, that his daughter could spin gold out of straw.
Then he led her to a chamber in his palace where there was a great heap of straw, and gave her a spinning-wheel, and said, 'All this must be spun into gold before morning, as you love your life.
' It was in vain.
that the poor maiden said that it was only a silly boast of her father, for that she could do no such thing as spin straw into gold: the chamber door was locked, and she was left alone.
She sat down in one corner of the room, and began to bewail her hard fate; when on a sudden the door opened, and a droll-looking little man hobbled in, and said, 'Good morrow to you, my good lass; what are you weeping for?' 'Alas!
' said she, 'I must spin this straw into gold, and!
I know not how.
' 'What will you give me,' said the hobgoblin, 'to do it.
And round about the wheel went merrily; the work was quickly done, and the straw was all spun into gold.
' 'The ring on my finger,'?
said she.
So her little friend took the ring, and began to work at the wheel again, and whistled and sang: 'Round about, round about, Lo and behold!
till, long before morning, all was done again.
The king was greatly delighted to see all this glittering treasure; but still he had not enough: so he took the miller's daughter to a yet larger heap, and said, 'All this must be spun tonight; and if it is, you shall be my queen.
' As soon as she was alone that dwarf came in, and.
said, 'What will you give me to spin gold for you this third time?
'I have nothing left,' said she.
the little man, 'the first little child that you may have when you are queen.
' 'That may never be,' thought the miller's daughter: and as she.
knew no other way to get her task done, she said she would do what he asked.
Round went the wheel again to the old song, and the manikin once more spun the heap into gold.
The king came in the morning, and, finding all he wanted, was forced to keep his word; so he married the miller's daughter, and she really became queen.
At the birth of her first little child she was very glad, and forgot the dwarf, and what she had said.
But one day he came into her room, where she was sitting playing with her baby, and put her in mind of it.
Then she grieved sorely at her misfortune, and said she would give him all the wealth of the kingdom if he would let her off, but in vain; till at last her tears softened him, and he said, 'I will give you three days' grace, and if during that time you tell me my name, you shall keep your child.
The next day the little man came, and she began with TIMOTHY, ICHABOD, BENJAMIN, JEREMIAH, and all the names she could remember; but to all and each of them he said, 'Madam, that is not my name.
The second day she began with all the comical names she could hear of, BANDY-LEGS, HUNCHBACK, CROOK-SHANKS, and so on; but the little gentleman still said to every one of them, 'Madam, that is not my name.
Today I'll brew, tomorrow bake; Merrily I'll dance and sing, For next day will a stranger bring.
Little does my lady dream Rumpelstiltskin is my name!
"!
When the queen heard this she jumped for joy, and as soon as her little friend came she sat down upon her throne, and called all her court round to enjoy the fun; and the nurse stood by her side with the baby in her arms, as if it was quite ready to be given up.
'Is it JEMMY?' 'It is not.
' 'Can your name be RUMPELSTILTSKIN?' said the.
lady slyly.
'Some witch told you that!--some witch told you that!' cried.
the little man, and dashed his right foot in a rage so deep into the floor, that he was forced to lay hold of it with both hands to pull it out.
Then he made the best of his way off, while the nurse laughed and the baby crowed; and all the court jeered at him for having had so much trouble for nothing, and said, 'We wish you a very good morning, and a merry feast, Mr RUMPLESTILTSKIN!
CLEVER GRETEL There was once a cook named Gretel, who wore shoes with red heels, and when she walked out with them on, she turned herself this way and that, was quite happy and thought: 'You certainly are a pretty girl!
It came to pass that the master one day said to her: 'Gretel, there is a guest coming this evening; prepare me two fowls very daintily.
' 'I will.
see to it, master,' answered Gretel.
She killed two fowls, scalded them, plucked them, put them on the spit, and towards evening set them before the fire, that they might roast.
The fowls began to turn brown, and were nearly ready, but the guest had not yet arrived.
' The master said: 'I will run.
myself, and fetch the guest.
Gretel laid the spit with the fowls on one side, and thought: 'Standing so long by the fire there, makes one sweat and thirsty; who knows when they will come?
Meanwhile, I will run into the cellar, and take a drink.
' She ran down, set a jug, said: 'God bless it for you, Gretel,'.
But as the roast meat smelt so good, Gretel thought: 'Something might be wrong, it ought to be tasted!
She touched it with her finger, and said: 'Ah!
how good fowls are!
It certainly is a sin and a shame that they are not eaten at the right time!
' She ran to the window, to see if the master was not coming with!
his guest, but she saw no one, and went back to the fowls and thought: 'One of the wings is burning!
I had better take it off and eat it.
So she cut it off, ate it, and enjoyed it, and when she had done, she thought: 'The other must go down too, or else master will observe that something is missing.
looked for her master, and did not see him.
They are perhaps not coming at all, and have turned in somewhere.
' Then she said: 'Well, Gretel, enjoy yourself, one fowl has.
been cut into, take another drink, and eat it up entirely; when it is eaten you will have some peace, why should God's good gifts be spoilt?
So she ran into the cellar again, took an enormous drink and ate up the one chicken in great glee.
When one of the chickens was swallowed down, and still her master did not come, Gretel looked at the other and said: 'What one is, the other should be likewise, the two go together; what's right for the one is right for the other; I think if I were to take another draught it would do me no harm.
' So she took another hearty.
' 'Yes, sir, I will!
Meantime the master looked to see that the table was properly laid, and took the great knife, wherewith he was going to carve the chickens, and sharpened it on the steps.
Presently the guest came, and knocked politely and courteously at the house-door.
Gretel ran, and looked to see who was there, and when she saw the guest, she put her finger to her lips and said: 'Hush!
hush!
go away as quickly!
as you can, if my master catches you it will be the worse for you; he certainly did ask you to supper, but his intention is to cut off your two ears.
Just listen how he is sharpening the knife for it!
' The guest!
' 'Why, Gretel?!
What do you mean by that?
' 'Yes,' said she, 'he has taken the chickens which I was just?
going to serve up, off the dish, and has run away with them!
' 'That's a!
nice trick!' said her master, and lamented the fine chickens.
'If he had.
but left me one, so that something remained for me to eat.
' He called to.
Then he ran after him with the knife still in his hand, crying: 'Just one, just one,' meaning that the guest should leave him just one chicken, and not take both.
THE OLD MAN AND HIS GRANDSON There was once a very old man, whose eyes had become dim, his ears dull of hearing, his knees trembled, and when he sat at table he could hardly hold the spoon, and spilt the broth upon the table-cloth or let it run out of his mouth.
His son and his son's wife were disgusted at this, so the old grandfather at last had to sit in the corner behind the stove, and they gave him his food in an earthenware bowl, and not even enough of it.
And he used to look towards the table with his eyes full of tears.
Once, too, his trembling hands could not hold the bowl, and it fell to the ground and broke.
The young wife scolded him, but he said nothing and only sighed.
Then they brought him a wooden bowl for a few half-pence, out of which he had to eat.
They were once sitting thus when the little grandson of four years old began to gather together some bits of wood upon the ground.
'What are.
you doing there?' asked the father.
'I am making a little trough,'.
answered the child, 'for father and mother to eat out of when I am big.
The man and his wife looked at each other for a while, and presently began to cry.
Then they took the old grandfather to the table, and henceforth always let him eat with them, and likewise said nothing if he did spill a little of anything.
THE LITTLE PEASANT There was a certain village wherein no one lived but really rich peasants, and just one poor one, whom they called the little peasant.
He had not even so much as a cow, and still less money to buy one, and yet he and his wife did so wish to have one.
One day he said to her: 'Listen, I have a good idea, there is our gossip the carpenter, he shall make us a wooden calf, and paint it brown, so that it looks like any other, and in time it will certainly get big and be a cow.
' the woman.
also liked the idea, and their gossip the carpenter cut and planed the calf, and painted it as it ought to be, and made it with its head hanging down as if it were eating.
' The cow-herd said: 'All.
right,' and took it in his arms and carried it to the pasture, and set it among the grass.
The little calf always remained standing like one which was eating, and the cow-herd said: 'It will soon run by itself, just look how it eats already!
' At night when he was going to drive the!
herd home again, he said to the calf: 'If you can stand there and eat your fill, you can also go on your four legs; I don't care to drag you home again in my arms.
' But the little peasant stood at his door, and.
waited for his little calf, and when the cow-herd drove the cows through the village, and the calf was missing, he inquired where it was.
It would not stop and come with us.
' But the little peasant said: 'Oh, but I must.
have my beast back again.
' Then they went back to the meadow together,.
but someone had stolen the calf, and it was gone.
The cow-herd said: 'It must have run away.
' The peasant, however, said: 'Don't tell me.
that,' and led the cow-herd before the mayor, who for his carelessness condemned him to give the peasant a cow for the calf which had run away.
And now the little peasant and his wife had the cow for which they had so long wished, and they were heartily glad, but they had no food for it, and could give it nothing to eat, so it soon had to be killed.
They salted the flesh, and the peasant went into the town and wanted to sell the skin there, so that he might buy a new calf with the proceeds.
But as the weather grew so bad and there was a storm of rain and wind, he could go no farther, and turned back to the mill and begged for shelter.
The peasant ate it, and lay down with his skin beside him, and the woman thought: 'He is tired and has gone to sleep.
' In the meantime came the.
parson; the miller's wife received him well, and said: 'My husband is out, so we will have a feast.
' The peasant listened, and when he heard.
them talk about feasting he was vexed that he had been forced to make shift with a slice of bread and cheese.
Then the woman served up four different things, roast meat, salad, cakes, and wine.
The woman said: 'Oh, heavens!
It is my husband!
' she quickly!
hid the roast meat inside the tiled stove, the wine under the pillow, the salad on the bed, the cakes under it, and the parson in the closet on the porch.
Then she opened the door for her husband, and said: 'Thank heaven, you are back again!
There is such a storm, it looks as if the world were coming to an end.
' The miller saw the peasant lying on the.
straw, and asked, 'What is that fellow doing there?
' 'Ah,' said the?
wife, 'the poor knave came in the storm and rain, and begged for shelter, so I gave him a bit of bread and cheese, and showed him where the straw was.
me something to eat.
' The woman said: 'But I have nothing but bread and.
cheese.
' The peasant did not require to.
be invited twice, but got up and ate.
After this the miller saw the skin in which the raven was, lying on the ground, and asked: 'What have you there?' The peasant answered: 'I have a soothsayer inside it.
' 'Can.
he foretell anything to me?' said the miller.
'Why not?' answered.
the peasant: 'but he only says four things, and the fifth he keeps to himself.
' The miller was curious, and said: 'Let him foretell something.
for once.
' Then the peasant pinched the raven's head, so that he croaked.
and made a noise like krr, krr.
The miller said: 'What did he say?
peasant answered: 'In the first place, he says that there is some wine hidden under the pillow.
' 'Bless me!' cried the miller, and went there.
and found the wine.
'Now go on,' said he.
The peasant made the raven croak again, and said: 'In the second place, he says that there is some roast meat in the tiled stove.
' 'Upon my word!' cried the miller, and.
went thither, and found the roast meat.
The peasant made the raven prophesy still more, and said: 'Thirdly, he says that there is some salad on the bed.
went there and found the salad.
' 'That would be a fine thing!' cried the.
miller, and looked there, and found the cakes.
And now the two sat down to the table together, but the miller's wife was frightened to death, and went to bed and took all the keys with her.
the miller was to give for the fifth prophecy, until they agreed on three hundred talers.
The miller asked: 'What did he say?
peasant replied: 'He says that the Devil is hiding outside there in the closet on the porch.
' The miller said: 'The Devil must go out,' and.
opened the house-door; then the woman was forced to give up the keys, and the peasant unlocked the closet.
The parson ran out as fast as he could, and the miller said: 'It was true; I saw the black rascal with my own eyes.
' The peasant, however, made off next morning by daybreak with.
the three hundred talers.
' Then the small peasant was brought before the mayor, and.
bidden to say from whence his wealth came.
that, they too wished to enjoy this great profit, and ran home, killed all their cows, and stripped off their skins in order to sell them in the town to the greatest advantage.
' When she came to the merchant in the town, he.
Then the peasants were vexed that the small peasant should have thus outwitted them, wanted to take vengeance on him, and accused him of this treachery before the mayor.
The innocent little peasant was unanimously sentenced to death, and was to be rolled into the water, in a barrel pierced full of holes.
The others were all obliged to retire to a distance, and when the peasant looked at the priest, he recognized the man who had been with the miller's wife.
He said to him: 'I set you free from the closet, set me free from the barrel.
' At this same moment up.
came, with a flock of sheep, the very shepherd whom the peasant knew had long been wishing to be mayor, so he cried with all his might: 'No, I will not do it; if the whole world insists on it, I will not do it!
' The!
shepherd hearing that, came up to him, and asked: 'What are you about?
me mayor, if I will but put myself in the barrel, but I will not do it.
The shepherd said: 'If nothing more than that is needful in order to be mayor, I would get into the barrel at once.
' The peasant said: 'If you.
' The shepherd was willing, and got in,.
and the peasant shut the top down on him; then he took the shepherd's flock for himself, and drove it away.
The parson went to the crowd, and declared that the mass had been said.
Then they came and rolled the barrel towards the water.
When the barrel began to roll, the shepherd cried: 'I am quite willing to be mayor.
' They believed no otherwise than.
that it was the peasant who was saying this, and answered: 'That is what we intend, but first you shall look about you a little down below there,' and they rolled the barrel down into the water.
After that the peasants went home, and as they were entering the village, the small peasant also came quietly in, driving a flock of sheep and looking quite contented.
Then the peasants were astonished, and said: 'Peasant, from whence do you come?
Have you come out of the water?
' 'Yes, truly,' replied the peasant, 'I sank deep, deep down,?
until at last I got to the bottom; I pushed the bottom out of the barrel, and crept out, and there were pretty meadows on which a number of lambs were feeding, and from thence I brought this flock away with me.
' Said the peasants: 'Are there any more there?' 'Oh, yes,' said he,.
'more than I could want.
' Then the peasants made up their minds that.
then there were some of the small fleecy clouds in the blue sky, which are called little lambs, and they were reflected in the water, whereupon the peasants cried: 'We already see the sheep down below!
' The mayor!
pressed forward and said: 'I will go down first, and look about me, and if things promise well I'll call you.
the water; it sounded as if he were calling them, and the whole crowd plunged in after him as one man.
Then the entire village was dead, and the small peasant, as sole heir, became a rich man.
FREDERICK AND CATHERINE There was once a man called Frederick: he had a wife whose name was Catherine, and they had not long been married.
One day Frederick said.
I am going to work in the fields; when I come back I shall be hungry so let me have something nice cooked, and a good draught of ale.
'Very well,' said she, 'it shall all be ready.
' When dinner-time drew.
nigh, Catherine took a nice steak, which was all the meat she had, and put it on the fire to fry.
The steak soon began to look brown, and to crackle in the pan; and Catherine stood by with a fork and turned it: then she said to herself, 'The steak is almost ready, I may as well go to the cellar for the ale.
' So she left the pan on the fire and took a.
large jug and went into the cellar and tapped the ale cask.
The beer ran into the jug and Catherine stood looking on.
' So up she ran from the cellar; and sure enough.
the rascally cur had got the steak in his mouth, and was making off with it.
Away ran Catherine, and away ran the dog across the field: but he ran faster than she, and stuck close to the steak.
'It's all gone, and "what.
can't be cured must be endured",' said Catherine.
So she turned round; and as she had run a good way and was tired, she walked home leisurely to cool herself.
When she got to the cellar stairs she saw what had happened.
'My stars!' said she, 'what shall I do to keep Frederick from.
seeing all this slopping about?
remembered that there was a sack of fine meal bought at the last fair, and that if she sprinkled this over the floor it would suck up the ale nicely.
'What a lucky thing,' said she, 'that we kept that meal! we have.
now a good use for it.
' So away she went for it: but she managed to set.
it down just upon the great jug full of beer, and upset it; and thus all the ale that had been saved was set swimming on the floor also.
'Ah!.
well,' said she, 'when one goes another may as well follow.
strewed the meal all about the cellar, and was quite pleased with her cleverness, and said, 'How very neat and clean it looks!
At noon Frederick came home.
'Now, wife,' cried he, 'what have you for.
dinner?' 'O Frederick!
' answered she, 'I was cooking you a steak; but!
while I went down to draw the ale, the dog ran away with it; and while I ran after him, the ale ran out; and when I went to dry up the ale with the sack of meal that we got at the fair, I upset the jug: but the cellar is now quite dry, and looks so clean!
'how could you do all this?
' Why did you leave the steak to fry, and the?
ale to run, and then spoil all the meal?
' 'Why, Frederick,' said she, 'I?
did not know I was doing wrong; you should have told me before.
The husband thought to himself, 'If my wife manages matters thus, I must look sharp myself.
' Now he had a good deal of gold in the house: so he.
I shall put them into a box and bury them in the garden; but take care that you never go near or meddle with them.
' 'No, Frederick,' said she, 'that.
' As soon as he was gone, there came by some pedlars with.
'Oh dear me, I should like to buy very much, but I have no money: if you had any use for yellow buttons, I might deal with you.
' 'Yellow.
buttons!' said they: 'let us have a look at them.
' 'Go into the garden.
and dig where I tell you, and you will find the yellow buttons: I dare not go myself.
' So the rogues went: and when they found what these.
yellow buttons were, they took them all away, and left her plenty of plates and dishes.
Then she set them all about the house for a show: and when Frederick came back, he cried out, 'Kate, what have you been doing?
' 'See,' said she, 'I have bought all these with your yellow?
those yellow buttons were all my money: how came you!
to do such a thing?
' 'Why,' answered she, 'I did not know there was any?
harm in it; you should have told me.
Catherine stood musing for a while, and at last said to her husband, 'Hark ye, Frederick, we will soon get the gold back: let us run after the thieves.
' 'Well, we will try,' answered he; 'but take some butter.
'Very well,' said she; and they set out: and as Frederick walked the fastest, he left his wife some way behind.
'It does not matter,' thought.
Presently she came to the top of a hill, down the side of which there was a road so narrow that the cart wheels always chafed the trees on each side as they passed.
'Ah, see now,' said she, 'how they have.
bruised and wounded those poor trees; they will never get well.
' So she.
took pity on them, and made use of the butter to grease them all, so that the wheels might not hurt them so much.
While she was doing this kind office one of her cheeses fell out of the basket, and rolled down the hill.
Catherine looked, but could not see where it had gone; so she said, 'Well, I suppose the other will go the same way and find you; he has younger legs than I have.
' Then she rolled the other cheese after.
it; and away it went, nobody knows where, down the hill.
But she said she supposed that they knew the road, and would follow her, and she could not stay there all day waiting for them.
At last she overtook Frederick, who desired her to give him something to eat.
Then she gave him the dry bread.
'Where are the butter and cheese?'.
trees that the wheels chafed so: and one of the cheeses ran away so I sent the other after it to find it, and I suppose they are both on the road together somewhere.
' 'What a goose you are to do such silly.
things!' said the husband.
'How can you say so?' said she; 'I am sure.
you never told me not.
They ate the dry bread together; and Frederick said, 'Kate, I hope you locked the door safe when you came away.
' 'No,' answered she, 'you did.
not tell me.
' 'Then go home, and do it now before we go any farther,'.
said Frederick, 'and bring with you something to eat.
Catherine did as he told her, and thought to herself by the way, 'Frederick wants something to eat; but I don't think he is very fond of butter and cheese: I'll bring him a bag of fine nuts, and the vinegar, for I have often seen him take some.
' So she took.
her time by the way; and when she overtook her husband she cried out, 'There, Frederick, there is the door itself, you may watch it as carefully as you please.
' 'Alas! alas!' said he, 'what a clever wife I.
have!
I sent you to make the house fast, and you take the door away, so that everybody may go in and out as they please--however, as you have brought the door, you shall carry it about with you for your pains.
'Very well,' answered she, 'I'll carry the door; but I'll not carry the nuts and vinegar bottle also--that would be too much of a load; so if you please, I'll fasten them to the door.
Scarcely were they up, than who should come by but the very rogues they were looking for.
They were in truth great rascals, and belonged to that class of people who find things before they are lost; they were tired; so they sat down and made a fire under the very tree where Frederick and Catherine were.
Frederick slipped down on the other side, and picked up some stones.
Catherine, who had the door on her shoulder, began to be very tired; but she thought it was the nuts upon it that were so heavy: so she said softly, 'Frederick, I must let the nuts go.
' 'No,' answered he, 'not.
now, they will discover us.
' 'I can't help that: they must go.
' 'Well,.
then, make haste and throw them down, if you will.
the nuts down among the boughs and one of the thieves cried, 'Bless me, it is hailing.
' 'Pray.
don't,' answered he, 'it will discover us.
' 'I can't help that,' said.
she, 'go it must.
said, 'What a heavy dew there is!
' But he begged and prayed her not to do so, for he.
was sure it would betray them.
went the door with such a clatter upon the thieves, that they cried out 'Murder!
' and not knowing what was coming, ran away as fast as they!
could, and left all the gold.
So when Frederick and Catherine came down, there they found all their money safe and sound.
SWEETHEART ROLAND There was once upon a time a woman who was a real witch and had two daughters, one ugly and wicked, and this one she loved because she was her own daughter, and one beautiful and good, and this one she hated, because she was her stepdaughter.
The stepdaughter once had a pretty apron, which the other fancied so much that she became envious, and told her mother that she must and would have that apron.
'Be quiet, my.
child,' said the old woman, 'and you shall have it.
Only be careful that you are at the far side of the bed, and push her well to the front.
' It would have been all over with the poor.
All day long she dared not go out of doors, and when bedtime had come, the witch's daughter got into bed first, so as to lie at the far side, but when she was asleep, the other pushed her gently to the front, and took for herself the place at the back, close by the wall.
In the night, the old woman came creeping in, she held an axe in her right hand, and felt with her left to see if anyone were lying at the outside, and then she grasped the axe with both hands, and cut her own child's head off.
When she had gone away, the girl got up and went to her sweetheart, who was called Roland, and knocked at his door.
When daylight comes, and she sees what she has done, we shall be lost.
' 'But,' said Roland,.
'I counsel you first to take away her magic wand, or we cannot escape if she pursues us.
' The maiden fetched the magic wand, and she took the.
Then she hurried away with her lover.
Then the witch cried: 'Where are you?
' 'Here, on the stairs, I am sweeping,' answered?
the first drop of blood.
The old woman went out, but saw no one on the stairs, and cried again: 'Where are you?
Then she cried again: 'Where are you?
here in the bed, I am sleeping,' cried the third drop of blood.
She went into the room to the bed.
What did she see there?
'That shall not help you,' cried she, 'even if you.
have got a long way off, you shall still not escape me.
many-league boots, in which she covered an hour's walk at every step, and it was not long before she overtook them.
The witch placed herself on the shore, threw breadcrumbs in, and went to endless trouble to entice the duck; but the duck did not let herself be enticed, and the old woman had to go home at night as she had come.
At this the girl and her sweetheart Roland resumed their natural shapes again, and they walked on the whole night until daybreak.
Then the maiden changed herself into a beautiful flower which stood in the midst of a briar hedge, and her sweetheart Roland into a fiddler.
' 'Oh, yes,' he replied, 'I will play to?
' As she was hastily creeping into the hedge and was.
As they were now set free, Roland said: 'Now I will go to my father and arrange for the wedding.
' 'Then in the meantime I will stay here and.
wait for you,' said the girl, 'and that no one may recognize me, I will change myself into a red stone landmark.
girl stood like a red landmark in the field and waited for her beloved.
But when Roland got home, he fell into the snares of another, who so fascinated him that he forgot the maiden.
The poor girl remained there a long time, but at length, as he did not return at all, she was sad, and changed herself into a flower, and thought: 'Someone will surely come this way, and trample me down.
It befell, however, that a shepherd kept his sheep in the field and saw the flower, and as it was so pretty, plucked it, took it with him, and laid it away in his chest.
When he arose in the morning, all the work was already done, the room was swept, the table and benches cleaned, the fire in the hearth was lighted, and the water was fetched, and at noon, when he came home, the table was laid, and a good dinner served.
He could not conceive how this came to pass, for he never saw a human being in his house, and no one could have concealed himself in it.
He was certainly pleased with this good attendance, but still at last he was so afraid that he went to a wise woman and asked for her advice.
The wise woman said: 'There is some enchantment behind it, listen very early some morning if anything is moving in the room, and if you see anything, no matter what it is, throw a white cloth over it, and then the magic will be stopped.
Instantly the transformation came to an end, and a beautiful girl stood before him, who admitted to him that she had been the flower, and that up to this time she had attended to his house-keeping.
Nevertheless, she promised not to go away, but to continue keeping house for the shepherd.
And now the time drew near when Roland's wedding was to be celebrated, and then, according to an old custom in the country, it was announced that all the girls were to be present at it, and sing in honour of the bridal pair.
When the faithful maiden heard of this, she grew so sad that she thought her heart would break, and she would not go thither, but the other girls came and took her.
When it came to her turn to sing, she stepped back, until at last she was the only one left, and then she could not refuse.
But when she began her song, and it reached Roland's ears, he sprang up and cried: 'I know the voice, that is the true bride, I will have no other!
' Everything he had forgotten, and which had!
Then the faithful maiden held her wedding with her sweetheart Roland, and grief came to an end and joy began.
SNOWDROP It was the middle of winter, when the broad flakes of snow were falling around, that the queen of a country many thousand miles off sat working at her window.
The frame of the window was made of fine black ebony, and as she sat looking out upon the snow, she pricked her finger, and three drops of blood fell upon it.
Then she gazed thoughtfully upon the red drops that sprinkled the white snow, and said, 'Would that my little daughter may be as white as that snow, as red as that blood, and as black as this ebony windowframe!
' And so the little girl really did grow!
up; her skin was as white as snow, her cheeks as rosy as the blood, and her hair as black as ebony; and she was called Snowdrop.
But this queen died; and the king soon married another wife, who became queen, and was very beautiful, but so vain that she could not bear to think that anyone could be handsomer than she was.
Of all the ladies in the land, Who is fairest, tell me, who?
And the glass had always answered: 'Thou, queen, art the fairest in all the land.
But Snowdrop grew more and more beautiful; and when she was seven years old she was as bright as the day, and fairer than the queen herself.
Then the glass one day answered the queen, when she went to look in it as usual: 'Thou, queen, art fair, and beauteous to see, But Snowdrop is lovelier far than thee!
When she heard this she turned pale with rage and envy, and called to one of her servants, and said, 'Take Snowdrop away into the wide wood, that I may never see her any more.
' Then the servant led her away; but.
his heart melted when Snowdrop begged him to spare her life, and he said, 'I will not hurt you, thou pretty child.
' So he left her by.
herself; and though he thought it most likely that the wild beasts would tear her in pieces, he felt as if a great weight were taken off his heart when he had made up his mind not to kill her but to leave her to her fate, with the chance of someone finding and saving her.
As she was very hungry, she picked a little piece of each loaf and drank a very little wine out of each glass; and after that she thought she would lie down and rest.
So she tried all the little beds; but one was too long, and another was too short, till at last the seventh suited her: and there she laid herself down and went to sleep.
By and by in came the masters of the cottage.
Now they were seven little dwarfs, that lived among the mountains, and dug and searched for gold.
They lighted up their seven lamps, and saw at once that all was not right.
The first said, 'Who has been sitting on my stool?
' The second,?
'Who has been eating off my plate?
bread?
' The fourth, 'Who has been meddling with my spoon?
' The fifth,?
'Who has been handling my fork?
' The sixth, 'Who has been cutting with?
my knife?
' The seventh, 'Who has been drinking my wine?
looked round and said, 'Who has been lying on my bed?
' And the rest came?
running to him, and everyone cried out that somebody had been upon his bed.
what a lovely child!
she is!
' And they were very glad to see her, and took care not to wake!
her; and the seventh dwarf slept an hour with each of the other dwarfs in turn, till the night was gone.
Then they went out all day long to their work, seeking for gold and silver in the mountains: but Snowdrop was left at home; and they warned her, and said, 'The queen will soon find out where you are, so take care and let no one in.
Of all the ladies in the land, Who is fairest, tell me, who?
And the glass answered: 'Thou, queen, art the fairest in all this land: But over the hills, in the greenwood shade, Where the seven dwarfs their dwelling have made, There Snowdrop is hiding her head; and she Is lovelier far, O queen! than thee.
And she could not bear to think that anyone lived who was more beautiful than she was; so she dressed herself up as an old pedlar, and went her way over the hills, to the place where the dwarfs dwelt.
Then she knocked at the door, and cried, 'Fine wares to sell!
' Snowdrop looked!
out at the window, and said, 'Good day, good woman!
sell?
' 'Good wares, fine wares,' said she; 'laces and bobbins of all?
colours.
' 'I will let the old lady in; she seems to be a very good.
sort of body,' thought Snowdrop, as she ran down and unbolted the door.
'Bless me!
' said the old woman, 'how badly your stays are laced!
Let me lace them up with one of my nice new laces.
' Snowdrop did not dream of.
any mischief; so she stood before the old woman; but she set to work so nimbly, and pulled the lace so tight, that Snowdrop's breath was stopped, and she fell down as if she were dead.
'There's an end to all.
thy beauty,' said the spiteful queen, and went away home.
In the evening the seven dwarfs came home; and I need not say how grieved they were to see their faithful Snowdrop stretched out upon the ground, as if she was quite dead.
However, they lifted her up, and when they found what ailed her, they cut the lace; and in a little time she began to breathe, and very soon came to life again.
Then they said, 'The old woman was the queen herself; take care another time, and let no one in when we are away.
When the queen got home, she went straight to her glass, and spoke to it as before; but to her great grief it still said: 'Thou, queen, art the fairest in all this land: But over the hills, in the greenwood shade, Where the seven dwarfs their dwelling have made, There Snowdrop is hiding her head; and she Is lovelier far, O queen! than thee.
Then the blood ran cold in her heart with spite and malice, to see that Snowdrop still lived; and she dressed herself up again, but in quite another dress from the one she wore before, and took with her a poisoned comb.
' Then the queen said, 'Only look at my beautiful combs!' and gave.
her the poisoned one.
And it looked so pretty, that she took it up and put it into her hair to try it; but the moment it touched her head, the poison was so powerful that she fell down senseless.
lie,' said the queen, and went her way.
And when they took it away she got well, and told them all that had passed; and they warned her once more not to open the door to anyone.
Meantime the queen went home to her glass, and shook with rage when she read the very same answer as before; and she said, 'Snowdrop shall die, if it cost me my life.
' So she went by herself into her chamber, and got.
ready a poisoned apple: the outside looked very rosy and tempting, but whoever tasted it was sure to die.
Then she dressed herself up as a peasant's wife, and travelled over the hills to the dwarfs' cottage, and knocked at the door; but Snowdrop put her head out of the window and said, 'I dare not let anyone in, for the dwarfs have told me not.
' 'Do.
' 'No,' said Snowdrop, 'I dare not take it.
'You silly girl!
' answered the other, 'what are you afraid of?!
Come!
do you eat one part, and I will eat the!
' Now the apple was so made up that one side was good, though the.
But she had scarcely put the piece into her mouth, when she fell down dead upon the ground.
'This time nothing will save.
thee,' said the queen; and she went home to her glass, and at last it said: 'Thou, queen, art the fairest of all the fair.
And then her wicked heart was glad, and as happy as such a heart could be.
When evening came, and the dwarfs had gone home, they found Snowdrop lying on the ground: no breath came from her lips, and they were afraid that she was quite dead.
They lifted her up, and combed her hair, and washed her face with wine and water; but all was in vain, for the little girl seemed quite dead.
' And they made a coffin of glass, so that they might.
still look at her, and wrote upon it in golden letters what her name was, and that she was a king's daughter.
And the coffin was set among the hills, and one of the dwarfs always sat by it and watched.
And thus Snowdrop lay for a long, long time, and still only looked as though she was asleep; for she was even now as white as snow, and as red as blood, and as black as ebony.
At last a prince came and called at the dwarfs' house; and he saw Snowdrop, and read what was written in golden letters.
Then he offered the dwarfs money, and prayed and besought them to let him take her away; but they said, 'We will not part with her for all the gold in the world.
gave him the coffin; but the moment he lifted it up to carry it home with him, the piece of apple fell from between her lips, and Snowdrop awoke, and said, 'Where am I?
' And the prince said, 'Thou art quite safe?
with me.
Then he told her all that had happened, and said, 'I love you far better than all the world; so come with me to my father's palace, and you shall be my wife.
' And Snowdrop consented, and went home with the prince;.
and everything was got ready with great pomp and splendour for their wedding.
To the feast was asked, among the rest, Snowdrop's old enemy the queen; and as she was dressing herself in fine rich clothes, she looked in the glass and said: 'Tell me, glass, tell me true!
Of all the ladies in the land, Who is fairest, tell me, who?
When she heard this she started with rage; but her envy and curiosity were so great, that she could not help setting out to see the bride.
And when she got there, and saw that it was no other than Snowdrop, who, as she thought, had been dead a long while, she choked with rage, and fell down and died: but Snowdrop and the prince lived and reigned happily over that land many, many years; and sometimes they went up into the mountains, and paid a visit to the little dwarfs, who had been so kind to Snowdrop in her time of need.
Every morning she went into the garden and prayed to God in heaven to bestow on her a son or a daughter.
Then an angel from heaven came to her and said: 'Be at rest, you shall have a son with the power of wishing, so that whatsoever in the world he wishes for, that shall he have.
Then came the old cook, who knew that the child had the power of wishing, and stole it away, and he took a hen, and cut it in pieces, and dropped some of its blood on the queen's apron and on her dress.
Then he carried the child away to a secret place, where a nurse was obliged to suckle it, and he ran to the king and accused the queen of having allowed her child to be taken from her by the wild beasts.
When the king saw the blood on her apron, he believed this, fell into such a passion that he ordered a high tower to be built, in which neither sun nor moon could be seen and had his wife put into it, and walled up.
Here she was to stay for seven years without meat or drink, and die of hunger.
But God sent two angels from heaven in the shape of white doves, which flew to her twice a day, and carried her food until the seven years were over.
The cook, however, thought to himself: 'If the child has the power of wishing, and I am here, he might very easily get me into trouble.
' So.
he left the palace and went to the boy, who was already big enough to speak, and said to him: 'Wish for a beautiful palace for yourself with a garden, and all else that pertains to it.
' Scarcely were the words out.
of the boy's mouth, when everything was there that he had wished for.
After a while the cook said to him: 'It is not well for you to be so alone, wish for a pretty girl as a companion.
' Then the king's son.
wished for one, and she immediately stood before him, and was more beautiful than any painter could have painted her.
So he went out and took the maiden aside, and said: 'Tonight when the boy is asleep, go to his bed and plunge this knife into his heart, and bring me his heart and tongue, and if you do not do it, you shall lose your life.
' Thereupon he went away, and when.
he returned next day she had not done it, and said: 'Why should I shed the blood of an innocent boy who has never harmed anyone?
' The cook once?
more said: 'If you do not do it, it shall cost you your own life.
he had gone away, she had a little hind brought to her, and ordered her to be killed, and took her heart and tongue, and laid them on a plate, and when she saw the old man coming, she said to the boy: 'Lie down in your bed, and draw the clothes over you.
' Then the wicked wretch came in.
and said: 'Where are the boy's heart and tongue?
' The girl reached the?
plate to him, but the king's son threw off the quilt, and said: 'You old sinner, why did you want to kill me?
Now will I pronounce thy sentence.
You shall become a black poodle and have a gold collar round your neck, and shall eat burning coals, till the flames burst forth from your throat.
' And when he had spoken these words, the old man was changed.
into a poodle dog, and had a gold collar round his neck, and the cooks were ordered to bring up some live coals, and these he ate, until the flames broke forth from his throat.
The king's son remained there a short while longer, and he thought of his mother, and wondered if she were still alive.
At length he said to the maiden: 'I will go home to my own country; if you will go with me, I will provide for you.
' 'Ah,'.
she replied, 'the way is so long, and what shall I do in a strange land where I am unknown?
' As she did not seem quite willing, and as they?
could not be parted from each other, he wished that she might be changed into a beautiful pink, and took her with him.
Then he went away to his own country, and the poodle had to run after him.
' She answered: 'I have just eaten, and am still?
satisfied,' for she thought the angels were there.
Said he: 'I am your dear son, whom the wild beasts were said to have torn from your arms; but I am alive still, and will soon set you free.
' Then he descended.
again, and went to his father, and caused himself to be announced as a strange huntsman, and asked if he could offer him service.
Then the huntsman promised to procure as much game for him as he could possibly use at the royal table.
So he summoned all the huntsmen together, and bade them go out into the forest with him.
And he went with them and made them form a great circle, open at one end where he stationed himself, and began to wish.
Two hundred deer and more came running inside the circle at once, and the huntsmen shot them.
Then they were all placed on sixty country carts, and driven home to the king, and for once he was able to deck his table with game, after having had none at all for years.
When they were all assembled together, he said to the huntsman: 'As you are so clever, you shall sit by me.
' He replied: 'Lord King, your majesty.
' But the king insisted on it,.
and said: 'You shall sit by me,' until he did it.
Whilst he was sitting there, he thought of his dearest mother, and wished that one of the king's principal servants would begin to speak of her, and would ask how it was faring with the queen in the tower, and if she were alive still, or had perished.
Hardly had he formed the wish than the marshal began, and said: 'Your majesty, we live joyously here, but how is the queen living in the tower?
Is she still alive, or has she died?
' But the king?
replied: 'She let my dear son be torn to pieces by wild beasts; I will not have her named.
' Then the huntsman arose and said: 'Gracious lord.
' Thereupon he took the dog with the golden collar, and said:.
'That is the wretch!
' and caused live coals to be brought, and these the!
dog was compelled to devour before the sight of all, until flames burst forth from its throat.
On this the huntsman asked the king if he would like to see the dog in his true shape, and wished him back into the form of the cook, in the which he stood immediately, with his white apron, and his knife by his side.
When the king saw him he fell into a passion, and ordered him to be cast into the deepest dungeon.
' The king replied: 'Yes, I would?
like to see her.
' The son said: 'Most gracious father, I will show her.
to you in the form of a beautiful flower,' and he thrust his hand into his pocket and brought forth the pink, and placed it on the royal table, and it was so beautiful that the king had never seen one to equal it.
Then the son said: 'Now will I show her to you in her own form,' and wished that she might become a maiden, and she stood there looking so beautiful that no painter could have made her look more so.
And the king sent two waiting-maids and two attendants into the tower, to fetch the queen and bring her to the royal table.
But when she was led in she ate nothing, and said: 'The gracious and merciful God who has supported me in the tower, will soon set me free.
' She lived three days.
The aged king ordered the cook to be torn in four pieces, but grief consumed the king's own heart, and he soon died.
His son married the beautiful maiden whom he had brought with him as a flower in his pocket, and whether they are still alive or not, is known to God.
CLEVER ELSIE There was once a man who had a daughter who was called Clever Elsie.
And when she had grown up her father said: 'We will get her married.
' 'Yes,'.
said the mother, 'if only someone would come who would have her.
' At.
length a man came from a distance and wooed her, who was called Hans; but he stipulated that Clever Elsie should be really smart.
'Oh,' said.
the father, 'she has plenty of good sense'; and the mother said: 'Oh, she can see the wind coming up the street, and hear the flies coughing.
'Well,' said Hans, 'if she is not really smart, I won't have her.
they were sitting at dinner and had eaten, the mother said: 'Elsie, go into the cellar and fetch some beer.
' Then Clever Elsie took the pitcher.
from the wall, went into the cellar, and tapped the lid briskly as she went, so that the time might not appear long.
When she was below she fetched herself a chair, and set it before the barrel so that she had no need to stoop, and did not hurt her back or do herself any unexpected injury.
sat and wept and screamed with all the strength of her body, over the misfortune which lay before her.
Those upstairs waited for the drink, but Clever Elsie still did not come.
Then the woman said to the servant: 'Just go down into the cellar and see where Elsie is.
' The maid went and.
found her sitting in front of the barrel, screaming loudly.
'Elsie why.
do you weep?' asked the maid.
'Ah,' she answered, 'have I not reason to.
weep?
If I get Hans, and we have a child, and he grows big, and has to draw beer here, the pick-axe will perhaps fall on his head, and kill him.
' Then said the maid: 'What a clever Elsie we have!' and sat down.
beside her and began loudly to weep over the misfortune.
After a while, as the maid did not come back, and those upstairs were thirsty for the beer, the man said to the boy: 'Just go down into the cellar and see where Elsie and the girl are.
' The boy went down, and there sat Clever.
Elsie and the girl both weeping together.
Then he asked: 'Why are you weeping?
' 'Ah,' said Elsie, 'have I not reason to weep?
' Then said the boy: 'What.
a clever Elsie we have!
howl loudly.
Upstairs they waited for the boy, but as he still did not return, the man said to the woman: 'Just go down into the cellar and see where Elsie is!
' The woman went down, and found all three in the midst!
of their lamentations, and inquired what was the cause; then Elsie told her also that her future child was to be killed by the pick-axe, when it grew big and had to draw beer, and the pick-axe fell down.
Then said the mother likewise: 'What a clever Elsie we have!
' and sat down and wept!
with them.
The man upstairs waited a short time, but as his wife did not come back and his thirst grew ever greater, he said: 'I must go into the cellar myself and see where Elsie is.
' But when he got into the cellar,.
and they were all sitting together crying, and he heard the reason, and that Elsie's child was the cause, and the Elsie might perhaps bring one into the world some day, and that he might be killed by the pick-axe, if he should happen to be sitting beneath it, drawing beer just at the very time when it fell down, he cried: 'Oh, what a clever Elsie!
' and sat!
When he got down, the five of them were sitting screaming and lamenting quite piteously, each out-doing the other.
'What misfortune has happened.
then?' asked he.
and have a child, and he is big, and we perhaps send him here to draw something to drink, then the pick-axe which has been left up there might dash his brains out if it were to fall down, so have we not reason to weep?
for my household, as you are such a clever Elsie, I will have you,' and seized her hand, took her upstairs with him, and married her.
After Hans had had her some time, he said: 'Wife, I am going out to work and earn some money for us; go into the field and cut the corn that we may have some bread.
' 'Yes, dear Hans, I will do that.
gone away, she cooked herself some good broth and took it into the field with her.
When she came to the field she said to herself: 'What shall I do; shall I cut first, or shall I eat first?
she drank her cup of broth and when she was fully satisfied, she once more said: 'What shall I do?
Shall I cut first, or shall I sleep first?
' Then she lay down among the corn and fell asleep.
Hans had been at home for a long time, but Elsie did not come; then said he: 'What a clever Elsie I have; she is so industrious that she does not even come home to eat.
' But when evening came and she still stayed away,.
Then Hans hastened home and brought a fowler's net with little bells and hung it round about her, and she still went on sleeping.
Then he ran home, shut the house-door, and sat down in his chair and worked.
Then she was alarmed, and became uncertain whether she really was Clever Elsie or not, and said: 'Is it I, or is it not I?
' But she knew not what answer?
' She ran to the door of her own house, but it was shut; then.
' 'Yes,'?
' Hereupon she was terrified, and said:.
'Ah, heavens!
Then it is not I,' and went to another door; but when the people heard the jingling of the bells they would not open it, and she could get in nowhere.
Then she ran out of the village, and no one has seen her since.
THE MISER IN THE BUSH A farmer had a faithful and diligent servant, who had worked hard for him three years, without having been paid any wages.
At last it came into the man's head that he would not go on thus without pay any longer; so he went to his master, and said, 'I have worked hard for you a long time, I will trust to you to give me what I deserve to have for my trouble.
simple-hearted; so he took out threepence, and gave him for every year's service a penny.
The poor fellow thought it was a great deal of money to have, and said to himself, 'Why should I work hard, and live here on bad fare any longer?
I can now travel into the wide world, and make myself merry.
' With that he put his money into his purse, and set out, roaming.
As he jogged along over the fields, singing and dancing, a little dwarf met him, and asked him what made him so merry.
me down-hearted?
should I care for?
I have saved up my three years' earnings and have it all safe in my pocket.
' 'How much may it come to?' said the little man.
'Full threepence,' replied the countryman.
'I wish you would give them.
to me,' said the other; 'I am very poor.
gave him all he had; and the little dwarf said in return, 'As you have such a kind honest heart, I will grant you three wishes--one for every penny; so choose whatever you like.
' Then the countryman rejoiced at.
his good luck, and said, 'I like many things better than money: first, I will have a bow that will bring down everything I shoot at; secondly, a fiddle that will set everyone dancing that hears me play upon it; and thirdly, I should like that everyone should grant what I ask.
' The dwarf.
said he should have his three wishes; so he gave him the bow and fiddle, and went his way.
He had not gone far before he met an old miser: close by them stood a tree, and on the topmost twig sat a thrush singing away most joyfully.
'Oh, what a pretty bird!' said the miser; 'I.
would give a great deal of money to have such a one.
' 'If that's all,'.
said the countryman, 'I will soon bring it down.
bow, and down fell the thrush into the bushes at the foot of the tree.
The miser crept into the bush to find it; but directly he had got into the middle, his companion took up his fiddle and played away, and the miser began to dance and spring about, capering higher and higher in the air.
The thorns soon began to tear his clothes till they all hung in rags about him, and he himself was all scratched and wounded, so that the blood ran down.
'Oh, for heaven's sake!' cried the miser, 'Master!.
master! pray let the fiddle alone.
What have I done to deserve this?
'Thou hast shaved many a poor soul close enough,' said the other; 'thou art only meeting thy reward': so he played up another tune.
Then the miser began to beg and promise, and offered money for his liberty; but he did not come up to the musician's price for some time, and he danced him along brisker and brisker, and the miser bid higher and higher, till at last he offered a round hundred of florins that he had in his purse, and had just gained by cheating some poor fellow.
When the countryman saw so much money, he said, 'I will agree to your proposal.
the purse, put up his fiddle, and travelled on very pleased with his bargain.
Meanwhile the miser crept out of the bush half-naked and in a piteous plight, and began to ponder how he should take his revenge, and serve his late companion some trick.
At last he went to the judge, and complained that a rascal had robbed him of his money, and beaten him into the bargain; and that the fellow who did it carried a bow at his back and a fiddle hung round his neck.
Then the judge sent out his officers to bring up the accused wherever they should find him; and he was soon caught and brought up to be tried.
The miser began to tell his tale, and said he had been robbed of his money.
' said the.
So away he was taken; but as he stood on the steps he said, 'My Lord Judge, grant me one last request.
'No,' said he, 'I do not ask my life; only to let me play upon.
my fiddle for the last time.
' The miser cried out, 'Oh, no! no! for.
heaven's sake don't listen to him!
' But the judge!
said, 'It is only this once, he will soon have done.
' The fact was, he.
could not refuse the request, on account of the dwarf's third gift.
' But.
At the second note the hangman let his prisoner go, and danced also, and by the time he had played the first bar of the tune, all were dancing together--judge, court, and miser, and all the people who had followed to look on.
At first the thing was merry and pleasant enough; but when it had gone on a while, and there seemed to be no end of playing or dancing, they began to cry out, and beg him to leave off; but he stopped not a whit the more for their entreaties, till the judge not only gave him his life, but promised to return him the hundred florins.
Then he called to the miser, and said, 'Tell us now, you vagabond, where you got that gold, or I shall play on for your amusement only,' 'I stole it,' said the miser in the presence of all the people; 'I acknowledge that I stole it, and that you earned it fairly.
' Then the countryman.
ASHPUTTEL The wife of a rich man fell sick; and when she felt that her end drew nigh, she called her only daughter to her bed-side, and said, 'Always be a good girl, and I will look down from heaven and watch over you.
' Soon.
afterwards she shut her eyes and died, and was buried in the garden; and the little girl went every day to her grave and wept, and was always good and kind to all about her.
And the snow fell and spread a beautiful white covering over the grave; but by the time the spring came, and the sun had melted it away again, her father had married another wife.
This new wife had two daughters of her own, that she brought home with her; they were fair in face but foul at heart, and it was now a sorry time for the poor little girl.
'What does the good-for-nothing want in the.
' said they; 'they who would eat bread should first earn it;?
away with the kitchen-maid!
' Then they took away her fine clothes, and!
gave her an old grey frock to put on, and laughed at her, and turned her into the kitchen.
There she was forced to do hard work; to rise early before daylight, to bring the water, to make the fire, to cook and to wash.
'Fine clothes,' said the.
first; 'Pearls and diamonds,' cried the second.
'Now, child,' said he.
father, that brushes against your hat when you turn your face to come homewards,' said she.
Then he bought for the first two the fine clothes and pearls and diamonds they had asked for: and on his way home, as he rode through a green copse, a hazel twig brushed against him, and almost pushed off his hat: so he broke it off and brought it away; and when he got home he gave it to his daughter.
Then she took it, and went to her mother's grave and planted it there; and cried so much that it was watered with her tears; and there it grew and became a fine tree.
Three times every day she went to it and cried; and soon a little bird came and built its nest upon the tree, and talked with her, and watched over her, and brought her whatever she wished for.
Now it happened that the king of that land held a feast, which was to last three days; and out of those who came to it his son was to choose a bride for himself.
Ashputtel's two sisters were asked to come; so they called her up, and said, 'Now, comb our hair, brush our shoes, and tie our sashes for us, for we are going to dance at the king's feast.
wear, no clothes at all, and who cannot even dance--you want to go to the ball?
And when she kept on begging, she said at last, to get rid of her, 'I will throw this dishful of peas into the ash-heap, and if in two hours' time you have picked them all out, you shall go to the feast too.
Then she threw the peas down among the ashes, but the little maiden ran out at the back door into the garden, and cried out: 'Hither, hither, through the sky, Turtle-doves and linnets, fly!
Blackbird, thrush, and chaffinch gay, Hither, hither, haste away!
--pick, pick, pick!
And the little doves stooped their heads down and set to work, pick, pick, pick; and then the others began to pick, pick, pick: and among them all they soon picked out all the good grain, and put it into a dish but left the ashes.
Long before the end of the hour the work was quite done, and all flew out again at the windows.
Then Ashputtel brought the dish to her mother, overjoyed at the thought that now she should go to the ball.
But the mother said, 'No, no!
you!
' And when.
Ashputtel begged very hard to go, she said, 'If you can in one hour's time pick two of those dishes of peas out of the ashes, you shall go too.
So she shook two dishes of peas into the ashes.
But the little maiden went out into the garden at the back of the house, and cried out as before: 'Hither, hither, through the sky, Turtle-doves and linnets, fly!
Blackbird, thrush, and chaffinch gay, Hither, hither, haste away!
--pick, pick, pick!
And they flew down into the ashes; and the little doves put their heads down and set to work, pick, pick, pick; and then the others began pick, pick, pick; and they put all the good grain into the dishes, and left all the ashes.
Before half an hour's time all was done, and out they flew again.
And then Ashputtel took the dishes to her mother, rejoicing to think that she should now go to the ball.
Now when all were gone, and nobody left at home, Ashputtel went sorrowfully and sat down under the hazel-tree, and cried out: 'Shake, shake, hazel-tree, Gold and silver over me!
Then her friend the bird flew out of the tree, and brought a gold and silver dress for her, and slippers of spangled silk; and she put them on, and followed her sisters to the feast.
But they did not know her, and thought it must be some strange princess, she looked so fine and beautiful in her rich clothes; and they never once thought of Ashputtel, taking it for granted that she was safe at home in the dirt.
But she slipped away from him, unawares, and ran off towards home; and as the prince followed her, she jumped up into the pigeon-house and shut the door.
Then he waited till her father came home, and told him that the unknown maiden, who had been at the feast, had hid herself in the pigeon-house.
But when they had broken open the door they found no one within; and as they came back into the house, Ashputtel was lying, as she always did, in her dirty frock by the ashes, and her dim little lamp was burning in the chimney.
For she had run as quickly as she could through the pigeon-house and on to the hazel-tree, and had there taken off her beautiful clothes, and put them beneath the tree, that the bird might carry them away, and had lain down again amid the ashes in her little grey frock.
The next day when the feast was again held, and her father, mother, and sisters were gone, Ashputtel went to the hazel-tree, and said: 'Shake, shake, hazel-tree, Gold and silver over me!
And the bird came and brought a still finer dress than the one she had worn the day before.
When night came she wanted to go home; and the king's son followed here as before, that he might see into what house she went: but she sprang away from him all at once into the garden behind her father's house.
In this garden stood a fine large pear-tree full of ripe fruit; and Ashputtel, not knowing where to hide herself, jumped up into it without being seen.
Then the king's son lost sight of her, and could not find out where she was gone, but waited till her father came home, and said to him, 'The unknown lady who danced with me has slipped away, and I think she must have sprung into the pear-tree.
' The father thought to.
himself, 'Can it be Ashputtel?
' So he had an axe brought; and they cut?
down the tree, but found no one upon it.
And when they came back into the kitchen, there lay Ashputtel among the ashes; for she had slipped down on the other side of the tree, and carried her beautiful clothes back to the bird at the hazel-tree, and then put on her little grey frock.
The third day, when her father and mother and sisters were gone, she went again into the garden, and said: 'Shake, shake, hazel-tree, Gold and silver over me!
Then her kind friend the bird brought a dress still finer than the former one, and slippers which were all of gold: so that when she came to the feast no one knew what to say, for wonder at her beauty: and the king's son danced with nobody but her; and when anyone else asked her to dance, he said, 'This lady is _my_ partner, sir.
When night came she wanted to go home; and the king's son would go with her, and said to himself, 'I will not lose her this time'; but, however, she again slipped away from him, though in such a hurry that she dropped her left golden slipper upon the stairs.
The prince took the shoe, and went the next day to the king his father, and said, 'I will take for my wife the lady that this golden slipper fits.
' Then both the sisters were overjoyed to hear it; for they.
had beautiful feet, and had no doubt that they could wear the golden slipper.
But her great toe could not go into it, and the shoe was altogether much too small for her.
' So.
the silly girl cut off her great toe, and thus squeezed on the shoe, and went to the king's son.
But on their way home they had to pass by the hazel-tree that Ashputtel had planted; and on the branch sat a little dove singing: 'Back again!
back again!
The shoe is too small, and not made for you!
So he turned his horse round, and brought the false bride back to her home, and said, 'This is not the right bride; let the other sister try and put on the slipper.
shoe, all but the heel, which was too large.
But her mother squeezed it in till the blood came, and took her to the king's son: and he set her as his bride by his side on his horse, and rode away with her.
back again!
The shoe is too small, and not made for you!
So he turned his horse and brought her also back again.
'This is not the true bride,' said he.
' 'No,' said he; 'there is?
only a little dirty Ashputtel here, the child of my first wife; I am sure she cannot be the bride.
' The prince told him to send her.
But the mother said, 'No, no, she is much too dirty; she will not dare to show herself.
' However, the prince would have her come; and she first washed.
her face and hands, and then went in and curtsied to him, and he reached her the golden slipper.
And when he drew near and looked at her face he knew her, and said, 'This is the right bride.
' But the mother and both the sisters.
were frightened, and turned pale with anger as he took Ashputtel on his horse, and rode away with her.
And when they came to the hazel-tree, the white dove sang: 'Home!
home!
look at the shoe!
Princess!
the shoe was made for you!
take home thy bride,!
For she is the true one that sits by thy side!
And when the dove had done its song, it came flying, and perched upon her right shoulder, and so went home with her.
THE WHITE SNAKE A long time ago there lived a king who was famed for his wisdom through all the land.
Nothing was hidden from him, and it seemed as if news of the most secret things was brought to him through the air.
But he had a strange custom; every day after dinner, when the table was cleared, and no one else was present, a trusty servant had to bring him one more dish.
It was covered, however, and even the servant did not know what was in it, neither did anyone know, for the king never took off the cover to eat of it until he was quite alone.
This had gone on for a long time, when one day the servant, who took away the dish, was overcome with such curiosity that he could not help carrying the dish into his room.
But when he saw it he could not deny himself the pleasure of tasting it, so he cut of a little bit and put it into his mouth.
No sooner had it touched his tongue than he heard a strange whispering of little voices outside his window.
He went and listened, and then noticed that it was the sparrows who were chattering together, and telling one another of all kinds of things which they had seen in the fields and woods.
Eating the snake had given him power of understanding the language of animals.
Now it so happened that on this very day the queen lost her most beautiful ring, and suspicion of having stolen it fell upon this trusty servant, who was allowed to go everywhere.
The king ordered the man to be brought before him, and threatened with angry words that unless he could before the morrow point out the thief, he himself should be looked upon as guilty and executed.
In vain he declared his innocence; he was dismissed with no better answer.
In his trouble and fear he went down into the courtyard and took thought how to help himself out of his trouble.
Now some ducks were sitting together quietly by a brook and taking their rest; and, whilst they were making their feathers smooth with their bills, they were having a confidential conversation together.
The servant stood by and listened.
They were telling one another of all the places where they had been waddling about all the morning, and what good food they had found; and one said in a pitiful tone: 'Something lies heavy on my stomach; as I was eating in haste I swallowed a ring which lay under the queen's window.
' The servant at once seized her by the neck, carried her to the.
kitchen, and said to the cook: 'Here is a fine duck; pray, kill her.
'Yes,' said the cook, and weighed her in his hand; 'she has spared no trouble to fatten herself, and has been waiting to be roasted long enough.
spit, the queen's ring was found inside her.
The servant could now easily prove his innocence; and the king, to make amends for the wrong, allowed him to ask a favour, and promised him the best place in the court that he could wish for.
The servant refused everything, and only asked for a horse and some money for travelling, as he had a mind to see the world and go about a little.
When his request was granted he set out on his way, and one day came to a pond, where he saw three fishes caught in the reeds and gasping for water.
Now, though it is said that fishes are dumb, he heard them lamenting that they must perish so miserably, and, as he had a kind heart, he got off his horse and put the three prisoners back into the water.
They leapt with delight, put out their heads, and cried to him: 'We will remember you and repay you for saving us!
He rode on, and after a while it seemed to him that he heard a voice in the sand at his feet.
He listened, and heard an ant-king complain: 'Why cannot folks, with their clumsy beasts, keep off our bodies?
That stupid horse, with his heavy hoofs, has been treading down my people without mercy!
' So he turned on to a side path and the ant-king cried out to!
The path led him into a wood, and there he saw two old ravens standing by their nest, and throwing out their young ones.
you any longer; you are big enough, and can provide for yourselves.
But the poor young ravens lay upon the ground, flapping their wings, and crying: 'Oh, what helpless chicks we are!
We must shift for ourselves, and yet we cannot fly!
What can we do, but lie here and starve?
' So the?
good young fellow alighted and killed his horse with his sword, and gave it to them for food.
There was a great noise and crowd in the streets, and a man rode up on horseback, crying aloud: 'The king's daughter wants a husband; but whoever seeks her hand must perform a hard task, and if he does not succeed he will forfeit his life.
' Many had.
already made the attempt, but in vain; nevertheless when the youth saw the king's daughter he was so overcome by her great beauty that he forgot all danger, went before the king, and declared himself a suitor.
So he was led out to the sea, and a gold ring was thrown into it, before his eyes; then the king ordered him to fetch this ring up from the bottom of the sea, and added: 'If you come up again without it you will be thrown in again and again until you perish amid the waves.
people grieved for the handsome youth; then they went away, leaving him alone by the sea.
He stood on the shore and considered what he should do, when suddenly he saw three fishes come swimming towards him, and they were the very fishes whose lives he had saved.
Full of joy he took it to the king and expected that he would grant him the promised reward.
But when the proud princess perceived that he was not her equal in birth, she scorned him, and required him first to perform another task.
She went down into the garden and strewed with her own hands ten sacksful of millet-seed on the grass; then she said: 'Tomorrow morning before sunrise these must be picked up, and not a single grain be wanting.
The youth sat down in the garden and considered how it might be possible to perform this task, but he could think of nothing, and there he sat sorrowfully awaiting the break of day, when he should be led to death.
But as soon as the first rays of the sun shone into the garden he saw all the ten sacks standing side by side, quite full, and not a single grain was missing.
The ant-king had come in the night with thousands and thousands of ants, and the grateful creatures had by great industry picked up all the millet-seed and gathered them into the sacks.
Presently the king's daughter herself came down into the garden, and was amazed to see that the young man had done the task she had given him.
But she could not yet conquer her proud heart, and said: 'Although he has performed both the tasks, he shall not be my husband until he had brought me an apple from the Tree of Life.
' The youth did not know where.
the Tree of Life stood, but he set out, and would have gone on for ever, as long as his legs would carry him, though he had no hope of finding it.
After he had wandered through three kingdoms, he came one evening to a wood, and lay down under a tree to sleep.
But he heard a rustling in the branches, and a golden apple fell into his hand.
' The youth, full of joy, set out.
homewards, and took the Golden Apple to the king's beautiful daughter, who had now no more excuses left to make.
They cut the Apple of Life in two and ate it together; and then her heart became full of love for him, and they lived in undisturbed happiness to a great age.
THE WOLF AND THE SEVEN LITTLE KIDS There was once upon a time an old goat who had seven little kids, and loved them with all the love of a mother for her children.
One day she wanted to go into the forest and fetch some food.
So she called all seven to her and said: 'Dear children, I have to go into the forest, be on your guard against the wolf; if he comes in, he will devour you all--skin, hair, and everything.
The wretch often disguises himself, but you will know him at once by his rough voice and his black feet.
kids said: 'Dear mother, we will take good care of ourselves; you may go away without any anxiety.
' Then the old one bleated, and went on her way.
with an easy mind.
It was not long before someone knocked at the house-door and called: 'Open the door, dear children; your mother is here, and has brought something back with her for each of you.
' But the little kids knew that.
it was the wolf, by the rough voice.
'We will not open the door,' cried.
they, 'you are not our mother.
She has a soft, pleasant voice, but your voice is rough; you are the wolf!
' Then the wolf went away to a!
shopkeeper and bought himself a great lump of chalk, ate this and made his voice soft with it.
Then he came back, knocked at the door of the house, and called: 'Open the door, dear children, your mother is here and has brought something back with her for each of you.
' But the wolf.
' Then the wolf ran to a baker and said: 'I!
have hurt my feet, rub some dough over them for me.
' And when the baker.
had rubbed his feet over, he ran to the miller and said: 'Strew some white meal over my feet for me.
' The miller thought to himself: 'The.
wolf wants to deceive someone,' and refused; but the wolf said: 'If you will not do it, I will devour you.
his paws white for him.
So now the wretch went for the third time to the house-door, knocked at it and said: 'Open the door for me, children, your dear little mother has come home, and has brought every one of you something back from the forest with her.
' The little kids cried: 'First show us your paws that.
' Then he put his paws.
But who should come in but the wolf!
One sprang under the table, the second into the bed, the third into the stove, the fourth into the kitchen, the fifth into the cupboard, the sixth under the washing-bowl, and the seventh into the clock-case.
But the wolf found them all, and used no great ceremony; one after the other he swallowed them down his throat.
The youngest, who was in the clock-case, was the only one he did not find.
When the wolf had satisfied his appetite he took himself off, laid himself down under a tree in the green meadow outside, and began to sleep.
Soon afterwards the old goat came home again from the forest.
Ah!
what a sight she saw!
there!
The house-door stood wide open.
The table, chairs, and benches were thrown down, the washing-bowl lay broken to pieces, and the quilts and pillows were pulled off the bed.
She sought her children, but they were nowhere to be found.
She called them one after another by name, but no one answered.
At last, when she came to the youngest, a soft voice cried: 'Dear mother, I am in the clock-case.
' She took the kid out, and.
it told her that the wolf had come and had eaten all the others.
Then you may imagine how she wept over her poor children.
At length in her grief she went out, and the youngest kid ran with her.
When they came to the meadow, there lay the wolf by the tree and snored so loud that the branches shook.
'Ah,.
heavens,' she said, 'is it possible that my poor children whom he has swallowed down for his supper, can be still alive?
' Then the kid had to?
What rejoicing there was!
They embraced their dear mother, and jumped like a tailor at his wedding.
The mother, however, said: 'Now go and look for some big stones, and we will fill the wicked beast's stomach with them while he is still asleep.
' Then the seven kids dragged.
the stones thither with all speed, and put as many of them into this stomach as they could get in; and the mother sewed him up again in the greatest haste, so that he was not aware of anything and never once stirred.
When the wolf at length had had his fill of sleep, he got on his legs, and as the stones in his stomach made him very thirsty, he wanted to go to a well to drink.
But when he began to walk and to move about, the stones in his stomach knocked against each other and rattled.
Then cried he: 'What rumbles and tumbles Against my poor bones?
I thought 'twas six kids, But it feels like big stones.
And when he got to the well and stooped over the water to drink, the heavy stones made him fall in, and he drowned miserably.
The wolf is dead!
' and danced for joy round about the well with!
their mother.
Then their brother, who was a little insignificant dwarf, went out to seek for his brothers: but when he had found them they only laughed at him, to think that he, who was so young and simple, should try to travel through the world, when they, who were so much wiser, had been unable to get on.
The two elder brothers would have pulled it down, in order to see how the poor ants in their fright would run about and carry off their eggs.
But the little dwarf said, 'Let the poor things enjoy themselves, I will not suffer you to trouble them.
So on they went, and came to a lake where many many ducks were swimming about.
But the dwarf said, 'Let the poor things enjoy themselves, you shall not kill them.
But the dwarf held them back, and said, 'Let the pretty insects enjoy themselves, I cannot let you burn them.
Then they went through all the rooms, till they came to a door on which were three locks: but in the middle of the door was a wicket, so that they could look into the next room.
He said nothing, but took hold of them and led them to a beautiful table covered with all sorts of good things: and when they had eaten and drunk, he showed each of them to a bed-chamber.
The first tablet said: 'In the wood, under the moss, lie the thousand pearls belonging to the king's daughter; they must all be found: and if one be missing by set of sun, he who seeks them will be turned into marble.
The eldest brother set out, and sought for the pearls the whole day: but the evening came, and he had not found the first hundred: so he was turned into stone as the tablet had foretold.
The next day the second brother undertook the task; but he succeeded no better than the first; for he could only find the second hundred of the pearls; and therefore he too was turned into stone.
At last came the little dwarf's turn; and he looked in the moss; but it was so hard to find the pearls, and the job was so tiresome!
--so he sat!
' And as the dwarf came to the brink of it,.
he saw the two ducks whose lives he had saved swimming about; and they dived down and soon brought in the key from the bottom.
The third task was the hardest.
It was to choose out the youngest and the best of the king's three daughters.
Now they were all beautiful, and all exactly alike: but he was told that the eldest had eaten a piece of sugar, the next some sweet syrup, and the youngest a spoonful of honey; so he was to guess which it was that had eaten the honey.
Then came the queen of the bees, who had been saved by the little dwarf from the fire, and she tried the lips of all three; but at last she sat upon the lips of the one that had eaten the honey: and so the dwarf knew which was the youngest.
And the dwarf married the youngest and the best of the princesses, and was king after her father's death; but his two brothers married the other two sisters.
Then he cut his leather out, all ready to make up the next day, meaning to rise early in the morning to his work.
In the morning after he had said his prayers, he sat himself down to his work; when, to his great wonder, there stood the shoes all ready made, upon the table.
The good man knew not what to say or think at such an odd thing happening.
Soon in came buyers, who paid him handsomely for his goods, so that he bought leather enough for four pair more.
themselves in a corner of the room, behind a curtain that was hung up there, and watched what would happen.
As soon as it was midnight, there came in two little naked dwarfs; and they sat themselves upon the shoemaker's bench, took up all the work that was cut out, and began to ply with their little fingers, stitching and rapping and tapping away at such a rate, that the shoemaker was all wonder, and could not take his eyes off them.
And on they went, till the job was quite done, and the shoes stood ready for use upon the table.
This was long before daybreak; and then they bustled away as quick as lightning.
The next day the wife said to the shoemaker.
'These little wights have.
made us rich, and we ought to be thankful to them, and do them a good turn if we can.
I'll tell you what, I will make each of them a shirt, and a coat and waistcoat, and a pair of pantaloons into the bargain; and do you make each of them a little pair of shoes.
The thought pleased the good cobbler very much; and one evening, when all the things were ready, they laid them on the table, instead of the work that they used to cut out, and then went and hid themselves, to watch what the little elves would do.
About midnight in they came, dancing and skipping, hopped round the room, and then went to sit down to their work as usual; but when they saw the clothes lying for them, they laughed and chuckled, and seemed mightily delighted.
THE JUNIPER-TREE Long, long ago, some two thousand years or so, there lived a rich man with a good and beautiful wife.
They loved each other dearly, but sorrowed much that they had no children.
So greatly did they desire to have one, that the wife prayed for it day and night, but still they remained childless.
In front of the house there was a court, in which grew a juniper-tree.
One winter's day the wife stood under the tree to peel some apples, and as she was peeling them, she cut her finger, and the blood fell on the snow.
'Ah,' sighed the woman heavily, 'if I had but a child, as red as.
blood and as white as snow,' and as she spoke the words, her heart grew light within her, and it seemed to her that her wish was granted, and she returned to the house feeling glad and comforted.
A month passed, and the snow had all disappeared; then another month went by, and all the earth was green.
So the months followed one another, and first the trees budded in the woods, and soon the green branches grew thickly intertwined, and then the blossoms began to fall.
Once again the wife stood under the juniper-tree, and it was so full of sweet scent that her heart leaped for joy, and she was so overcome with her happiness, that she fell on her knees.
A little while later she called her husband, and said to him, weeping.
die, bury me under the juniper-tree.
' Then she felt comforted and happy.
again, and before another month had passed she had a little child, and when she saw that it was as white as snow and as red as blood, her joy was so great that she died.
Her husband buried her under the juniper-tree, and wept bitterly for her.
He now had a little daughter born to him; the child of his first wife was a boy, who was as red as blood and as white as snow.
The mother loved her daughter very much, and when she looked at her and then looked at the boy, it pierced her heart to think that he would always stand in the way of her own child, and she was continually thinking how she could get the whole of the property for her.
This evil thought took possession of her more and more, and made her behave very unkindly to the boy.
She drove him from place to place with cuffings and buffetings, so that the poor child went about in fear, and had no peace from the time he left school to the time he went back.
One day the little daughter came running to her mother in the store-room, and said, 'Mother, give me an apple.
' 'Yes, my child,' said.
the wife, and she gave her a beautiful apple out of the chest; the chest had a very heavy lid and a large iron lock.
'Mother,' said the little daughter again, 'may not brother have one too?
' The mother was angry at this, but she answered, 'Yes, when he?
comes out of school.
Just then she looked out of the window and saw him coming, and it seemed as if an evil spirit entered into her, for she snatched the apple out of her little daughter's hand, and said, 'You shall not have one before your brother.
' She threw the apple into the chest and shut it to.
The little boy now came in, and the evil spirit in the wife made her say kindly to him, 'My son, will you have an apple?
' but she gave him a?
'Mother,' said the boy, 'how dreadful you look!.
Yes, give me an apple.
with me,' she said, and she lifted up the lid of the chest; 'take one out for yourself.
' And as he bent over to do so, the evil spirit urged.
her, and crash! down went the lid, and off went the little boy's head.
Then she was overwhelmed with fear at the thought of what she had done.
'If only I can prevent anyone knowing that I did it,' she thought.
So she went upstairs to her room, and took a white handkerchief out of her top drawer; then she set the boy's head again on his shoulders, and bound it with the handkerchief so that nothing could be seen, and placed him on a chair by the door with an apple in his hand.
Soon after this, little Marleen came up to her mother who was stirring a pot of boiling water over the fire, and said, 'Mother, brother is sitting by the door with an apple in his hand, and he looks so pale; and when I asked him to give me the apple, he did not answer, and that frightened me.
'Go to him again,' said her mother, 'and if he does not answer, give him a box on the ear.
that apple,' but he did not say a word; then she gave him a box on the ear, and his head rolled off.
She was so terrified at this, that she ran crying and screaming to her mother.
'Oh!' she said, 'I have knocked off.
brother's head,' and then she wept and wept, and nothing would stop her.
'What have you done!
' said her mother, 'but no one must know about it,!
into puddings, and put him in the pot.
But Marleen stood looking on, and wept and wept, and her tears fell into the pot, so that there was no need of salt.
Presently the father came home and sat down to his dinner; he asked, 'Where is my son?
' The mother said nothing, but gave him a large dish of?
black pudding, and Marleen still wept without ceasing.
The father again asked, 'Where is my son?
'What has he gone there for, and he never even said goodbye to me!
'Well, he likes being there, and he told me he should be away quite six weeks; he is well looked after there.
With this he went on with his dinner, and said, 'Little Marleen, why do you weep?
Brother will soon be back.
pudding, and as he ate, he threw the bones under the table.
Little Marleen went upstairs and took her best silk handkerchief out of her bottom drawer, and in it she wrapped all the bones from under the table and carried them outside, and all the time she did nothing but weep.
Then she laid them in the green grass under the juniper-tree, and she had no sooner done so, then all her sadness seemed to leave her, and she wept no more.
And now the juniper-tree began to move, and the branches waved backwards and forwards, first away from one another, and then together again, as it might be someone clapping their hands for joy.
After this a mist came round the tree, and in the midst of it there was a burning as of fire, and out of the fire there flew a beautiful bird, that rose high into the air, singing magnificently, and when it could no more be seen, the juniper-tree stood there as before, and the silk handkerchief and the bones were gone.
Little Marleen now felt as lighthearted and happy as if her brother were still alive, and she went back to the house and sat down cheerfully to the table and ate.
The bird flew away and alighted on the house of a goldsmith and began to sing: 'My mother killed her little son; My father grieved when I was gone; My sister loved me best of all; She laid her kerchief over me, And took my bones that they might lie Underneath the juniper-tree Kywitt, Kywitt, what a beautiful bird am I!
The goldsmith was in his workshop making a gold chain, when he heard the song of the bird on his roof.
He thought it so beautiful that he got up and ran out, and as he crossed the threshold he lost one of his slippers.
But he ran on into the middle of the street, with a slipper on one foot and a sock on the other; he still had on his apron, and still held the gold chain and the pincers in his hands, and so he stood gazing up at the bird, while the sun came shining brightly down on the street.
'Bird,' he said, 'how beautifully you sing!
'Nay,' said the bird, 'I do not sing twice for nothing.
Give that gold chain, and I will sing it you again.
'Here is the chain, take it,' said the goldsmith.
'Only sing me that.
again.
The bird flew down and took the gold chain in his right claw, and then he alighted again in front of the goldsmith and sang: 'My mother killed her little son; My father grieved when I was gone; My sister loved me best of all; She laid her kerchief over me, And took my bones that they might lie Underneath the juniper-tree Kywitt, Kywitt, what a beautiful bird am I!
'Bird,' he said, 'how beautifully you sing!
' Then he called through the!
door to his wife: 'Wife, come out; here is a bird, come and look at it and hear how beautifully it sings.
' Then he called his daughter and the.
children, then the apprentices, girls and boys, and they all ran up the street to look at the bird, and saw how splendid it was with its red and green feathers, and its neck like burnished gold, and eyes like two bright stars in its head.
'Nay,' answered the bird, 'I do not sing twice for nothing; you must give me something.
'Wife,' said the man, 'go into the garret; on the upper shelf you will see a pair of red shoes; bring them to me.
' The wife went in and fetched.
the shoes.
The bird flew down and took the red shoes in his left claw, and then he went back to the roof and sang: 'My mother killed her little son; My father grieved when I was gone; My sister loved me best of all; She laid her kerchief over me, And took my bones that they might lie Underneath the juniper-tree Kywitt, Kywitt, what a beautiful bird am I!
He had the chain in his right claw and the shoes in his left, and he flew right away to a mill, and the mill went 'Click clack, click clack, click clack.
' Inside the mill were.
twenty of the miller's men hewing a stone, and as they went 'Hick hack, hick hack, hick hack,' the mill went 'Click clack, click clack, click clack.
The bird settled on a lime-tree in front of the mill and sang: 'My mother killed her little son; then one of the men left off, My father grieved when I was gone; two more men left off and listened, My sister loved me best of all; then four more left off, She laid her kerchief over me, And took my bones that they might lie now there were only eight at work, Underneath And now only five, the juniper-tree.
And now only one, Kywitt, Kywitt, what a beautiful bird am I!
then he looked up and the last one had left off work.
'Bird,' he said, 'what a beautiful song that is you sing!
Let me hear it too; sing it again.
'Nay,' answered the bird, 'I do not sing twice for nothing; give me that millstone, and I will sing it again.
The bird came down, and all the twenty millers set to and lifted up the stone with a beam; then the bird put his head through the hole and took the stone round his neck like a collar, and flew back with it to the tree and sang-- 'My mother killed her little son; My father grieved when I was gone; My sister loved me best of all; She laid her kerchief over me, And took my bones that they might lie Underneath the juniper-tree Kywitt, Kywitt, what a beautiful bird am I!
And when he had finished his song, he spread his wings, and with the chain in his right claw, the shoes in his left, and the millstone round his neck, he flew right away to his father's house.
The father, the mother, and little Marleen were having their dinner.
'How lighthearted I feel,' said the father, 'so pleased and cheerful.
But little Marleen sat and wept and wept.
Then the bird came flying towards the house and settled on the roof.
'I do feel so happy,' said the father, 'and how beautifully the sun shines; I feel just as if I were going to see an old friend again.
'Ah!
The bird now flew to the juniper-tree and began singing: 'My mother killed her little son; the mother shut her eyes and her ears, that she might see and hear nothing, but there was a roaring sound in her ears like that of a violent storm, and in her eyes a burning and flashing like lightning: My father grieved when I was gone; 'Look, mother,' said the man, 'at the beautiful bird that is singing so magnificently; and how warm and bright the sun is, and what a delicious scent of spice in the air!
My sister loved me best of all; then little Marleen laid her head down on her knees and sobbed.
'I must go outside and see the bird nearer,' said the man.
'Ah, do not go!' cried the wife.
flames!
She laid her kerchief over me, And took my bones that they might lie Underneath the juniper-tree Kywitt, Kywitt, what a beautiful bird am I!
With that the bird let fall the gold chain, and it fell just round the man's neck, so that it fitted him exactly.
But the wife was in such fear and trouble, that she fell on the floor, and her cap fell from her head.
' cried the wife, 'if I were but a thousand feet beneath the!
earth, that I might not hear that song.
My father grieved when I was gone; then the woman fell down again as if dead.
My sister loved me best of all; 'Well,' said little Marleen, 'I will go out too and see if the bird will give me anything.
So she went out.
She laid her kerchief over me, And took my bones that they might lie and he threw down the shoes to her, Underneath the juniper-tree Kywitt, Kywitt, what a beautiful bird am I!
And she now felt quite happy and lighthearted; she put on the shoes and danced and jumped about in them.
'I was so miserable,' she said, 'when I.
The wife sprang up, with her hair standing out from her head like flames of fire.
'Then I will go out too,' she said, 'and see if it will lighten.
But as she crossed the threshold, crash!
the bird threw the millstone!
The father and little Marleen heard the sound and ran out, but they only saw mist and flame and fire rising from the spot, and when these had passed, there stood the little brother, and he took the father and little Marleen by the hand; then they all three rejoiced, and went inside together and sat down to their dinners and ate.
THE TURNIP There were two brothers who were both soldiers; the one was rich and the other poor.
The poor man thought he would try to better himself; so, pulling off his red coat, he became a gardener, and dug his ground well, and sowed turnips.
When the seed came up, there was one plant bigger than all the rest; and it kept getting larger and larger, and seemed as if it would never cease growing; so that it might have been called the prince of turnips for there never was such a one seen before, and never will again.
At last it was so big that it filled a cart, and two oxen could hardly draw it; and the gardener knew not what in the world to do with it, nor whether it would be a blessing or a curse to him.
One day he said to himself, 'What shall I do with it?
if I sell it, it will bring no more than another;?
and for eating, the little turnips are better than this; the best thing perhaps is to carry it and give it to the king as a mark of respect.
Then he yoked his oxen, and drew the turnip to the court, and gave it to the king.
'What a wonderful thing!' said the king; 'I have seen many.
strange things, but such a monster as this I never saw.
Where did you get the seed?
or is it only your good luck?
' 'Ah, no!' answered the gardener, 'I am no child of fortune;.
I am a poor soldier, who never could get enough to live upon; so I laid aside my red coat, and set to work, tilling the ground.
I have a brother, who is rich, and your majesty knows him well, and all the world knows him; but because I am poor, everybody forgets me.
The king then took pity on him, and said, 'You shall be poor no longer.
I will give you so much that you shall be even richer than your brother.
' Then he gave him gold and lands and flocks, and made him so.
rich that his brother's fortune could not at all be compared with his.
When the brother heard of all this, and how a turnip had made the gardener so rich, he envied him sorely, and bethought himself how he could contrive to get the same good fortune for himself.
The king took the gift very graciously, and said he knew not what to give in return more valuable and wonderful than the great turnip; so the soldier was forced to put it into a cart, and drag it home with him.
When he reached home, he knew not upon whom to vent his rage and spite; and at length wicked thoughts came into his head, and he resolved to kill his brother.
So he hired some villains to murder him; and having shown them where to lie in ambush, he went to his brother, and said, 'Dear brother, I have found a hidden treasure; let us go and dig it up, and share it between us.
' The other had no suspicions of his roguery: so they went out.
together, and as they were travelling along, the murderers rushed out upon him, bound him, and were going to hang him on a tree.
But whilst they were getting all ready, they heard the trampling of a horse at a distance, which so frightened them that they pushed their prisoner neck and shoulders together into a sack, and swung him up by a cord to the tree, where they left him dangling, and ran away.
When the horseman came up, he proved to be a student, a merry fellow, who was journeying along on his nag, and singing as he went.
As soon as the man in the sack saw him passing under the tree, he cried out, 'Good morning!
good morning to thee, my friend!
' The student looked about!
everywhere; and seeing no one, and not knowing where the voice came from, cried out, 'Who calls me?
Then the man in the tree answered, 'Lift up thine eyes, for behold here I sit in the sack of wisdom; here have I, in a short time, learned great and wondrous things.
Compared to this seat, all the learning of the schools is as empty air.
A little longer, and I shall know all that man can know, and shall come forth wiser than the wisest of mankind.
Here I discern the signs and motions of the heavens and the stars; the laws that control the winds; the number of the sands on the seashore; the healing of the sick; the virtues of all simples, of birds, and of precious stones.
The student listened to all this and wondered much; at last he said, 'Blessed be the day and hour when I found you; cannot you contrive to let me into the sack for a little while?
' Then the other answered, as if?
very unwillingly, 'A little space I may allow thee to sit here, if thou wilt reward me well and entreat me kindly; but thou must tarry yet an hour below, till I have learnt some little matters that are yet unknown to me.
So the student sat himself down and waited a while; but the time hung heavy upon him, and he begged earnestly that he might ascend forthwith, for his thirst for knowledge was great.
' So the student let him down,.
opened the sack, and set him free.
quickly.
' As he began to put himself into the sack heels first, 'Wait a.
while,' said the gardener, 'that is not the way.
' Then he pushed him.
in head first, tied up the sack, and soon swung up the searcher after wisdom dangling in the air.
'How is it with thee, friend?' said he,.
'dost thou not feel that wisdom comes unto thee?
Rest there in peace, till thou art a wiser man than thou wert.
So saying, he trotted off on the student's nag, and left the poor fellow to gather wisdom till somebody should come and let him down.
' Hans answered: 'To?
' 'Oh, I'll behave well.
'Goodbye, Hans.
' Hans comes to Gretel.
'Good day, Gretel.
' 'Good day,.
What do you bring that is good?
' 'I bring nothing, I want to have?
something given me.
' Gretel presents Hans with a needle, Hans says:.
Hans takes the needle, sticks it into a hay-cart, and follows the cart home.
'Good evening, mother.
Where have you been?
'With Gretel.
' 'What did you take her?' 'Took nothing; had something.
given me.
' 'Where is the.
needle, Hans?' 'Stuck in the hay-cart.
' 'That was ill done, Hans.
You should have stuck the needle in your sleeve.
' 'Never mind, I'll do.
'Whither away, Hans?' 'To Gretel, mother.
I'll behave well.
'Good day, Gretel.
' 'Good day, Hans.
What do you bring that is good?' 'I bring nothing.
' Gretel.
' Hans.
takes the knife, sticks it in his sleeve, and goes home.
mother.
' What.
' 'What did.
Gretel give you?' 'Gave me a knife.
' 'Where is the knife, Hans?' 'Stuck.
' 'That's ill done, Hans, you should have put the knife in.
your pocket.
' 'Never mind, will do better next time.
'Whither away, Hans?' 'To Gretel, mother.
I'll behave well.
'Good day, Gretel.
' 'Good day, Hans.
' Gretel presents.
Hans with a young goat.
' Hans takes.
the goat, ties its legs, and puts it in his pocket.
When he gets home it is suffocated.
'Good evening, mother.
' 'What did you take her?' 'Took nothing, she.
gave me something.
'Where is the goat, Hans?' 'Put it in my pocket.
' 'That was ill done,.
Hans, you should have put a rope round the goat's neck.
' 'Never mind,.
will do better next time.
'Whither away, Hans?' 'To Gretel, mother.
I'll behave well.
'Good day, Gretel.
' 'Good day, Hans.
' Gretel presents.
Hans with a piece of bacon.
Hans takes the bacon, ties it to a rope, and drags it away behind him.
When he gets home, he has the rope in his hand, and there is no longer anything hanging on to it.
evening, mother.
Where have you been?
' 'With?
' 'What did Gretel give you?' 'Gave me a bit of bacon.
' 'Where.
is the bacon, Hans?
' 'I tied it to a rope, brought it home, dogs took?
it.
' 'That was ill done, Hans, you should have carried the bacon on your.
head.
' 'Never mind, will do better next time.
'Whither away, Hans?' 'To Gretel, mother.
' 'I'll.
' Hans comes to Gretel.
'Good day, Gretel.
' 'Good day, Hans, What good thing do you bring?' 'I.
bring nothing, but would have something given.
' Gretel presents Hans.
with a calf.
Hans takes the calf, puts it on his head, and the calf kicks his face.
'Good evening, mother.
Where have you been?
' 'With?
' 'What did you take her?' 'I took nothing, but had something.
given me.
' 'What did Gretel give you?' 'A calf.
' 'Where have you the.
calf, Hans?' 'I set it on my head and it kicked my face.
' 'That was.
'Never mind, will do better next time.
'Whither away, Hans?' 'To Gretel, mother.
' 'I'll.
Hans comes to Gretel.
'Good day, Gretel.
' 'Good day, Hans.
What good thing do you bring?' 'I bring nothing, but would have something given.
Gretel says to Hans: 'I will go with you.
Then Hans goes to his mother.
'Good evening, mother.
' 'Good.
evening, Hans.
' 'What did you take.
her?' 'I took her nothing.
' 'What did Gretel give you?' 'She gave me.
' 'Where have you left Gretel?' 'I led her by.
the rope, tied her to the rack, and scattered some grass for her.
was ill done, Hans, you should have cast friendly eyes on her.
' 'Never.
mind, will do better.
Then Gretel became angry, tore herself loose and ran away, and was no longer the bride of Hans.
THE THREE LANGUAGES An aged count once lived in Switzerland, who had an only son, but he was stupid, and could learn nothing.
Then said the father: 'Hark you, my son, try as I will I can get nothing into your head.
' The youth was sent into a strange town,.
and remained a whole year with the master.
At the end of this time, he came home again, and his father asked: 'Now, my son, what have you learnt?' 'Father, I have learnt what the dogs say when they bark.
' 'Lord.
have mercy on us!
' The youth was taken.
thither, and stayed a year with this master likewise.
When he came back the father again asked: 'My son, what have you learnt?
' He answered:?
'Father, I have learnt what the birds say.
rage and said: 'Oh, you lost man, you have spent the precious time and learnt nothing; are you not ashamed to appear before my eyes?
I will send you to a third master, but if you learn nothing this time also, I will no longer be your father.
' The youth remained a whole year with the.
third master also, and when he came home again, and his father inquired: 'My son, what have you learnt?
' he answered: 'Dear father, I have this?
year learnt what the frogs croak.
' Then the father fell into the most.
furious anger, sprang up, called his people thither, and said: 'This man is no longer my son, I drive him forth, and command you to take him out into the forest, and kill him.
The youth wandered on, and after some time came to a fortress where he begged for a night's lodging.
'Yes,' said the lord of the castle, 'if.
you will pass the night down there in the old tower, go thither; but I warn you, it is at the peril of your life, for it is full of wild dogs, which bark and howl without stopping, and at certain hours a man has to be given to them, whom they at once devour.
' The whole district was in.
' As he himself would have it so,.
When he went inside, the dogs did not bark at him, but wagged their tails quite amicably around him, ate what he set before them, and did not hurt one hair of his head.
Next morning, to the astonishment of everyone, he came out again safe and unharmed, and said to the lord of the castle: 'The dogs have revealed to me, in their own language, why they dwell there, and bring evil on the land.
' Then all who.
He went down again, and as he knew what he had to do, he did it thoroughly, and brought a chest full of gold out with him.
The howling of the wild dogs was henceforth heard no more; they had disappeared, and the country was freed from the trouble.
After some time he took it in his head that he would travel to Rome.
On the way he passed by a marsh, in which a number of frogs were sitting croaking.
He listened to them, and when he became aware of what they were saying, he grew very thoughtful and sad.
At last he arrived in Rome, where the Pope had just died, and there was great doubt among the cardinals as to whom they should appoint as his successor.
They at length agreed that the person should be chosen as pope who should be distinguished by some divine and miraculous token.
The ecclesiastics recognized therein the token from above, and asked him on the spot if he would be pope.
He was undecided, and knew not if he were worthy of this, but the doves counselled him to do it, and at length he said yes.
Then was he anointed and consecrated, and thus was fulfilled what he had heard from the frogs on his way, which had so affected him, that he was to be his Holiness the Pope.
Then he had to sing a mass, and did not know one word of it, but the two doves sat continually on his shoulders, and said it all in his ear.
THE FOX AND THE CAT It happened that the cat met the fox in a forest, and as she thought to herself: 'He is clever and full of experience, and much esteemed in the world,' she spoke to him in a friendly way.
how are you?
How is all with you?
How are you getting on in these hard times?
head to foot, and for a long time did not know whether he would give any answer or not.
At last he said: 'Oh, you wretched beard-cleaner, you piebald fool, you hungry mouse-hunter, what can you be thinking of?
What have you learnt?
How many arts do you understand?
' 'I understand but one,' replied the?
'What art is that?' asked the fox.
'When the hounds are.
following me, I can spring into a tree and save myself.
' 'Is that all?'.
said the fox.
a sackful of cunning.
You make me sorry for you; come with me, I will teach you how people get away from the hounds.
' Just then came a hunter.
The cat sprang nimbly up a tree, and sat down at the top of it, where the branches and foliage quite concealed her.
'Open your.
sack, Mr Fox, open your sack,' cried the cat to him, but the dogs had already seized him, and were holding him fast.
'Ah, Mr Fox,' cried the.
cat.
'You with your hundred arts are left in the lurch!.
Had you been able to climb like me, you would not have lost your life.
THE FOUR CLEVER BROTHERS 'Dear children,' said a poor man to his four sons, 'I have nothing to give you; you must go out into the wide world and try your luck.
Begin by learning some craft or another, and see how you can get on.
four brothers took their walking-sticks in their hands, and their little bundles on their shoulders, and after bidding their father goodbye, went all out at the gate together.
When they had got on some way they came to four crossways, each leading to a different country.
Then the eldest said, 'Here we must part; but this day four years we will come back to this spot, and in the meantime each must try what he can do for himself.
'I am.
going to try my luck in the world, and should like to begin by learning some art or trade,' answered he.
'Then,' said the man, 'go with me, and.
I will teach you to become the cunningest thief that ever was.
' 'No,'.
said the other, 'that is not an honest calling, and what can one look to earn by it in the end but the gallows?' 'Oh!
not fear the gallows; for I will only teach you to steal what will be fair game: I meddle with nothing but what no one else can get or care anything about, and where no one can find you out.
agreed to follow his trade, and he soon showed himself so clever, that nothing could escape him that he had once set his mind upon.
'I do not.
know yet,' said he.
'Then come with me, and be a star-gazer.
It is a noble art, for nothing can be hidden from you, when once you understand the stars.
' The plan pleased him much, and he soon became such a skilful.
star-gazer, that when he had served out his time, and wanted to leave his master, he gave him a glass, and said, 'With this you can see all that is passing in the sky and on earth, and nothing can be hidden from you.
The third brother met a huntsman, who took him with him, and taught him so well all that belonged to hunting, that he became very clever in the craft of the woods; and when he left his master he gave him a bow, and said, 'Whatever you shoot at with this bow you will be sure to hit.
The youngest brother likewise met a man who asked him what he wished to do.
'Would not you like,' said he, 'to be a tailor?' 'Oh, no!' said.
'Oh!
' answered the man, 'that is not my sort of tailoring; come with me,!
and you will learn quite another kind of craft from that.
what better to do, he came into the plan, and learnt tailoring from the beginning; and when he left his master, he gave him a needle, and said, 'You can sew anything with this, be it as soft as an egg or as hard as steel; and the joint will be so fine that no seam will be seen.
After the space of four years, at the time agreed upon, the four brothers met at the four cross-roads; and having welcomed each other, set off towards their father's home, where they told him all that had happened to them, and how each had learned some craft.
Then, one day, as they were sitting before the house under a very high tree, the father said, 'I should like to try what each of you can do in this way.
' So he looked up, and said to the second son, 'At the top of.
this tree there is a chaffinch's nest; tell me how many eggs there are in it.
'Now,' said the father to the eldest son, 'take away the eggs without letting the bird that is sitting upon them and hatching them know anything of what you are doing.
' So the cunning thief climbed up the.
Then the father took the eggs, and put one on each corner of the table, and the fifth in the middle, and said to the huntsman, 'Cut all the eggs in two pieces at one shot.
' The huntsman took up his bow, and.
at one shot struck all the five eggs as his father wished.
'Now comes your turn,' said he to the young tailor; 'sew the eggs and the young birds in them together again, so neatly that the shot shall have done them no harm.
eggs as he was told; and when he had done, the thief was sent to take them back to the nest, and put them under the bird without its knowing it.
'Well done, sons!
' said the old man; 'you have made good use of your!
time, and learnt something worth the knowing; but I am sure I do not know which ought to have the prize.
Oh, that a time might soon come for you to turn your skill to some account!
Not long after this there was a great bustle in the country; for the king's daughter had been carried off by a mighty dragon, and the king mourned over his loss day and night, and made it known that whoever brought her back to him should have her for a wife.
Then the four brothers said to each other, 'Here is a chance for us; let us try what we can do.
' And they agreed to see whether they could not set the.
princess free.
'I will soon find out where she is, however,' said the.
star-gazer, as he looked through his glass; and he soon cried out, 'I see her afar off, sitting upon a rock in the sea, and I can spy the dragon close by, guarding her.
' Then he went to the king, and asked for.
'I dare not shoot at him,'.
said the huntsman, 'for I should kill the beautiful young lady also.
'Then I will try my skill,' said the thief, and went and stole her away from under the dragon, so quietly and gently that the beast did not know it, but went on snoring.
Then away they hastened with her full of joy in their boat towards the ship; but soon came the dragon roaring behind them through the air; for he awoke and missed the princess.
But when he got over the boat, and wanted to pounce upon them and carry off the princess, the huntsman took up his bow and shot him straight through the heart so that he fell down dead.
They were still not safe; for he was such a great beast that in his fall he overset the boat, and they had to swim in the open sea upon a few planks.
When they had brought home the princess to her father, there was great rejoicing; and he said to the four brothers, 'One of you shall marry her, but you must settle amongst yourselves which it is to be.
there arose a quarrel between them; and the star-gazer said, 'If I had not found the princess out, all your skill would have been of no use; therefore she ought to be mine.
' 'Your seeing her would have been of.
no use,' said the thief, 'if I had not taken her away from the dragon; therefore she ought to be mine.
' 'No, she is mine,' said the huntsman;.
'for if I had not killed the dragon, he would, after all, have torn you and the princess into pieces.
' 'And if I had not sewn the boat together.
again,' said the tailor, 'you would all have been drowned, therefore she is mine.
and as all cannot have the young lady, the best way is for neither of you to have her: for the truth is, there is somebody she likes a great deal better.
But to make up for your loss, I will give each of you, as a reward for his skill, half a kingdom.
' So the brothers agreed that this.
And the king then gave to each half a kingdom, as he had said; and they lived very happily the rest of their days, and took good care of their father; and somebody took better care of the young lady, than to let either the dragon or one of the craftsmen have her again.
LILY AND THE LION A merchant, who had three daughters, was once setting out upon a journey; but before he went he asked each daughter what gift he should bring back for her.
The eldest wished for pearls; the second for jewels; but the third, who was called Lily, said, 'Dear father, bring me a rose.
' Now it was no easy task to find a rose, for it was the middle.
of winter; yet as she was his prettiest daughter, and was very fond of flowers, her father said he would try what he could do.
So he kissed all three, and bid them goodbye.
And when the time came for him to go home, he had bought pearls and jewels for the two eldest, but he had sought everywhere in vain for the rose; and when he went into any garden and asked for such a thing, the people laughed at him, and asked him whether he thought roses grew in snow.
This grieved him very much, for Lily was his dearest child; and as he was journeying home, thinking what he should bring her, he came to a fine castle; and around the castle was a garden, in one half of which it seemed to be summer-time and in the other half winter.
On one side the finest flowers were in full bloom, and on the other everything looked dreary and buried in the snow.
'A lucky hit!' said he, as he called to.
his servant, and told him to go to a beautiful bed of roses that was there, and bring him away one of the finest flowers.
This done, they were riding away well pleased, when up sprang a fierce lion, and roared out, 'Whoever has stolen my roses shall be eaten up alive!
' Then the man said, 'I knew not that the garden belonged to you;!
can nothing save my life?' 'No!
undertake to give me whatever meets you on your return home; if you agree to this, I will give you your life, and the rose too for your daughter.
' But the man was unwilling to do so and said, 'It may be my.
' Then the servant was greatly frightened, and said, 'It may.
perhaps be only a cat or a dog.
' And at last the man yielded with a.
heavy heart, and took the rose; and said he would give the lion whatever should meet him first on his return.
And as he came near home, it was Lily, his youngest and dearest daughter, that met him; she came running, and kissed him, and welcomed him home; and when she saw that he had brought her the rose, she was still more glad.
But her father began to be very sorrowful, and to weep, saying, 'Alas, my dearest child!
I have bought this flower at a high price, for I have said I would give you to a wild lion; and when he has you, he will tear you in pieces, and eat you.
' Then he told her all that.
But she comforted him, and said, 'Dear father, the word you have given must be kept; I will go to the lion, and soothe him: perhaps he will let me come safe home again.
The next morning she asked the way she was to go, and took leave of her father, and went forth with a bold heart into the wood.
But the lion was an enchanted prince.
By day he and all his court were lions, but in the evening they took their right forms again.
And when Lily came to the castle, he welcomed her so courteously that she agreed to marry him.
The wedding-feast was held, and they lived happily together a long time.
But she told them how happy she was, and stayed till the feast was over, and then went back to the wood.
Her second sister was soon after married, and when Lily was asked to go to the wedding, she said to the prince, 'I will not go alone this time--you must go with me.
However, she gave him no rest, and said she would take care no light should fall upon him.
So at last they set out together, and took with them their little child; and she chose a large hall with thick walls for him to sit in while the wedding-torches were lighted; but, unluckily, no one saw that there was a crack in the door.
In a moment he disappeared, and when his wife came in and looked for him, she found only a white dove; and it said to her, 'Seven years must I fly up and down over the face of the earth, but every now and then I will let fall a white feather, that will show you the way I am going; follow it, and at last you may overtake and set me free.
This said, he flew out at the door, and poor Lily followed; and every now and then a white feather fell, and showed her the way she was to journey.
Thus she went roving on through the wide world, and looked neither to the right hand nor to the left, nor took any rest, for seven years.
Then she began to be glad, and thought to herself that the time was fast coming when all her troubles should end; yet repose was still far off, for one day as she was travelling on she missed the white feather, and when she lifted up her eyes she could nowhere see the dove.
'Now,' thought she to herself, 'no aid of man can be of use to me.
' So.
'No,' said the sun, 'I have not seen it; but I will give thee a casket--open it when thy hour of need comes.
So she thanked the sun, and went on her way till eventide; and when the moon arose, she cried unto it, and said, 'Thou shinest through the night, over field and grove--hast thou nowhere seen my white dove?
'No,' said the moon, 'I cannot help thee but I will give thee an egg--break it when need comes.
Then she thanked the moon, and went on till the night-wind blew; and she raised up her voice to it, and said, 'Thou blowest through every tree and under every leaf--hast thou not seen my white dove?
' 'No,' said the?
night-wind, 'but I will ask three other winds; perhaps they have seen it.
' Then the east wind and the west wind came, and said they too had.
not seen it, but the south wind said, 'I have seen the white dove--he has fled to the Red Sea, and is changed once more into a lion, for the seven years are passed away, and there he is fighting with a dragon; and the dragon is an enchanted princess, who seeks to separate him from you.
' Then the night-wind said, 'I will give thee counsel.
Go to the Red Sea; on the right shore stand many rods--count them, and when thou comest to the eleventh, break it off, and smite the dragon with it; and so the lion will have the victory, and both of them will appear to you in their own forms.
Then look round and thou wilt see a griffin, winged like bird, sitting by the Red Sea; jump on to his back with thy beloved one as quickly as possible, and he will carry you over the waters to your home.
I will also give thee this nut,' continued the night-wind.
So our poor wanderer went forth, and found all as the night-wind had said; and she plucked the eleventh rod, and smote the dragon, and the lion forthwith became a prince, and the dragon a princess again.
But no sooner was the princess released from the spell, than she seized the prince by the arm and sprang on to the griffin's back, and went off carrying the prince away with her.
Thus the unhappy traveller was again forsaken and forlorn; but she took heart and said, 'As far as the wind blows, and so long as the cock crows, I will journey on, till I find him once again.
' She went on for.
a long, long way, till at length she came to the castle whither the princess had carried the prince; and there was a feast got ready, and she heard that the wedding was about to be held.
'Heaven aid me now!'.
said she; and she took the casket that the sun had given her, and found that within it lay a dress as dazzling as the sun itself.
So she put it on, and went into the palace, and all the people gazed upon her; and the dress pleased the bride so much that she asked whether it was to be sold.
'Not for gold and silver.
' said she, 'but for flesh and blood.
The princess asked what she meant, and she said, 'Let me speak with the bridegroom this night in his chamber, and I will give thee the dress.
At last the princess agreed, but she told her chamberlain to give the prince a sleeping draught, that he might not hear or see her.
When evening came, and the prince had fallen asleep, she was led into his chamber, and she sat herself down at his feet, and said: 'I have followed thee seven years.
I have been to the sun, the moon, and the night-wind, to seek thee, and at last I have helped thee to overcome the dragon.
Wilt thou then forget me quite?
' But the prince all the time?
Then poor Lily was led away, and forced to give up the golden dress; and when she saw that there was no help for her, she went out into a meadow, and sat herself down and wept.
But as she sat she bethought herself of the egg that the moon had given her; and when she broke it, there ran out a hen and twelve chickens of pure gold, that played about, and then nestled under the old one's wings, so as to form the most beautiful sight in the world.
And she rose up and drove them before her, till the bride saw them from her window, and was so pleased that she came forth and asked her if she would sell the brood.
for flesh and blood: let me again this evening speak with the bridegroom in his chamber, and I will give thee the whole brood.
Then the princess thought to betray her as before, and agreed to what she asked: but when the prince went to his chamber he asked the chamberlain why the wind had whistled so in the night.
And the chamberlain told him all--how he had given him a sleeping draught, and how a poor maiden had come and spoken to him in his chamber, and was to come again that night.
Then the prince took care to throw away the sleeping draught; and when Lily came and began again to tell him what woes had befallen her, and how faithful and true to him she had been, he knew his beloved wife's voice, and sprang up, and said, 'You have awakened me as from a dream, for the strange princess had thrown a spell around me, so that I had altogether forgotten you; but Heaven hath sent you to me in a lucky hour.
And they stole away out of the palace by night unawares, and seated themselves on the griffin, who flew back with them over the Red Sea.
There they found their child, now grown up to be comely and fair; and after all their troubles they lived happily together to the end of their days.
THE FOX AND THE HORSE A farmer had a horse that had been an excellent faithful servant to him: but he was now grown too old to work; so the farmer would give him nothing more to eat, and said, 'I want you no longer, so take yourself off out of my stable; I shall not take you back again until you are stronger than a lion.
' Then he opened the door and turned him adrift.
The poor horse was very melancholy, and wandered up and down in the wood, seeking some little shelter from the cold wind and rain.
Presently a fox met him: 'What's the matter, my friend?
' said he, 'why do you hang?
down your head and look so lonely and woe-begone?' 'Ah!
' replied the!
horse, 'justice and avarice never dwell in one house; my master has forgotten all that I have done for him so many years, and because I can no longer work he has turned me adrift, and says unless I become stronger than a lion he will not take me back again; what chance can I have of that? he knows I have none, or he would not talk so.
However, the fox bid him be of good cheer, and said, 'I will help you; lie down there, stretch yourself out quite stiff, and pretend to be dead.
' The horse did as he was told, and the fox went straight to the.
when they came to the horse, the fox said, 'You will not be able to eat him comfortably here; I'll tell you what--I will tie you fast to his tail, and then you can draw him to your den, and eat him at your leisure.
This advice pleased the lion, so he laid himself down quietly for the fox to make him fast to the horse.
But the fox managed to tie his legs together and bound all so hard and fast that with all his strength he could not set himself free.
When the work was done, the fox clapped the horse on the shoulder, and said, 'Jip!
Dobbin!
Jip!
' Then up he sprang,!
The beast began to roar and bellow, till all the birds of the wood flew away for fright; but the horse let him sing on, and made his way quietly over the fields to his master's house.
'Here he is, master,' said he, 'I have got the better of him': and when the farmer saw his old servant, his heart relented, and he said.
'Thou.
shalt stay in thy stable and be well taken care of.
horse had plenty to eat, and lived--till he died.
The king said to him: 'You may return to your home, I need you no longer, and you will not receive any more money, for he only receives wages who renders me service for them.
' Then the soldier did not know how to earn a living,.
When darkness came on, he saw a light, which he went up to, and came to a house wherein lived a witch.
'Do give.
' 'Oho!' she answered, 'who gives anything to a.
run-away soldier?
Yet will I be compassionate, and take you in, if you will do what I wish.
' The soldier consented,.
and next day laboured with all his strength, but could not finish it by the evening.
soldier spent the whole day in doing it, and in the evening the witch proposed that he should stay one night more.
do me a very trifling piece of work.
Behind my house, there is an old dry well, into which my light has fallen, it burns blue, and never goes out, and you shall bring it up again.
' Next day the old woman took him.
He found the blue light, and made her a signal to draw him up again.
She did draw him up, but when he came near the edge, she stretched down her hand and wanted to take the blue light away from him.
'No,' said he, perceiving her evil intention,.
'I will not give you the light until I am standing with both feet upon the ground.
' The witch fell into a passion, let him fall again into the.
well, and went away.
The poor soldier fell without injury on the moist ground, and the blue light went on burning, but of what use was that to him?
He saw very well that he could not escape death.
He sat for a while very sorrowfully, then suddenly he felt in his pocket and found his tobacco pipe, which was still half full.
'This shall be my last pleasure,' thought he,.
pulled it out, lit it at the blue light and began to smoke.
When the smoke had circled about the cavern, suddenly a little black dwarf stood before him, and said: 'Lord, what are your commands?
' 'What my commands?
'I must do everything you.
bid me,' said the little man.
'Good,' said the soldier; 'then in the.
first place help me out of this well.
hand, and led him through an underground passage, but he did not forget to take the blue light with him.
On the way the dwarf showed him the treasures which the witch had collected and hidden there, and the soldier took as much gold as he could carry.
When he was above, he said to the little man: 'Now go and bind the old witch, and carry her before the judge.
' In a short time she came by like the wind, riding on a wild.
tom-cat and screaming frightfully.
Nor was it long before the little man reappeared.
'It is all done,' said he, 'and the witch is already hanging.
on the gallows.
What further commands has my lord?' inquired the dwarf.
'At this moment, none,' answered the soldier; 'you can return home, only be at hand immediately, if I summon you.
' 'Nothing more is needed than.
that you should light your pipe at the blue light, and I will appear before you at once.
' Thereupon he vanished from his sight.
The soldier returned to the town from which he came.
He went to the best inn, ordered himself handsome clothes, and then bade the landlord furnish him a room as handsome as possible.
When it was ready and the soldier had taken possession of it, he summoned the little black manikin and said: 'I have served the king faithfully, but he has dismissed me, and left me to hunger, and now I want to take my revenge.
do?' asked the little man.
'Late at night, when the king's daughter is.
in bed, bring her here in her sleep, she shall do servant's work for me.
dangerous thing for you, for if it is discovered, you will fare ill.
When twelve o'clock had struck, the door sprang open, and the manikin carried in the princess.
'Aha! are you there?' cried the soldier, 'get.
to your work at once!
Fetch the broom and sweep the chamber.
she had done this, he ordered her to come to his chair, and then he stretched out his feet and said: 'Pull off my boots,' and then he threw them in her face, and made her pick them up again, and clean and brighten them.
She, however, did everything he bade her, without opposition, silently and with half-shut eyes.
When the first cock crowed, the manikin carried her back to the royal palace, and laid her in her bed.
Next morning when the princess arose she went to her father, and told him that she had had a very strange dream.
'I was carried through the.
streets with the rapidity of lightning,' said she, 'and taken into a soldier's room, and I had to wait upon him like a servant, sweep his room, clean his boots, and do all kinds of menial work.
It was only a dream, and yet I am just as tired as if I really had done everything.
'The dream may have been true,' said the king.
'I will give you a piece.
of advice.
Fill your pocket full of peas, and make a small hole in the pocket, and then if you are carried away again, they will fall out and leave a track in the streets.
' But unseen by the king, the manikin was.
At night when the sleeping princess was again carried through the streets, some peas certainly did fall out of her pocket, but they made no track, for the crafty manikin had just before scattered peas in every street there was.
And again the princess was compelled to do servant's work until cock-crow.
Next morning the king sent his people out to seek the track, but it was all in vain, for in every street poor children were sitting, picking up peas, and saying: 'It must have rained peas, last night.
' 'We must think.
of something else,' said the king; 'keep your shoes on when you go to bed, and before you come back from the place where you are taken, hide one of them there, I will soon contrive to find it.
' The black manikin.
heard this plot, and at night when the soldier again ordered him to bring the princess, revealed it to him, and told him that he knew of no expedient to counteract this stratagem, and that if the shoe were found in the soldier's house it would go badly with him.
'Do what I bid you,'.
replied the soldier, and again this third night the princess was obliged to work like a servant, but before she went away, she hid her shoe under the bed.
Next morning the king had the entire town searched for his daughter's shoe.
It was found at the soldier's, and the soldier himself, who at the entreaty of the dwarf had gone outside the gate, was soon brought back, and thrown into prison.
In his flight he had forgotten the most valuable things he had, the blue light and the gold, and had only one ducat in his pocket.
And now loaded with chains, he was standing at the window of his dungeon, when he chanced to see one of his comrades passing by.
' His comrade ran.
thither and brought him what he wanted.
As soon as the soldier was alone again, he lighted his pipe and summoned the black manikin.
'Have no.
fear,' said the latter to his master.
'Go wheresoever they take you, and.
let them do what they will, only take the blue light with you.
' Next day.
the soldier was tried, and though he had done nothing wicked, the judge condemned him to death.
When he was led forth to die, he begged a last favour of the king.
'That I may smoke one.
more pipe on my way.
' 'You may smoke three,' answered the king, 'but do.
not imagine that I will spare your life.
his pipe and lighted it at the blue light, and as soon as a few wreaths of smoke had ascended, the manikin was there with a small cudgel in his hand, and said: 'What does my lord command?
' 'Strike down to earth that?
darting this way and that way, and whosoever was so much as touched by his cudgel fell to earth, and did not venture to stir again.
The king was terrified; he threw himself on the soldier's mercy, and merely to be allowed to live at all, gave him his kingdom for his own, and his daughter to wife.
One day the child was very troublesome, and the mother could not quiet it, do what she would.
She grew impatient, and seeing the ravens flying round the castle, she opened the window, and said: 'I wish you were a raven and would fly away, then I should have a little peace.
The bird took its flight to a dark wood and remained there for a long time, and meanwhile the parents could hear nothing of their child.
Long after this, a man was making his way through the wood when he heard a raven calling, and he followed the sound of the voice.
As he drew near, the raven said, 'I am by birth a king's daughter, but am now under the spell of some enchantment; you can, however, set me free.
am I to do?' he asked.
She replied, 'Go farther into the wood until you come to a house, wherein lives an old woman; she will offer you food and drink, but you must not take of either; if you do, you will fall into a deep sleep, and will not be able to help me.
In the garden behind the house is a large tan-heap, and on that you must stand and watch for me.
I shall drive there in my carriage at two o'clock in the afternoon for three successive days; the first day it will be drawn by four white, the second by four chestnut, and the last by four black horses; but if you fail to keep awake and I find you sleeping, I shall not be set free.
I know even now that you will take something from the woman and be unable to save me.
' The man assured her again that he would on no account touch.
a thing to eat or drink.
When he came to the house and went inside, the old woman met him, and said, 'Poor man!
Come in and rest and let me give you something to eat and drink.
But she would not leave him alone, and urged him saying, 'If you will not eat anything, at least you might take a draught of wine; one drink counts for nothing,' and at last he allowed himself to be persuaded, and drank.
As it drew towards the appointed hour, he went outside into the garden and mounted the tan-heap to await the raven.
At two o'clock the raven came driving along, drawn by her four white horses; but even before she reached the spot, she said to herself, sighing, 'I know he has fallen asleep.
' When she entered the garden, there she found.
him as she had feared, lying on the tan-heap, fast asleep.
The next day at noon, the old woman came to him again with food and drink which he at first refused.
Towards two o'clock he went into the garden and on to the tan-heap to watch for the raven.
He had not been there long before he began to feel so tired that his limbs seemed hardly able to support him, and he could not stand upright any longer; so again he lay down and fell fast asleep.
As the raven drove along her four chestnut horses, she said sorrowfully to herself, 'I know he has fallen asleep.
' She went as before to look.
for him, but he slept, and it was impossible to awaken him.
The following day the old woman said to him, 'What is this?
You are not eating or drinking anything, do you want to kill yourself?
He answered, 'I may not and will not either eat or drink.
But she put down the dish of food and the glass of wine in front of him, and when he smelt the wine, he was unable to resist the temptation, and took a deep draught.
When the hour came round again he went as usual on to the tan-heap in the garden to await the king's daughter, but he felt even more overcome with weariness than on the two previous days, and throwing himself down, he slept like a log.
At two o'clock the raven could be seen approaching, and this time her coachman and everything about her, as well as her horses, were black.
She was sadder than ever as she drove along, and said mournfully, 'I know he has fallen asleep, and will not be able to set me free.
found him sleeping heavily, and all her efforts to awaken him were of no avail.
Then she placed beside him a loaf, and some meat, and a flask of wine, of such a kind, that however much he took of them, they would never grow less.
After that she drew a gold ring, on which her name was engraved, off her finger, and put it upon one of his.
Finally, she laid a letter near him, in which, after giving him particulars of the food and drink she had left for him, she finished with the following words: 'I see that as long as you remain here you will never be able to set me free; if, however, you still wish to do so, come to the golden castle of Stromberg; this is well within your power to accomplish.
' She then.
returned to her carriage and drove to the golden castle of Stromberg.
When the man awoke and found that he had been sleeping, he was grieved at heart, and said, 'She has no doubt been here and driven away again, and it is now too late for me to save her.
' Then his eyes fell on the.
things which were lying beside him; he read the letter, and knew from it all that had happened.
He rose up without delay, eager to start on his way and to reach the castle of Stromberg, but he had no idea in which direction he ought to go.
He travelled about a long time in search of it and came at last to a dark forest, through which he went on walking for fourteen days and still could not find a way out.
Once more the night came on, and worn out he lay down under a bush and fell asleep.
Again the next day he pursued his way through the forest, and that evening, thinking to rest again, he lay down as before, but he heard such a howling and wailing that he found it impossible to sleep.
He waited till it was darker and people had begun to light up their houses, and then seeing a little glimmer ahead of him, he went towards it.
He thought to himself, 'If the giant sees me going in, my life will not be worth much.
' However, after a.
When the giant saw him, he called out, 'It is lucky for that you have come, for I have not had anything to eat for a long time.
I can have you now for my supper.
would rather you let that alone,' said the man, 'for I do not willingly give myself up to be eaten; if you are wanting food I have enough to satisfy your hunger.
' 'If that is so,' replied the giant, 'I will leave.
you in peace; I only thought of eating you because I had nothing else.
So they went indoors together and sat down, and the man brought out the bread, meat, and wine, which although he had eaten and drunk of them, were still unconsumed.
The giant was pleased with the good cheer, and ate and drank to his heart's content.
When he had finished his supper the man asked him if he could direct him to the castle of Stromberg.
The giant said, 'I will look on my map; on it are marked all the towns, villages, and houses.
' So he fetched his map, and looked for the castle,.
but could not find it.
'Never mind,' he said, 'I have larger maps.
upstairs in the cupboard, we will look on those,' but they searched in vain, for the castle was not marked even on these.
The man now thought he should like to continue his journey, but the giant begged him to remain for a day or two longer until the return of his brother, who was away in search of provisions.
When the brother came home, they asked him about the castle of Stromberg, and he told them he would look on his own maps as soon as he had eaten and appeased his hunger.
Accordingly, when he had finished his supper, they all went up together to his room and looked through his maps, but the castle was not to be found.
Then he fetched other older maps, and they went on looking for the castle until at last they found it, but it was many thousand miles away.
'How shall I.
be able to get there?' asked the man.
'I have two hours to spare,' said.
the giant, 'and I will carry you into the neighbourhood of the castle; I must then return to look after the child who is in our care.
The giant, thereupon, carried the man to within about a hundred leagues of the castle, where he left him, saying, 'You will be able to walk the remainder of the way yourself.
' The man journeyed on day and night.
He found it situated, however, on a glass mountain, and looking up from the foot he saw the enchanted maiden drive round her castle and then go inside.
He was overjoyed to see her, and longed to get to the top of the mountain, but the sides were so slippery that every time he attempted to climb he fell back again.
Looking out from his hut one day he saw three robbers fighting and he called out to them, 'God be with you.
' They stopped when they heard the.
call, but looking round and seeing nobody, they went on again with their fighting, which now became more furious.
'God be with you,' he cried.
A third time he called out, 'God be with you,' and then thinking he should like to know the cause of dispute between the three men, he went out and asked them why they were fighting so angrily with one another.
One of them said that he had found a stick, and that he had but to strike it against any door through which he wished to pass, and it immediately flew open.
Another told him that he had found a cloak which rendered its wearer invisible; and the third had caught a horse which would carry its rider over any obstacle, and even up the glass mountain.
On hearing this, the man said, 'I will give you something in exchange for those three things; not money, for that I have not got, but something that is of far more value.
robbers, therefore, made him get on the horse, and handed him the stick and the cloak, and when he had put this round him he was no longer visible.
Then he fell upon them with the stick and beat them one after another, crying, 'There, you idle vagabonds, you have got what you deserve; are you satisfied now!
After this he rode up the glass mountain.
When he reached the gate of the castle, he found it closed, but he gave it a blow with his stick, and it flew wide open at once and he passed through.
She could not see him for he still wore his cloak.
He took the ring which she had given him off his finger, and threw it into the goblet, so that it rang as it touched the bottom.
'That is my own ring,' she exclaimed, 'and if that is so the man must also be here who is coming to set me free.
She sought for him about the castle, but could find him nowhere.
When therefore she came to the castle gate she saw him, and cried aloud for joy.
Then he dismounted and took her in his arms; and she kissed him, and said, 'Now you have indeed set me free, and tomorrow we will celebrate our marriage.
THE GOLDEN GOOSE There was a man who had three sons, the youngest of whom was called Dummling,[*] and was despised, mocked, and sneered at on every occasion.
When he entered the forest he met a little grey-haired old man who bade him good day, and said: 'Do give me a piece of cake out of your pocket, and let me have a draught of your wine; I am so hungry and thirsty.
' But.
the clever son answered: 'If I give you my cake and wine, I shall have none for myself; be off with you,' and he left the little man standing and went on.
But when he began to hew down a tree, it was not long before he made a false stroke, and the axe cut him in the arm, so that he had to go home and have it bound up.
And this was the little grey man's doing.
After this the second son went into the forest, and his mother gave him, like the eldest, a cake and a bottle of wine.
The little old grey man met him likewise, and asked him for a piece of cake and a drink of wine.
' and he left the little man standing and!
His punishment, however, was not delayed; when he had made a few blows at the tree he struck himself in the leg, so that he had to be carried home.
Then Dummling said: 'Father, do let me go and cut wood.
' The father.
answered: 'Your brothers have hurt themselves with it, leave it alone, you do not understand anything about it.
' But Dummling begged so long.
that at last he said: 'Just go then, you will get wiser by hurting yourself.
' His mother gave him a cake made with water and baked in the.
cinders, and with it a bottle of sour beer.
When he came to the forest the little old grey man met him likewise, and greeting him, said: 'Give me a piece of your cake and a drink out of your bottle; I am so hungry and thirsty.
' Dummling answered: 'I have.
only cinder-cake and sour beer; if that pleases you, we will sit down and eat.
' So they sat down, and when Dummling pulled out his.
cinder-cake, it was a fine sweet cake, and the sour beer had become good wine.
So they ate and drank, and after that the little man said: 'Since you have a good heart, and are willing to divide what you have, I will give you good luck.
There stands an old tree, cut it down, and you will find something at the roots.
' Then the little man took leave of him.
Dummling went and cut down the tree, and when it fell there was a goose sitting in the roots with feathers of pure gold.
He lifted her up, and taking her with him, went to an inn where he thought he would stay the night.
Now the host had three daughters, who saw the goose and were curious to know what such a wonderful bird might be, and would have liked to have one of its golden feathers.
The eldest thought: 'I shall soon find an opportunity of pulling out a feather,' and as soon as Dummling had gone out she seized the goose by the wing, but her finger and hand remained sticking fast to it.
The second came soon afterwards, thinking only of how she might get a feather for herself, but she had scarcely touched her sister than she was held fast.
At last the third also came with the like intent, and the others screamed out: 'Keep away; for goodness' sake keep away!
' But she did!
not understand why she was to keep away.
thought, 'I may as well be there too,' and ran to them; but as soon as she had touched her sister, she remained sticking fast to her.
So they had to spend the night with the goose.
The next morning Dummling took the goose under his arm and set out, without troubling himself about the three girls who were hanging on to it.
They were obliged to run after him continually, now left, now right, wherever his legs took him.
In the middle of the fields the parson met them, and when he saw the procession he said: 'For shame, you good-for-nothing girls, why are you running across the fields after this young man?
' At the?
same time he seized the youngest by the hand in order to pull her away, but as soon as he touched her he likewise stuck fast, and was himself obliged to run behind.
Before long the sexton came by and saw his master, the parson, running behind three girls.
He was astonished at this and called out: 'Hi!
your reverence, whither away so quickly?
Do not forget that we have a christening today!
' and running after him he took him by the sleeve, but!
was also held fast to it.
Whilst the five were trotting thus one behind the other, two labourers came with their hoes from the fields; the parson called out to them and begged that they would set him and the sexton free.
But they had scarcely touched the sexton when they were held fast, and now there were seven of them running behind Dummling and the goose.
Soon afterwards he came to a city, where a king ruled who had a daughter who was so serious that no one could make her laugh.
So he had put forth a decree that whosoever should be able to make her laugh should marry her.
Thereupon Dummling asked to have her for his wife; but the king did not like the son-in-law, and made all manner of excuses and said he must first produce a man who could drink a cellarful of wine.
Dummling thought of the little grey man, who could certainly help him; so he went into the forest, and in the same place where he had felled the tree, he saw a man sitting, who had a very sorrowful face.
Dummling asked him what he was taking to heart so sorely, and he answered: 'I have such a great thirst and cannot quench it; cold water I cannot stand, a barrel of wine I have just emptied, but that to me is like a drop on a hot stone!
He led him into the king's cellar, and the man bent over the huge barrels, and drank and drank till his loins hurt, and before the day was out he had emptied all the barrels.
Then Dummling asked once more for his bride, but the king was vexed that such an ugly fellow, whom everyone called Dummling, should take away his daughter, and he made a new condition; he must first find a man who could eat a whole mountain of bread.
Dummling did not think long, but went straight into the forest, where in the same place there sat a man who was tying up his body with a strap, and making an awful face, and saying: 'I have eaten a whole ovenful of rolls, but what good is that when one has such a hunger as I?
My stomach remains empty, and I must tie myself up if I am not to die of hunger.
At this Dummling was glad, and said: 'Get up and come with me; you shall eat yourself full.
' He led him to the king's palace where all the.
flour in the whole Kingdom was collected, and from it he caused a huge mountain of bread to be baked.
The man from the forest stood before it, began to eat, and by the end of one day the whole mountain had vanished.
'As soon as you come sailing back in it,' said he, 'you shall.
have my daughter for wife.
Dummling went straight into the forest, and there sat the little grey man to whom he had given his cake.
When he heard what Dummling wanted, he said: 'Since you have given me to eat and to drink, I will give you the ship; and I do all this because you once were kind to me.
' Then he.
The wedding was celebrated, and after the king's death, Dummling inherited his kingdom and lived for a long time contentedly with his wife.
[*] Simpleton THE WATER OF LIFE Long before you or I were born, there reigned, in a country a great way off, a king who had three sons.
This king once fell very ill--so ill that nobody thought he could live.
His sons were very much grieved at their father's sickness; and as they were walking together very mournfully in the garden of the palace, a little old man met them and asked what was the matter.
They told him that their father was very ill, and that they were afraid nothing could save him.
'I know what would,'.
If he could have a draught of it he would be well again; but it is very hard to get.
'I had.
rather die than place you in such great danger as you must meet with in your journey.
' But he begged so hard that the king let him go; and the.
prince thought to himself, 'If I bring my father this water, he will make me sole heir to his kingdom.
' 'What is that to thee, you ugly imp?
' said?
the prince haughtily, and rode on.
But the dwarf was enraged at his behaviour, and laid a fairy spell of ill-luck upon him; so that as he rode on the mountain pass became narrower and narrower, and at last the way was so straitened that he could not go to step forward: and when he thought to have turned his horse round and go back the way he came, he heard a loud laugh ringing round him, and found that the path was closed behind him, so that he was shut in all round.
Meantime the old king was lingering on in daily hope of his son's return, till at last the second son said, 'Father, I will go in search of the Water of Life.
' For he thought to himself, 'My brother is surely.
dead, and the kingdom will fall to me if I find the water.
' The king was.
at first very unwilling to let him go, but at last yielded to his wish.
So he set out and followed the same road which his brother had done, and met with the same elf, who stopped him at the same spot in the mountains, saying, as before, 'Prince, prince, whither so fast?
' 'Mind?
But the dwarf put the same spell upon him as he put on his elder brother, and he, too, was at last obliged to take up his abode in the heart of the mountains.
Thus it is with proud silly people, who think themselves above everyone else, and are too proud to ask or take advice.
When the second prince had thus been gone a long time, the youngest son said he would go and search for the Water of Life, and trusted he should soon be able to make his father well again.
So he set out, and the dwarf met him too at the same spot in the valley, among the mountains, and said, 'Prince, whither so fast?
Pray be kind, and aid me if you can!
where it is to be found?' asked the dwarf.
'No,' said the prince, 'I do.
not.
Pray tell me if you know.
' 'Then as you have spoken to me kindly,.
The water you seek springs from a well in an enchanted castle; and, that you may be able to reach it in safety, I will give you an iron wand and two little loaves of bread; strike the iron door of the castle three times with the wand, and it will open: two hungry lions will be lying down inside gaping for their prey, but if you throw them the bread they will let you pass; then hasten on to the well, and take some of the Water of Life before the clock strikes twelve; for if you tarry longer the door will shut upon you for ever.
The door flew open at the third stroke of the wand, and when the lions were quieted he went on through the castle and came at length to a beautiful hall.
Around it he saw several knights sitting in a trance; then he pulled off their rings and put them on his own fingers.
In another room he saw on a table a sword and a loaf of bread, which he also took.
Further on he came to a room where a beautiful young lady sat upon a couch; and she welcomed him joyfully, and said, if he would set her free from the spell that bound her, the kingdom should be his, if he would come back in a year and marry her.
Then she told him that the well that held the Water of Life was in the palace gardens; and bade him make haste, and draw what he wanted before the clock struck twelve.
So he laid himself down, and sleep fell upon him unawares, so that he did not wake up till the clock was striking a quarter to twelve.
Just as he was going out of the iron door it struck twelve, and the door fell so quickly upon him that it snapped off a piece of his heel.
When he found himself safe, he was overjoyed to think that he had got the Water of Life; and as he was going on his way homewards, he passed by the little dwarf, who, when he saw the sword and the loaf, said, 'You have made a noble prize; with the sword you can at a blow slay whole armies, and the bread will never fail you.
' Then the prince thought.
to himself, 'I cannot go home to my father without my brothers'; so he said, 'My dear friend, cannot you tell me where my two brothers are, who set out in search of the Water of Life before me, and never came back?
'I have shut them up by a charm between two mountains,' said the dwarf, 'because they were proud and ill-behaved, and scorned to ask advice.
The prince begged so hard for his brothers, that the dwarf at last set them free, though unwillingly, saying, 'Beware of them, for they have bad hearts.
' Their brother, however, was greatly rejoiced to see them,.
and told them all that had happened to him; how he had found the Water of Life, and had taken a cup full of it; and how he had set a beautiful princess free from a spell that bound her; and how she had engaged to wait a whole year, and then to marry him, and to give him the kingdom.
Then they all three rode on together, and on their way home came to a country that was laid waste by war and a dreadful famine, so that it was feared all must die for want.
But the prince gave the king of the land the bread, and all his kingdom ate of it.
And he lent the king the wonderful sword, and he slew the enemy's army with it; and thus the kingdom was once more in peace and plenty.
In the same manner he befriended two other countries through which they passed on their way.
Then they waited till he was fast asleep, and poured the Water of Life out of the cup, and took it for themselves, giving him bitter sea-water instead.
When they came to their journey's end, the youngest son brought his cup to the sick king, that he might drink and be healed.
Scarcely, however, had he tasted the bitter sea-water when he became worse even than he was before; and then both the elder sons came in, and blamed the youngest for what they had done; and said that he wanted to poison their father, but that they had found the Water of Life, and had brought it with them.
He no sooner began to drink of what they brought him, than he felt his sickness leave him, and was as strong and well as in his younger days.
Then they went to their brother, and laughed at him, and said, 'Well, brother, you found the Water of Life, did you?
You have had the trouble and we shall have the reward.
Pray, with all your cleverness, why did not you manage to keep your eyes open?
Next year one of us will take away your beautiful princess, if you do not take care.
You had better say nothing about this to our father, for he does not believe a word you say; and if you tell tales, you shall lose your life into the bargain: but be quiet, and we will let you off.
The old king was still very angry with his youngest son, and thought that he really meant to have taken away his life; so he called his court together, and asked what should be done, and all agreed that he ought to be put to death.
The prince knew nothing of what was going on, till one day, when the king's chief huntsmen went a-hunting with him, and they were alone in the wood together, the huntsman looked so sorrowful that the prince said, 'My friend, what is the matter with you?
' 'I cannot and?
But the prince begged very hard, and said, 'Only tell me what it is, and do not think I shall be angry, for I will forgive you.
shoot you.
' The prince started at this, and said, 'Let me live, and I.
will change dresses with you; you shall take my royal coat to show to my father, and do you give me your shabby one.
' 'With all my heart,' said.
the huntsman; 'I am sure I shall be glad to save you, for I could not have shot you.
' Then he took the prince's coat, and gave him the shabby.
one, and went away through the wood.
This touched the old king's heart, and he thought his son might still be guiltless, and said to his court, 'O that my son were still alive!
how it grieves me that I had him killed!
' 'He is still alive,'!
said the huntsman; 'and I am glad that I had pity on him, but let him go in peace, and brought home his royal coat.
' At this the king was.
overwhelmed with joy, and made it known throughout all his kingdom, that if his son would come back to his court he would forgive him.
Meanwhile the princess was eagerly waiting till her deliverer should come back; and had a road made leading up to her palace all of shining gold; and told her courtiers that whoever came on horseback, and rode straight up to the gate upon it, was her true lover; and that they must let him in: but whoever rode on one side of it, they must be sure was not the right one; and that they must send him away at once.
As he came before the palace and saw the golden road, he stopped to look at it, and he thought to himself, 'It is a pity to ride upon this beautiful road'; so he turned aside and rode on the right-hand side of it.
But when he came to the gate, the guards, who had seen the road he took, said to him, he could not be what he said he was, and must go about his business.
The second prince set out soon afterwards on the same errand; and when he came to the golden road, and his horse had set one foot upon it, he stopped to look at it, and thought it very beautiful, and said to himself, 'What a pity it is that anything should tread here!
' Then he!
too turned aside and rode on the left side of it.
But when he came to the gate the guards said he was not the true prince, and that he too must go away about his business; and away he went.
Now when the full year was come round, the third brother left the forest in which he had lain hid for fear of his father's anger, and set out in search of his betrothed bride.
So he journeyed on, thinking of her all the way, and rode so quickly that he did not even see what the road was made of, but went with his horse straight over it; and as he came to the gate it flew open, and the princess welcomed him with joy, and said he was her deliverer, and should now be her husband and lord of the kingdom.
Then he told him everything; how his brothers had cheated and robbed him, and yet that he had borne all those wrongs for the love of his father.
And now the old king gathered together his court, and asked all his kingdom to come and celebrate the wedding of his son and the princess.
And young and old, noble and squire, gentle and simple, came at once on the summons; and among the rest came the friendly dwarf, with the sugarloaf hat, and a new scarlet cloak.
And the wedding was held, and the merry bells run.
THE TWELVE HUNTSMEN There was once a king's son who had a bride whom he loved very much.
And when he was sitting beside her and very happy, news came that his father lay sick unto death, and desired to see him once again before his end.
When I am king, I will return and fetch you.
' So he rode away, and when he reached his father, the latter was.
dangerously ill, and near his death.
He said to him: 'Dear son, I wished to see you once again before my end, promise me to marry as I wish,' and he named a certain king's daughter who was to be his wife.
The son was in such trouble that he did not think what he was doing, and said: 'Yes, dear father, your will shall be done,' and thereupon the king shut his eyes, and died.
His first betrothed heard of this, and fretted so much about his faithfulness that she nearly died.
Then her father said to her: 'Dearest child, why are you so sad?
You shall have whatsoever you will.
' She thought for a moment and said: 'Dear father,.
I wish for eleven girls exactly like myself in face, figure, and size.
The father said: 'If it be possible, your desire shall be fulfilled,' and he caused a search to be made in his whole kingdom, until eleven young maidens were found who exactly resembled his daughter in face, figure, and size.
Thereupon she took her leave of her father, and rode away with them, and rode to the court of her former betrothed, whom she loved so dearly.
Then she asked if he required any huntsmen, and if he would take all of them into his service.
The king looked at her and did not know her, but as they were such handsome fellows, he said: 'Yes,' and that he would willingly take them, and now they were the king's twelve huntsmen.
The king, however, had a lion which was a wondrous animal, for he knew all concealed and secret things.
It came to pass that one evening he said to the king: 'You think you have twelve huntsmen?
' 'Yes,' said the?
king, 'they are twelve huntsmen.
they are twelve girls.
' The king said: 'That cannot be true!.
' 'Oh, just let some peas be strewn in the?
ante-chamber,' answered the lion, 'and then you will soon see.
Men have a firm step, and when they walk over peas none of them stir, but girls trip and skip, and drag their feet, and the peas roll about.
There was, however, a servant of the king's who favoured the huntsmen, and when he heard that they were going to be put to this test he went to them and repeated everything, and said: 'The lion wants to make the king believe that you are girls.
' Then the king's daughter thanked him, and.
said to her maidens: 'Show some strength, and step firmly on the peas.
So next morning when the king had the twelve huntsmen called before him, and they came into the ante-chamber where the peas were lying, they stepped so firmly on them, and had such a strong, sure walk, that not one of the peas either rolled or stirred.
' The lion said: 'They have been informed that they were going to.
be put to the test, and have assumed some strength.
Just let twelve spinning-wheels be brought into the ante-chamber, and they will go to them and be pleased with them, and that is what no man would do.
The king liked the advice, and had the spinning-wheels placed in the ante-chamber.
So when they were alone the king's daughter said to her eleven girls: 'Show some constraint, and do not look round at the spinning-wheels.
' And next morning when the king had his twelve.
huntsmen summoned, they went through the ante-chamber, and never once looked at the spinning-wheels.
' The lion replied: 'They have restrained themselves.
The king, however, would no longer believe the lion.
Now it came to pass that once when they were out hunting, news came that the king's bride was approaching.
When the true bride heard that, it hurt her so much that her heart was almost broken, and she fell fainting to the ground.
The king thought something had happened to his dear huntsman, ran up to him, wanted to help him, and drew his glove off.
Then he saw the ring which he had given to his first bride, and when he looked in her face he recognized her.
Then his heart was so touched that he kissed her, and when she opened her eyes he said: 'You are mine, and I am yours, and no one in the world can alter that.
' He sent a messenger to the other.
bride, and entreated her to return to her own kingdom, for he had a wife already, and someone who had just found an old key did not require a new one.
Thereupon the wedding was celebrated, and the lion was again taken into favour, because, after all, he had told the truth.
THE KING OF THE GOLDEN MOUNTAIN There was once a merchant who had only one child, a son, that was very young, and barely able to run alone.
He had two richly laden ships then making a voyage upon the seas, in which he had embarked all his wealth, in the hope of making great gains, when the news came that both were lost.
Thus from being a rich man he became all at once so very poor that nothing was left to him but one small plot of land; and there he often went in an evening to take his walk, and ease his mind of a little of his trouble.
One day, as he was roaming along in a brown study, thinking with no great comfort on what he had been and what he now was, and was like to be, all on a sudden there stood before him a little, rough-looking, black dwarf.
'Prithee, friend, why so sorrowful?' said he to the.
merchant; 'what is it you take so deeply to heart?
' 'If you would do me?
any good I would willingly tell you,' said the merchant.
I may?
' said the little man: 'tell me what ails you, and perhaps you?
will find I may be of some use.
' Then the merchant told him how all his.
wealth was gone to the bottom of the sea, and how he had nothing left but that little plot of land.
'Oh, trouble not yourself about that,'.
said the dwarf; 'only undertake to bring me here, twelve years hence, whatever meets you first on your going home, and I will give you as much as you please.
' The merchant thought this was no great thing to ask;.
that it would most likely be his dog or his cat, or something of that sort, but forgot his little boy Heinel; so he agreed to the bargain, and signed and sealed the bond to do what was asked of him.
But as he drew near home, his little boy was so glad to see him that he crept behind him, and laid fast hold of his legs, and looked up in his face and laughed.
Then the father started, trembling with fear and horror, and saw what it was that he had bound himself to do; but as no gold was come, he made himself easy by thinking that it was only a joke that the dwarf was playing him, and that, at any rate, when the money came, he should see the bearer, and would not take it in.
At the sight of this he was overjoyed, and forgetting all about his son, went into trade again, and became a richer merchant than before.
Meantime little Heinel grew up, and as the end of the twelve years drew near the merchant began to call to mind his bond, and became very sad and thoughtful; so that care and sorrow were written upon his face.
Then Heinel said, 'Father, give yourself very little trouble about that; I shall be too much for the little man.
When the time came, the father and son went out together to the place agreed upon: and the son drew a circle on the ground, and set himself and his father in the middle of it.
The little black dwarf soon came, and walked round and round about the circle, but could not find any way to get into it, and he either could not, or dared not, jump over it.
'Have you anything to say to us, my friend, or.
' Now Heinel had found a friend in a good fairy, that?
was fond of him, and had told him what to do; for this fairy knew what good luck was in store for him.
'Have you brought me what you said you.
would?' said the dwarf to the merchant.
' The dwarf said, 'I come to?
talk with your father, not with you.
' 'You have cheated and taken in my.
father,' said the son; 'pray give him up his bond at once.
' 'Fair and.
' 'You must have my consent to that first,' said.
Heinel, 'so please to step in here, and let us talk it over.
man grinned, and showed his teeth, as if he should have been very glad to get into the circle if he could.
Then at last, after a long talk, they came to terms.
Heinel agreed that his father must give him up, and that so far the dwarf should have his way: but, on the other hand, the fairy had told Heinel what fortune was in store for him, if he followed his own course; and he did not choose to be given up to his hump-backed friend, who seemed so anxious for his company.
So, to make a sort of drawn battle of the matter, it was settled that Heinel should be put into an open boat, that lay on the sea-shore hard by; that the father should push him off with his own hand, and that he should thus be set adrift, and left to the bad or good luck of wind and weather.
Then he took leave of his father, and set himself in the boat, but before it got far off a wave struck it, and it fell with one side low in the water, so the merchant thought that poor Heinel was lost, and went home very sorrowful, while the dwarf went his way, thinking that at any rate he had had his revenge.
The young man sat safe within, till at length it ran ashore upon an unknown land.
' So he once.
more searched the whole palace through, till at last he found a white snake, lying coiled up on a cushion in one of the chambers.
Now the white snake was an enchanted princess; and she was very glad to see him, and said, 'Are you at last come to set me free?
Twelve long years have I waited here for the fairy to bring you hither as she promised, for you alone can save me.
This night twelve men will come: their faces will be black, and they will be dressed in chain armour.
They will ask what you do here, but give no answer; and let them do what they will--beat, whip, pinch, prick, or torment you--bear all; only speak not a word, and at twelve o'clock they must go away.
The second night twelve others will come: and the third night twenty-four, who will even cut off your head; but at the twelfth hour of that night their power is gone, and I shall be free, and will come and bring you the Water of Life, and will wash you with it, and bring you back to life and health.
' And all came to pass as she had said; Heinel bore all, and.
Joy and gladness burst forth throughout the castle, the wedding was celebrated, and he was crowned king of the Golden Mountain.
And thus eight years had passed over their heads, when the king thought of his father; and he began to long to see him once again.
But the queen was against his going, and said, 'I know well that misfortunes will come upon us if you go.
' However, he gave her no rest till she agreed.
At his going away she gave him a wishing-ring, and said, 'Take this ring, and put it on your finger; whatever you wish it will bring you; only promise never to make use of it to bring me hence to your father's house.
he said he would do what she asked, and put the ring on his finger, and wished himself near the town where his father lived.
So he went up to a neighbouring hill, where a shepherd dwelt, and borrowed his old frock, and thus passed unknown into the town.
When he came to his father's house, he said he was his son; but the merchant would not believe him, and said he had had but one son, his poor Heinel, who he knew was long since dead: and as he was only dressed like a poor shepherd, he would not even give him anything to eat.
they knew that what he had said was true.
He next told them how he was king of the Golden Mountain, and was married to a princess, and had a son seven years old.
But the merchant said, 'that can never be true; he must be a fine king truly who travels about in a shepherd's frock!
' At this the son was vexed; and forgetting!
his word, turned his ring, and wished for his queen and son.
In an instant they stood before him; but the queen wept, and said he had broken his word, and bad luck would follow.
He did all he could to soothe her, and she at last seemed to be appeased; but she was not so in truth, and was only thinking how she should punish him.
One day he took her to walk with him out of the town, and showed her the spot where the boat was set adrift upon the wide waters.
Then he sat himself down, and said, 'I am very much tired; sit by me, I will rest my head in your lap, and sleep a while.
' As soon as he had fallen asleep,.
however, she drew the ring from his finger, and crept softly away, and wished herself and her son at home in their kingdom.
'I can never go back to my father's house,' said he; 'they would say I am a sorcerer: I will journey forth into the world, till I come again to my kingdom.
So saying he set out and travelled till he came to a hill, where three giants were sharing their father's goods; and as they saw him pass they cried out and said, 'Little men have sharp wits; he shall part the goods between us.
' Now there was a sword that cut off an enemy's head whenever.
the wearer gave the words, 'Heads off!
'; a cloak that made the owner!
invisible, or gave him any form he pleased; and a pair of boots that carried the wearer wherever he wished.
Heinel said they must first let him try these wonderful things, then he might know how to set a value upon them.
'The cloak is very well,' said he: 'now.
give me the sword.
' 'No,' said they; 'not unless you undertake not to.
' So they gave it.
him, charging him to try it on a tree.
So the giants were left behind with no goods to share or quarrel about.
As Heinel came near his castle he heard the sound of merry music; and the people around told him that his queen was about to marry another husband.
Then he threw his cloak around him, and passed through the castle hall, and placed himself by the side of the queen, where no one saw him.
Upon this, fear and remorse came over her, and she went into her chamber alone, and sat there weeping; and he followed her there.
'Alas!' said.
'False and fickle one!' said he.
'One indeed came who set thee free, and.
Ought he to have had such treatment from thee?
' Then he went out and sent away the?
company, and said the wedding was at an end, for that he was come back to the kingdom.
But the princes, peers, and great men mocked at him.
However, he would enter into no parley with them, but only asked them if they would go in peace or not.
Then they turned upon him and tried to seize him; but he drew his sword.
'Heads Off!' cried he; and with the.
When the money was being counted out to him, it so happened that the doctor was sitting at table, and when the peasant saw how well he ate and drank, his heart desired what he saw, and would willingly have been a doctor too.
So he remained standing a while, and at length inquired if he too could not be a doctor.
'Oh, yes,' said the doctor,.
'that is soon managed.
' 'What must I do?' asked the peasant.
'In the.
peasant did everything that he had been told to do.
When he had doctored people awhile, but not long, a rich and great lord had some money stolen.
Then he was told about Doctor Knowall who lived in such and such a village, and must know what had become of the money.
So the lord had the horses harnessed to his carriage, drove out to the village, and asked Crabb if he were Doctor Knowall.
Yes, he was, he said.
Then he was to go with him and bring back the stolen money.
'Oh, yes, but Grete, my.
wife, must go too.
' The lord was willing, and let both of them have a.
himself with her at the table.
And when the first servant came with a dish of delicate fare, the peasant nudged his wife, and said: 'Grete, that was the first,' meaning that was the servant who brought the first dish.
The servant, however, thought he intended by that to say: 'That is the first thief,' and as he actually was so, he was terrified, and said to his comrade outside: 'The doctor knows all: we shall fare ill, he said I was the first.
' The second did not want to go in at all, but was.
So when he went in with his dish, the peasant nudged his wife, and said: 'Grete, that is the second.
' This servant was equally alarmed,.
and he got out as fast as he could.
The third fared no better, for the peasant again said: 'Grete, that is the third.
' The fourth had to carry.
in a dish that was covered, and the lord told the doctor that he was to show his skill, and guess what was beneath the cover.
' When the lord heard that, he cried: 'There! he.
knows it; he must also know who has the money!
On this the servants looked terribly uneasy, and made a sign to the doctor that they wished him to step outside for a moment.
With this the doctor was satisfied, and returned to the hall, sat down to the table, and said: 'My lord, now will I search in my book where the gold is hidden.
' The fifth servant, however, crept into the.
stove to hear if the doctor knew still more.
But the doctor sat still and opened his A B C book, turned the pages backwards and forwards, and looked for the cock.
As he could not find it immediately he said: 'I know you are there, so you had better come out!
' Then the fellow in the!
stove thought that the doctor meant him, and full of terror, sprang out, crying: 'That man knows everything!
where the money was, but did not say who had stolen it, and received from both sides much money in reward, and became a renowned man.
THE SEVEN RAVENS There was once a man who had seven sons, and last of all one daughter.
Although the little girl was very pretty, she was so weak and small that they thought she could not live; but they said she should at once be christened.
So the father sent one of his sons in haste to the spring to get some water, but the other six ran with him.
Each wanted to be first at drawing the water, and so they were in such a hurry that all let their pitchers fall into the well, and they stood very foolishly looking at one another, and did not know what to do, for none dared go home.
In the meantime the father was uneasy, and could not tell what made the young men stay so long.
'Surely,' said he, 'the whole seven must have.
forgotten themselves over some game of play'; and when he had waited still longer and they yet did not come, he flew into a rage and wished them all turned into ravens.
Scarcely had he spoken these words when he heard a croaking over his head, and looked up and saw seven ravens as black as coal flying round and round.
Sorry as he was to see his wish so fulfilled, he did not know how what was done could be undone, and comforted himself as well as he could for the loss of his seven sons with his dear little daughter, who soon became stronger and every day more beautiful.
For a long time she did not know that she had ever had any brothers; for her father and mother took care not to speak of them before her: but one day by chance she heard the people about her speak of them.
they, 'she is beautiful indeed, but still 'tis a pity that her brothers should have been lost for her sake.
' Then she was much grieved, and went.
to her father and mother, and asked if she had any brothers, and what had become of them.
She took nothing with her but a little ring which her father and mother had given her, a loaf of bread in case she should be hungry, a little pitcher of water in case she should be thirsty, and a little stool to rest upon when she should be weary.
' so she took herself away in a hurry and came to the!
stars, and the stars were friendly and kind to her, and each star sat upon his own little stool; but the morning star rose up and gave her a little piece of wood, and said, 'If you have not this little piece of wood, you cannot unlock the castle that stands on the glass-mountain, and there your brothers live.
rolled it up in a little cloth, and went on again until she came to the glass-mountain, and found the door shut.
Then she felt for the little piece of wood; but when she unwrapped the cloth it was not there, and she saw she had lost the gift of the good stars.
What was to be done?
She wanted to save her brothers, and had no key of the castle of the glass-mountain; so this faithful little sister took a knife out of her pocket and cut off her little finger, that was just the size of the piece of wood she had lost, and put it in the door and opened it.
As she went in, a little dwarf came up to her, and said, 'What are you seeking for?' 'I seek for my brothers, the seven ravens,' answered she.
Then the dwarf said, 'My masters are not at home; but if you will wait till they come, pray step in.
' Now the little dwarf was getting their.
dinner ready, and he brought their food upon seven little plates, and their drink in seven little glasses, and set them upon the table, and out of each little plate their sister ate a small piece, and out of each little glass she drank a small drop; but she let the ring that she had brought with her fall into the last glass.
On a sudden she heard a fluttering and croaking in the air, and the dwarf said, 'Here come my masters.
' When they came in, they wanted to.
Then said one after the other, 'Who has eaten from my little plate?
'Caw!
Caw!
When the seventh came to the bottom of his glass, and found there the ring, he looked at it, and knew that it was his father's and mother's, and said, 'O that our little sister would but come!
then we should be!
free.
' When the little girl heard this (for she stood behind the door.
all the time and listened), she ran forward, and in an instant all the ravens took their right form again; and all hugged and kissed each other, and went merrily home.
THE WEDDING OF MRS FOX FIRST STORY There was once upon a time an old fox with nine tails, who believed that his wife was not faithful to him, and wished to put her to the test.
He stretched himself out under the bench, did not move a limb, and behaved as if he were stone dead.
Mrs Fox went up to her room, shut herself in, and her maid, Miss Cat, sat by the fire, and did the cooking.
When it became known that the old fox was dead, suitors presented themselves.
The maid heard someone standing at the house-door, knocking.
She went and opened it, and it was a young fox, who said: 'What may you be about, Miss Cat?
Do you sleep or do you wake?
replied: 'She is sitting in her room, Moaning in her gloom, Weeping her little eyes quite red, Because old Mr Fox is dead.
' 'Certainly, young sir.
The cat goes up the stairs trip, trap, The door she knocks at tap, tap, tap, 'Mistress Fox, are you inside?
'Oh, yes, my little cat,' she cried.
'A wooer he stands at the door out there.
'Has he nine as beautiful tails as the late Mr Fox?
' 'Oh, no,' answered?
the cat, 'he has only one.
Soon afterwards there was another knock, and another fox was at the door who wished to woo Mrs Fox.
He had two tails, but he did not fare better than the first.
After this still more came, each with one tail more than the other, but they were all turned away, until at last one came who had nine tails, like old Mr Fox.
When the widow heard that, she said joyfully to the cat: 'Now open the gates and doors all wide, And carry old Mr Fox outside.
But just as the wedding was going to be solemnized, old Mr Fox stirred under the bench, and cudgelled all the rabble, and drove them and Mrs Fox out of the house.
The wolf greeted her, and said: 'Good day, Mrs Cat of Kehrewit, How comes it that alone you sit?
What are you making good?
The cat replied: 'In milk I'm breaking bread so sweet, Will you be my guest, and eat?
'No, thank you, Mrs Cat,' answered the wolf.
'Is Mrs Fox not at home?'.
The wolf answered: 'If she's in want of a husband now, Then will it please her to step below?
The cat runs quickly up the stair, And lets her tail fly here and there, Until she comes to the parlour door.
If you're in want of a husband now, Then will it please you to step below?
Mrs Fox asked: 'Has the gentleman red stockings on, and has he a pointed mouth?' 'No,' answered the cat.
'Then he won't do for me.
When the wolf was gone, came a dog, a stag, a hare, a bear, a lion, and all the beasts of the forest, one after the other.
But one of the good qualities which old Mr Fox had possessed, was always lacking, and the cat had continually to send the suitors away.
Then Mrs Fox said: 'Has the gentleman red stockings on, and has a little pointed mouth?' 'Yes,' said the cat, 'he has.
' 'Then let him come.
upstairs,' said Mrs Fox, and ordered the servant to prepare the wedding feast.
'Sweep me the room as clean as you can, Up with the window, fling out my old man!
For many a fine fat mouse he brought, Yet of his wife he never thought, But ate up every one he caught.
Then the wedding was solemnized with young Mr Fox, and there was much rejoicing and dancing; and if they have not left off, they are dancing still.
' The huntsman took pity on her, and put his hand in.
Then he wanted to go his way; but she took hold of him, and said, 'Listen, my friend, to what I am going to tell you; I will reward you for your kindness; go your way, and after a little time you will come to a tree where you will see nine birds sitting on a cloak.
Shoot into the midst of them, and one will fall down dead: the cloak will fall too; take it, it is a wishing-cloak, and when you wear it you will find yourself at any place where you may wish to be.
Cut open the dead bird, take out its heart and keep it, and you will find a piece of gold under your pillow every morning when you rise.
It is the bird's heart that will bring you this good luck.
The huntsman thanked her, and thought to himself, 'If all this does happen, it will be a fine thing for me.
' When he had gone a hundred.
wonderful; this happens just as the old woman said'; then he shot into the midst of them so that their feathers flew all about.
Off went the flock chattering away; but one fell down dead, and the cloak with it.
Then the huntsman did as the old woman told him, cut open the bird, took out the heart, and carried the cloak home with him.
The next morning when he awoke he lifted up his pillow, and there lay the piece of gold glittering underneath; the same happened next day, and indeed every day when he arose.
He heaped up a great deal of gold, and at last thought to himself, 'Of what use is this gold to me whilst I am at home?
I will go out into the world and look about me.
Then he took leave of his friends, and hung his bag and bow about his neck, and went his way.
It so happened that his road one day led through a thick wood, at the end of which was a large castle in a green meadow, and at one of the windows stood an old woman with a very beautiful young lady by her side looking about them.
He has a bird's heart that brings a piece of gold under his pillow every morning.
huntsman came nearer and looked at the lady, and said to himself, 'I have been travelling so long that I should like to go into this castle and rest myself, for I have money enough to pay for anything I want'; but the real reason was, that he wanted to see more of the beautiful lady.
Then he went into the house, and was welcomed kindly; and it was not long before he was so much in love that he thought of nothing else but looking at the lady's eyes, and doing everything that she wished.
Then the old woman said, 'Now is the time for getting the bird's heart.
So the lady stole it away, and he never found any more gold under his pillow, for it lay now under the young lady's, and the old woman took it away every morning; but he was so much in love that he never missed his prize.
' 'Let us leave him that,'.
said the young lady; 'he has already lost his wealth.
' Then the witch.
was very angry, and said, 'Such a cloak is a very rare and wonderful thing, and I must and will have it.
' So she did as the old woman told.
her, and set herself at the window, and looked about the country and seemed very sorrowful; then the huntsman said, 'What makes you so sad?
'Alas!
dear sir,' said she, 'yonder lies the granite rock where all the!
costly diamonds grow, and I want so much to go there, that whenever I think of it I cannot help being sorrowful, for who can reach it?
only?
the birds and the flies--man cannot.
' 'If that's all your grief,' said.
the huntsman, 'I'll take you there with all my heart'; so he drew her under his cloak, and the moment he wished to be on the granite mountain they were both there.
The diamonds glittered so on all sides that they were delighted with the sight and picked up the finest.
But the old witch made a deep sleep come upon him, and he said to the young lady, 'Let us sit down and rest ourselves a little, I am so tired that I cannot stand any longer.
' So they sat down, and he laid his head in her lap and.
fell asleep; and whilst he was sleeping on she took the cloak from his shoulders, hung it on her own, picked up the diamonds, and wished herself home again.
When he awoke and found that his lady had tricked him, and left him alone on the wild rock, he said, 'Alas!
what roguery there is in the!
world!
' and there he sat in great grief and fear, not knowing what to!
do.
Now this rock belonged to fierce giants who lived upon it; and as he saw three of them striding about, he thought to himself, 'I can only save myself by feigning to be asleep'; so he laid himself down as if he were in a sound sleep.
When the giants came up to him, the first pushed him with his foot, and said, 'What worm is this that lies here curled up?' 'Tread upon him and kill him,' said the second.
'It's not worth the.
trouble,' said the third; 'let him live, he'll go climbing higher up the mountain, and some cloud will come rolling and carry him away.
' And they.
passed on.
But the huntsman had heard all they said; and as soon as they were gone, he climbed to the top of the mountain, and when he had sat there a short time a cloud came rolling around him, and caught him in a whirlwind and bore him along for some time, till it settled in a garden, and he fell quite gently to the ground amongst the greens and cabbages.
' At last he.
' So he picked out a fine head and ate of it; but scarcely had he.
swallowed two bites when he felt himself quite changed, and saw with horror that he was turned into an ass.
However, he still felt very hungry, and the salad tasted very nice; so he ate on till he came to another kind of salad, and scarcely had he tasted it when he felt another change come over him, and soon saw that he was lucky enough to have found his old shape again.
Then he laid himself down and slept off a little of his weariness; and when he awoke the next morning he broke off a head both of the good and the bad salad, and thought to himself, 'This will help me to my fortune again, and enable me to pay off some folks for their treachery.
' So he.
went away to try and find the castle of his friends; and after wandering about a few days he luckily found it.
Then he stained his face all over brown, so that even his mother would not have known him, and went into the castle and asked for a lodging; 'I am so tired,' said he, 'that I can go no farther.
' 'Countryman,' said the witch, 'who are you? and what.
is your business?
' 'I am,' said he, 'a messenger sent by the king to?
find the finest salad that grows under the sun.
When the witch and the young lady heard of his beautiful salad, they longed to taste it, and said, 'Dear countryman, let us just taste it.
'To be sure,' answered he; 'I have two heads of it with me, and will give you one'; so he opened his bag and gave them the bad.
Now the servant-maid came into the kitchen, and seeing the salad ready, was going to carry it up; but on the way she too felt a wish to taste it as the old woman had done, and ate some leaves; so she also was turned into an ass and ran after the other, letting the dish with the salad fall on the ground.
The messenger sat all this time with the beautiful young lady, and as nobody came with the salad and she longed to taste it, she said, 'I don't know where the salad can be.
' And as he went he saw two asses in the court.
running about, and the salad lying on the ground.
'All right!' said.
he; 'those two have had their share.
' Then he took up the rest of.
the leaves, laid them on the dish and brought them to the young lady, saying, 'I bring you the dish myself that you may not wait any longer.
So she ate of it, and like the others ran off into the court braying away.
Then the huntsman washed his face and went into the court that they might know him.
'Now you shall be paid for your roguery,' said he; and.
tied them all three to a rope and took them along with him till he came to a mill and knocked at the window.
miller.
'I have three tiresome beasts here,' said the other; 'if you.
will take them, give them food and room, and treat them as I tell you, I will pay you whatever you ask.
' 'With all my heart,' said the miller;.
'but how shall I treat them?
' Then the huntsman said, 'Give the old?
one stripes three times a day and hay once; give the next (who was the servant-maid) stripes once a day and hay three times; and give the youngest (who was the beautiful lady) hay three times a day and no stripes': for he could not find it in his heart to have her beaten.
After this he went back to the castle, where he found everything he wanted.
Some days after, the miller came to him and told him that the old ass was dead; 'The other two,' said he, 'are alive and eat, but are so sorrowful that they cannot last long.
' Then the huntsman pitied them,.
and told the miller to drive them back to him, and when they came, he gave them some of the good salad to eat.
And the beautiful young lady fell upon her knees before him, and said, 'O dearest huntsman!
forgive!
me all the ill I have done you; my mother forced me to it, it was against my will, for I always loved you very much.
Your wishing-cloak hangs up in the closet, and as for the bird's heart, I will give it you too.
to make you my wife.
' So they were married, and lived together very.
happily till they died.
THE STORY OF THE YOUTH WHO WENT FORTH TO LEARN WHAT FEAR WAS A certain father had two sons, the elder of who was smart and sensible, and could do everything, but the younger was stupid and could neither learn nor understand anything, and when people saw him they said: 'There's a fellow who will give his father some trouble!
' When anything!
Or when stories were told by the fire at night which made the flesh creep, the listeners sometimes said: 'Oh, it makes us shudder!
' The younger sat in a corner and listened with!
'They are.
" It does not!
make me shudder,' thought he.
'That, too, must be an art of which I.
understand nothing!
Now it came to pass that his father said to him one day: 'Hearken to me, you fellow in the corner there, you are growing tall and strong, and you too must learn something by which you can earn your bread.
Look how your brother works, but you do not even earn your salt.
' 'Well, father,' he.
replied, 'I am quite willing to learn something--indeed, if it could but be managed, I should like to learn how to shudder.
' The elder brother smiled when he heard that, and.
thought to himself: 'Goodness, what a blockhead that brother of mine is!
He who wants to be a sickle must bend himself betimes.
The father sighed, and answered him: 'You shall soon learn what it is to shudder, but you will not earn your bread by that.
Soon after this the sexton came to the house on a visit, and the father bewailed his trouble, and told him how his younger son was so backward in every respect that he knew nothing and learnt nothing.
said he, 'when I asked him how he was going to earn his bread, he actually wanted to learn to shudder.
' 'If that be all,' replied the.
sexton, 'he can learn that with me.
Send him to me, and I will soon polish him.
' The father was glad to do it, for he thought: 'It will.
train the boy a little.
and he had to ring the church bell.
After a day or two, the sexton awoke him at midnight, and bade him arise and go up into the church tower and ring the bell.
'You shall soon learn what shuddering is,' thought he,.
and secretly went there before him; and when the boy was at the top of the tower and turned round, and was just going to take hold of the bell rope, he saw a white figure standing on the stairs opposite the sounding hole.
'Who is there?' cried he, but the figure made no reply, and did.
not move or stir.
off, you have no business here at night.
The sexton, however, remained standing motionless that the boy might think he was a ghost.
The boy cried a second time: 'What do you want here?
--speak if you are an honest fellow, or I will throw you down the?
' The sexton thought: 'He can't mean to be as bad as his words,'!
uttered no sound and stood as if he were made of stone.
Thereupon he rang the bell, went home, and without saying a word went to bed, and fell asleep.
The sexton's wife waited a long time for her husband, but he did not come back.
At length she became uneasy, and wakened the boy, and asked: 'Do you know where my husband is?
He climbed up the tower before you did.
' 'No, I don't know,' replied the boy, 'but someone was.
standing by the sounding hole on the other side of the steps, and as he would neither gave an answer nor go away, I took him for a scoundrel, and threw him downstairs.
Just go there and you will see if it was he.
I should be sorry if it were.
' The woman ran away and found her husband,.
who was lying moaning in the corner, and had broken his leg.
He has thrown my husband down the steps so that he broke his leg.
' The father was.
terrified, and ran thither and scolded the boy.
'What wicked tricks.
are these?' said he.
'The devil must have put them into your head.
'Father,' he replied, 'do listen to me.
I am quite innocent.
He was standing there by night like one intent on doing evil.
I did not know who it was, and I entreated him three times either to speak or to go away.
' 'Ah,' said the father, 'I have nothing but unhappiness with you.
Go out of my sight.
I will see you no more.
'Yes, father, right willingly, wait only until it is day.
Then will I go forth and learn how to shudder, and then I shall, at any rate, understand one art which will support me.
the father, 'it is all the same to me.
Here are fifty talers for you.
Take these and go into the wide world, and tell no one from whence you come, and who is your father, for I have reason to be ashamed of you.
'Yes, father, it shall be as you will.
If you desire nothing more than that, I can easily keep it in mind.
When the day dawned, therefore, the boy put his fifty talers into his pocket, and went forth on the great highway, and continually said to himself: 'If I could but shudder!
' Then a man!
approached who heard this conversation which the youth was holding with himself, and when they had walked a little farther to where they could see the gallows, the man said to him: 'Look, there is the tree where seven men have married the ropemaker's daughter, and are now learning how to fly.
' 'If that is all that is wanted,' answered.
Just come back to me early in the morning.
waited till evening came.
And as the wind knocked the hanged men against each other, and they moved backwards and forwards, he thought to himself: 'If you shiver below by the fire, how those up above must freeze and suffer!
' And as he felt pity for them, he raised the ladder, and climbed!
up, unbound one of them after the other, and brought down all seven.
Then he stoked the fire, blew it, and set them all round it to warm themselves.
But they sat there and did not stir, and the fire caught their clothes.
dead men, however, did not hear, but were quite silent, and let their rags go on burning.
At this he grew angry, and said: 'If you will not take care, I cannot help you, I will not be burnt with you,' and he hung them up again each in his turn.
Then he sat down by his fire and fell asleep, and the next morning the man came to him and wanted to have the fifty talers, and said: 'Well do you know how to shudder?
' 'No,'?
answered he, 'how should I know?
Those fellows up there did not open their mouths, and were so stupid that they let the few old rags which they had on their bodies get burnt.
get the fifty talers that day, and went away saying: 'Such a youth has never come my way before.
The youth likewise went his way, and once more began to mutter to himself: 'Ah, if I could but shudder!
waggoner who was striding behind him heard this and asked: 'Who are you?' 'I don't know,' answered the youth.
Then the waggoner asked: 'From whence do you come?' 'I know not.
not tell you.
' 'What is it that you are always muttering between your.
' 'Ah,' replied the youth, 'I do so wish I could shudder, but?
no one can teach me how.
' 'Enough of your foolish chatter,' said the.
'Come, go with me, I will see about a place for you.
youth went with the waggoner, and in the evening they arrived at an inn where they wished to pass the night.
Then at the entrance of the parlour the youth again said quite loudly: 'If I could but shudder!
' The host who heard this, laughed and said: 'If that is!
be silent,' said the hostess, 'so many prying persons have already lost their lives, it would be a pity and a shame if such beautiful eyes as these should never see the daylight again.
But the youth said: 'However difficult it may be, I will learn it.
For this purpose indeed have I journeyed forth.
' He let the host have.
no rest, until the latter told him, that not far from thence stood a haunted castle where anyone could very easily learn what shuddering was, if he would but watch in it for three nights.
The king had promised that he who would venture should have his daughter to wife, and she was the most beautiful maiden the sun shone on.
Likewise in the castle lay great treasures, which were guarded by evil spirits, and these treasures would then be freed, and would make a poor man rich enough.
turning lathe, and a cutting-board with the knife.
When night was drawing near, the youth went up and made himself a bright fire in one of the rooms, placed the cutting-board and knife beside it, and seated himself by the turning-lathe.
'Ah, if I could.
but shudder!' said he, 'but I shall not learn it here either.
' Towards.
midnight he was about to poke his fire, and as he was blowing it, something cried suddenly from one corner: 'Au, miau!
how cold we are!
'You fools!
' cried he, 'what are you crying about?!
If you are cold, come and take a seat by the fire and warm yourselves.
' And when he had said.
that, two great black cats came with one tremendous leap and sat down on each side of him, and looked savagely at him with their fiery eyes.
After a short time, when they had warmed themselves, they said: 'Comrade, shall we have a game of cards?
' 'Why not?
' he replied, 'but?
just show me your paws.
' Then they stretched out their claws.
'Oh,' said.
Wait, I must first cut them for you.
Thereupon he seized them by the throats, put them on the cutting-board and screwed their feet fast.
'I have looked at your fingers,' said he,.
'and my fancy for card-playing has gone,' and he struck them dead and threw them out into the water.
But when he had made away with these two, and was about to sit down again by his fire, out from every hole and corner came black cats and black dogs with red-hot chains, and more and more of them came until he could no longer move, and they yelled horribly, and got on his fire, pulled it to pieces, and tried to put it out.
He watched them for a while quietly, but at last when they were going too far, he seized his cutting-knife, and cried: 'Away with you, vermin,' and began to cut them down.
Some of them ran away, the others he killed, and threw out into the fish-pond.
When he came back he fanned the embers of his fire again and warmed himself.
And as he thus sat, his eyes would keep open no longer, and he felt a desire to sleep.
Then he looked round and saw a great bed in the corner.
'That is the very thing.
for me,' said he, and got into it.
When he was just going to shut his eyes, however, the bed began to move of its own accord, and went over the whole of the castle.
'That's right,' said he, 'but go faster.
the bed rolled on as if six horses were harnessed to it, up and down, over thresholds and stairs, but suddenly hop, hop, it turned over upside down, and lay on him like a mountain.
But he threw quilts and pillows up in the air, got out and said: 'Now anyone who likes, may drive,' and lay down by his fire, and slept till it was day.
Then said he: 'After all it is a pity,--for so handsome a man.
' The youth heard it, got up, and said: 'It.
has not come to that yet.
' Then the king was astonished, but very glad,.
and asked how he had fared.
'Very well indeed,' answered he; 'one.
' Then he went to the.
innkeeper, who opened his eyes very wide, and said: 'I never expected to see you alive again!
Have you learnt how to shudder yet?
' 'No,' said he,?
'it is all in vain.
The second night he again went up into the old castle, sat down by the fire, and once more began his old song: 'If I could but shudder!
' When!
midnight came, an uproar and noise of tumbling about was heard; at first it was low, but it grew louder and louder.
Then it was quiet for a while, and at length with a loud scream, half a man came down the chimney and fell before him.
'Hullo!' cried he, 'another half belongs.
to this.
This is not enough!
' Then the uproar began again, there was a!
roaring and howling, and the other half fell down likewise.
'Wait,' said.
he, 'I will just stoke up the fire a little for you.
' When he had done.
that and looked round again, the two pieces were joined together, and a hideous man was sitting in his place.
said the youth, 'the bench is mine.
' The man wanted to push him away;.
the youth, however, would not allow that, but thrust him off with all his strength, and seated himself again in his own place.
Then still more men fell down, one after the other; they brought nine dead men's legs and two skulls, and set them up and played at nine-pins with them.
The youth also wanted to play and said: 'Listen you, can I join you?
' 'Yes,?
' 'Money enough,' replied he, 'but your balls are.
not quite round.
turned them till they were round.
'There, now they will roll better!'.
Next morning the king came to inquire after him.
'How has it fared with you this time?' asked he.
'I have been playing at nine-pins,' he answered, 'and have lost a couple of farthings.
' 'Have you not shuddered then?' 'What?' said he, 'I have.
had a wonderful time!
If I did but know what it was to shudder!
The third night he sat down again on his bench and said quite sadly: 'If I could but shudder.
brought a coffin.
Then he said: 'Ha, ha, that is certainly my little cousin, who died only a few days ago,' and he beckoned with his finger, and cried: 'Come, little cousin, come.
' They placed the coffin on the.
He felt his face, but it was cold as ice.
'Wait,' said he, 'I.
will warm you a little,' and went to the fire and warmed his hand and laid it on the dead man's face, but he remained cold.
Then he took him out, and sat down by the fire and laid him on his breast and rubbed his arms that the blood might circulate again.
As this also did no good, he thought to himself: 'When two people lie in bed together, they warm each other,' and carried him to the bed, covered him over and lay down by him.
Then said the youth, 'See, little cousin, have I not warmed you?
dead man, however, got up and cried: 'Now will I strangle you.
' said he, 'is that the way you thank me?!
You shall at once go into your coffin again,' and he took him up, threw him into it, and shut the lid.
Then came the six men and carried him away again.
manage to shudder,' said he.
'I shall never learn it here as long as I.
He was old, however, and had a long white beard.
'you shall soon learn what it is to shudder, for you shall die.
' 'Not so.
fast,' replied the youth.
'If I am to die, I shall have to have a say.
in it.
' 'I will soon seize you,' said the fiend.
'Softly, softly, do not.
talk so big.
I am as strong as you are, and perhaps even stronger.
'We shall see,' said the old man.
'If you are stronger, I will let you.
' Then he led him by dark passages to a smith's.
The old man placed himself near and wanted to look on, and his white beard hung down.
Then the youth seized the axe, split the anvil with one blow, and in it caught the old man's beard.
'Now I have you,'.
said the youth.
'Now it is your turn to die.
' Then he seized an iron bar.
and beat the old man till he moaned and entreated him to stop, when he would give him great riches.
The youth drew out the axe and let him go.
The old man led him back into the castle, and in a cellar showed him three chests full of gold.
'Of these,' said he, 'one part is for the.
poor, the other for the king, the third yours.
' In the meantime it.
struck twelve, and the spirit disappeared, so that the youth stood in darkness.
'I shall still be able to find my way out,' said he, and felt.
about, found the way into the room, and slept there by his fire.
Next morning the king came and said: 'Now you must have learnt what shuddering is?
' 'No,' he answered; 'what can it be?
My dead cousin was here, and a bearded man came and showed me a great deal of money down below, but no one told me what it was to shudder.
' 'Then,' said the.
king, 'you have saved the castle, and shall marry my daughter.
is all very well,' said he, 'but still I do not know what it is to shudder!
Then the gold was brought up and the wedding celebrated; but howsoever much the young king loved his wife, and however happy he was, he still said always: 'If I could but shudder--if I could but shudder.
' And this.
Her waiting-maid said: 'I will find a cure for him; he shall soon learn what it is to shudder.
' She went out to the stream.
which flowed through the garden, and had a whole bucketful of gudgeons brought to her.
At night when the young king was sleeping, his wife was to draw the clothes off him and empty the bucket full of cold water with the gudgeons in it over him, so that the little fishes would sprawl about him.
Then he woke up and cried: 'Oh, what makes me shudder so?
--what makes me shudder so, dear wife?
Ah!
now I know what it is to!
shudder!
KING GRISLY-BEARD A great king of a land far away in the East had a daughter who was very beautiful, but so proud, and haughty, and conceited, that none of the princes who came to ask her in marriage was good enough for her, and she only made sport of them.
Once upon a time the king held a great feast, and asked thither all her suitors; and they all sat in a row, ranged according to their rank--kings, and princes, and dukes, and earls, and counts, and barons, and knights.
The first was too fat: 'He's as round as a tub,' said she.
The next was too tall: 'What a maypole!
said she.
The next was too short: 'What a dumpling!' said she.
The fourth was too pale, and she called him 'Wallface.
' The fifth was too.
' The sixth was not straight enough;.
so she said he was like a green stick, that had been laid to dry over a baker's oven.
And thus she had some joke to crack upon every one: but she laughed more than all at a good king who was there.
him,' said she; 'his beard is like an old mop; he shall be called Grisly-beard.
' So the king got the nickname of Grisly-beard.
But the old king was very angry when he saw how his daughter behaved, and how she ill-treated all his guests; and he vowed that, willing or unwilling, she should marry the first man, be he prince or beggar, that came to the door.
Two days after there came by a travelling fiddler, who began to play under the window and beg alms; and when the king heard him, he said, 'Let him come in.
' So they brought in a dirty-looking fellow; and when.
he had sung before the king and the princess, he begged a boon.
Then the king said, 'You have sung so well, that I will give you my daughter for your wife.
' The princess begged and prayed; but the king said, 'I have.
sworn to give you to the first comer, and I will keep my word.
and tears were of no avail; the parson was sent for, and she was married to the fiddler.
Then the fiddler went his way, and took her with him, and they soon came to a great wood.
'Pray,' said she, 'whose is this wood?' 'It belongs.
to King Grisly-beard,' answered he; 'hadst thou taken him, all had been thine.
' 'Ah! unlucky wretch that I am!' sighed she; 'would that I had.
married King Grisly-beard!' Next they came to some fine meadows.
'Whose.
are these beautiful green meadows?' said she.
'They belong to King.
Grisly-beard, hadst thou taken him, they had all been thine.
' 'Ah!.
' said she; 'would that I had married King!
Grisly-beard!
Then they came to a great city.
'Whose is this noble city?' said she.
'It belongs to King Grisly-beard; hadst thou taken him, it had all been thine.
' 'Ah! wretch that I am!' sighed she; 'why did I not marry King.
' 'That is no business of mine,' said the fiddler: 'why?
Am not I good enough for you?
At last they came to a small cottage.
' Then the fiddler said,?
'That is your and my house, where we are to live.
servants?' cried she.
must do for yourself whatever is to be done.
Now make the fire, and put on water and cook my supper, for I am very tired.
' But the princess knew.
nothing of making fires and cooking, and the fiddler was forced to help her.
When they had eaten a very scanty meal they went to bed; but the fiddler called her up very early in the morning to clean the house.
Thus they lived for two days: and when they had eaten up all there was in the cottage, the man said, 'Wife, we can't go on thus, spending money and earning nothing.
cut willows, and brought them home, and she began to weave; but it made her fingers very sore.
'I see this work won't do,' said he: 'try and.
spin; perhaps you will do that better.
' So she sat down and tried to.
'See.
now,' said the fiddler, 'you are good for nothing; you can do no work: what a bargain I have got!
' 'Alas!'.
sighed she, 'if any of my father's court should pass by and see me standing in the market, how they will laugh at me!
But her husband did not care for that, and said she must work, if she did not wish to die of hunger.
At first the trade went well; for many people, seeing such a beautiful woman, went to buy her wares, and paid their money without thinking of taking away the goods.
'Ah! what will become of me?' said she; 'what.
will my husband say?' So she ran home and told him all.
have thought you would have been so silly,' said he, 'as to put an earthenware stall in the corner of the market, where everybody passes?
but let us have no more crying; I see you are not fit for this sort of work, so I have been to the king's palace, and asked if they did not want a kitchen-maid; and they say they will take you, and there you will have plenty to eat.
She had not been there long before she heard that the king's eldest son was passing by, going to be married; and she went to one of the windows and looked out.
Everything was ready, and all the pomp and brightness of the court was there.
And the servants gave her some of the rich meats, which she put into her basket to take home.
All on a sudden, as she was going out, in came the king's son in golden clothes; and when he saw a beautiful woman at the door, he took her by the hand, and said she should be his partner in the dance; but she trembled for fear, for she saw that it was King Grisly-beard, who was making sport of her.
However, he kept fast hold, and led her in; and the cover of the basket came off, so that the meats in it fell about.
She sprang to the door to run away; but on the steps King Grisly-beard overtook her, and brought her back and said, 'Fear me not!
I am the fiddler who has lived with you in the hut.
I am also the soldier that overset your stall.
I have done all this only to cure you of your silly pride, and to show you the folly of your ill-treatment of me.
Now all is over: you have learnt wisdom, and it is time to hold our marriage feast.
Then the chamberlains came and brought her the most beautiful robes; and her father and his whole court were there already, and welcomed her home on her marriage.
Joy was in every face and every heart.
The feast was grand; they danced and sang; all were merry; and I only wish that you and I had been of the party.
One day he sent out a huntsman to shoot him a roe, but he did not come back.
'Perhaps some.
Then on the third day, he sent for all his huntsmen, and said: 'Scour the whole forest through, and do not give up until you have found all three.
' But of these also, none came home again, none were seen again.
The king, however, would not give his consent, and said: 'It is not safe in there; I fear it would fare with you no better than with the others, and you would never come out again.
' The huntsman replied: 'Lord, I will.
When the huntsman saw that, he went back and fetched three men to come with buckets and bale out the water.
When they could see to the bottom there lay a wild man whose body was brown like rusty iron, and whose hair hung over his face down to his knees.
They bound him with cords, and led him away to the castle.
There was great astonishment over the wild man; the king, however, had him put in an iron cage in his courtyard, and forbade the door to be opened on pain of death, and the queen herself was to take the key into her keeping.
And from this time forth everyone could again go into the forest with safety.
The boy ran thither and said: 'Give me my ball out.
' 'Not till you have.
opened the door for me,' answered the man.
'No,' said the boy, 'I will.
not do that; the king has forbidden it,' and ran away.
The next day he again went and asked for his ball; the wild man said: 'Open my door,' but the boy would not.
On the third day the king had ridden out hunting, and the boy went once more and said: 'I cannot open the door even if I wished, for I have not the key.
your mother's pillow, you can get it there.
' The boy, who wanted to have.
The door opened with difficulty, and the boy pinched his fingers.
' The wild man turned!
back, took him up, set him on his shoulder, and went with hasty steps into the forest.
She knew nothing about it, and sought the key, but it was gone.
The king sent out people to seek for him in the fields, but they did not find him.
Then he could easily guess what had happened, and much grief reigned in the royal court.
When the wild man had once more reached the dark forest, he took the boy down from his shoulder, and said to him: 'You will never see your father and mother again, but I will keep you with me, for you have set me free, and I have compassion on you.
If you do all I bid you, you shall fare well.
' He made a bed of moss for the boy on which he slept, and the.
next morning the man took him to a well, and said: 'Behold, the gold well is as bright and clear as crystal, you shall sit beside it, and take care that nothing falls into it, or it will be polluted.
I will come every evening to see if you have obeyed my order.
' The boy placed.
As he was thus sitting, his finger hurt him so violently that he involuntarily put it in the water.
He drew it quickly out again, but saw that it was quite gilded, and whatsoever pains he took to wash the gold off again, all was to no purpose.
In the evening Iron Hans came back, looked at the boy, and said: 'What has happened to the well?
nothing,' he answered, and held his finger behind his back, that the man might not see it.
watching it.
His finger hurt him again and he passed it over his head, and then unhappily a hair fell down into the well.
He took it quickly out, but it was already quite gilded.
Iron Hans came, and already knew what had happened.
On the third day, the boy sat by the well, and did not stir his finger, however much it hurt him.
But the time was long to him, and he looked at the reflection of his face on the surface of the water.
And as he still bent down more and more while he was doing so, and trying to look straight into the eyes, his long hair fell down from his shoulders into the water.
He raised himself up quickly, but the whole of the hair of his head was already golden and shone like the sun.
You can imagine how terrified the poor boy was!
He took his pocket-handkerchief and tied it round his head, in order that the man might not see it.
When he came he already knew everything, and said: 'Take the handkerchief off.
' Then the.
'You have not stood the trial and can stay here no.
longer.
Go forth into the world, there you will learn what poverty is.
But as you have not a bad heart, and as I mean well by you, there is one thing I will grant you; if you fall into any difficulty, come to the forest and cry: "Iron Hans," and then I will come and help you.
My power is great, greater than you think, and I have gold and silver in abundance.
Then the king's son left the forest, and walked by beaten and unbeaten paths ever onwards until at length he reached a great city.
There he looked for work, but could find none, and he learnt nothing by which he could help himself.
At length he went to the palace, and asked if they would take him in.
At length the cook took him into his service, and said he might carry wood and water, and rake the cinders together.
Once when it so happened that no one else was at hand, the cook ordered him to carry the food to the royal table, but as he did not like to let his golden hair be seen, he kept his little cap on.
Such a thing as that had never yet come under the king's notice, and he said: 'When you come to the royal table you must take your hat off.
' He answered: 'Ah, Lord, I cannot; I have a bad.
sore place on my head.
' Then the king had the cook called before him.
and scolded him, and asked how he could take such a boy as that into his service; and that he was to send him away at once.
The cook, however, had pity on him, and exchanged him for the gardener's boy.
And now the boy had to plant and water the garden, hoe and dig, and bear the wind and bad weather.
Once in summer when he was working alone in the garden, the day was so warm he took his little cap off that the air might cool him.
As the sun shone on his hair it glittered and flashed so that the rays fell into the bedroom of the king's daughter, and up she sprang to see what that could be.
Then she saw the boy, and cried to him: 'Boy, bring me a wreath of flowers.
' He put his cap on with all.
haste, and gathered wild field-flowers and bound them together.
Go quickly, and get another, and seek out the prettiest and rarest.
no,' replied the boy, 'the wild ones have more scent, and will please her better.
' When he got into the room, the king's daughter said: 'Take.
your cap off, it is not seemly to keep it on in my presence.
' He again.
said: 'I may not, I have a sore head.
' She, however, caught at his.
cap and pulled it off, and then his golden hair rolled down on his shoulders, and it was splendid to behold.
With these he departed, but he cared nothing for the gold pieces.
' The following day the king's daughter again called to him that he.
was to bring her a wreath of field-flowers, and then he went in with it, she instantly snatched at his cap, and wanted to take it away from him, but he held it fast with both hands.
She again gave him a handful of ducats, but he would not keep them, and gave them to the gardener for playthings for his children.
On the third day things went just the same; she could not get his cap away from him, and he would not have her money.
Not long afterwards, the country was overrun by war.
Then said the gardener's boy: 'I am grown up, and will go to the wars also, only give me a horse.
' The others laughed, and said: 'Seek.
' When they had gone forth, he went into the stable, and.
When he came to the outskirts, he called 'Iron Hans' three times so loudly that it echoed through the trees.
Thereupon the wild man appeared immediately, and said: 'What do you desire?
' 'I want a strong?
steed, for I am going to the wars.
' 'That you shall have, and still more.
than you ask for.
' Then the wild man went back into the forest, and it.
was not long before a stable-boy came out of it, who led a horse that snorted with its nostrils, and could hardly be restrained, and behind them followed a great troop of warriors entirely equipped in iron, and their swords flashed in the sun.
The youth made over his three-legged horse to the stable-boy, mounted the other, and rode at the head of the soldiers.
When he got near the battlefield a great part of the king's men had already fallen, and little was wanting to make the rest give way.
Then the youth galloped thither with his iron soldiers, broke like a hurricane over the enemy, and beat down all who opposed him.
They began to flee, but the youth pursued, and never stopped, until there was not a single man left.
'What do you desire?' asked the wild man.
and your troops, and give me my three-legged horse again.
' All that he.
asked was done, and soon he was riding on his three-legged horse.
When the king returned to his palace, his daughter went to meet him, and wished him joy of his victory.
'I am not the one who carried away the.
victory,' said he, 'but a strange knight who came to my assistance with his soldiers.
' The daughter wanted to hear who the strange knight was,.
been lying sleeping all the time?
" So he said: "I did the best of all,?
" And then he was still more.
ridiculed.
The king said to his daughter: 'I will proclaim a great feast that shall last for three days, and you shall throw a golden apple.
Perhaps the unknown man will show himself.
' When the feast was announced, the youth.
went out to the forest, and called Iron Hans.
'What do you desire?'.
'That I may catch the king's daughter's golden apple.
' 'It is.
as safe as if you had it already,' said Iron Hans.
'You shall likewise.
have a suit of red armour for the occasion, and ride on a spirited chestnut-horse.
' When the day came, the youth galloped to the spot, took.
his place amongst the knights, and was recognized by no one.
The king's daughter came forward, and threw a golden apple to the knights, but none of them caught it but he, only as soon as he had it he galloped away.
On the second day Iron Hans equipped him as a white knight, and gave him a white horse.
The king grew angry, and said: 'That is not allowed; he must appear before me and tell his name.
' He gave the order that if the knight who caught the apple,.
should go away again they should pursue him, and if he would not come back willingly, they were to cut him down and stab him.
On the third day, he received from Iron Hans a suit of black armour and a black horse, and again he caught the apple.
The youth nevertheless escaped from them, but his horse leapt so violently that the helmet fell from the youth's head, and they could see that he had golden hair.
They rode back and announced this to the king.
The following day the king's daughter asked the gardener about his boy.
festival too, and only came home yesterday evening; he has likewise shown my children three golden apples which he has won.
The king had him summoned into his presence, and he came and again had his little cap on his head.
But the king's daughter went up to him and took it off, and then his golden hair fell down over his shoulders, and he was so handsome that all were amazed.
'Are you the knight who came.
every day to the festival, always in different colours, and who caught the three golden apples?' asked the king.
'Yes,' answered he, 'and here.
the apples are,' and he took them out of his pocket, and returned them to the king.
But I am likewise the knight who helped you to your victory over your enemies.
' 'If you can perform.
such deeds as that, you are no gardener's boy; tell me, who is your father?
' 'My father is a mighty king, and gold have I in plenty as great?
as I require.
' 'I well see,' said the king, 'that I owe my thanks to.
you; can I do anything to please you?
you can.
Give me your daughter to wife.
'He does not stand much on ceremony, but I have already seen by his golden hair that he was no gardener's boy,' and then she went and kissed him.
His father and mother came to the wedding, and were in great delight, for they had given up all hope of ever seeing their dear son again.
And as they were sitting at the marriage-feast, the music suddenly stopped, the doors opened, and a stately king came in with a great retinue.
He went up to the youth, embraced him and said: 'I am Iron Hans, and was by enchantment a wild man, but you have set me free; all the treasures which I possess, shall be your property.
But this beautiful queen fell ill, and when she felt that her end drew near she called the king to her and said, 'Promise me that you will never marry again, unless you meet with a wife who is as beautiful as I am, and who has golden hair like mine.
' Then when the king in his.
grief promised all she asked, she shut her eyes and died.
At last, however, his wise men said, 'this will not do; the king must marry again, that we may have a queen.
sent far and wide, to seek for a bride as beautiful as the late queen.
But there was no princess in the world so beautiful; and if there had been, still there was not one to be found who had golden hair.
So the messengers came home, and had had all their trouble for nothing.
Now the king had a daughter, who was just as beautiful as her mother, and had the same golden hair.
And when she was grown up, the king looked at her and saw that she was just like this late queen: then he said to his courtiers, 'May I not marry my daughter?
She is the very image of my dead wife: unless I have her, I shall not find any bride upon the whole earth, and you say there must be a queen.
' When the courtiers heard this.
they were shocked, and said, 'Heaven forbid that a father should marry his daughter!
Out of so great a sin no good can come.
was also shocked, but hoped the king would soon give up such thoughts; so she said to him, 'Before I marry anyone I must have three dresses: one must be of gold, like the sun; another must be of shining silver, like the moon; and a third must be dazzling as the stars: besides this, I want a mantle of a thousand different kinds of fur put together, to which every beast in the kingdom must give a part of his skin.
' And thus.
she thought he would think of the matter no more.
But the king made the most skilful workmen in his kingdom weave the three dresses: one golden, like the sun; another silvery, like the moon; and a third sparkling, like the stars: and his hunters were told to hunt out all the beasts in his kingdom, and to take the finest fur out of their skins: and thus a mantle of a thousand furs was made.
When all were ready, the king sent them to her; but she got up in the night when all were asleep, and took three of her trinkets, a golden ring, a golden necklace, and a golden brooch, and packed the three dresses--of the sun, the moon, and the stars--up in a nutshell, and wrapped herself up in the mantle made of all sorts of fur, and besmeared her face and hands with soot.
Then she threw herself upon Heaven for help in her need, and went away, and journeyed on the whole night, till at last she came to a large wood.
As she was very tired, she sat herself down in the hollow of a tree and soon fell asleep: and there she slept on till it was midday.
Now as the king to whom the wood belonged was hunting in it, his dogs came to the tree, and began to snuff about, and run round and round, and bark.
'Look sharp!' said the king to the huntsmen, 'and see what sort.
of game lies there.
' And the huntsmen went up to the tree, and when they.
came back again said, 'In the hollow tree there lies a most wonderful beast, such as we never saw before; its skin seems to be of a thousand kinds of fur, but there it lies fast asleep.
do for the kitchen; you can sweep up the ashes, and do things of that sort.
' So they put her into the coach, and took her home to the king's.
palace.
Then they showed her a little corner under the staircase, where no light of day ever peeped in, and said, 'Cat-skin, you may lie and sleep there.
' And she was sent into the kitchen, and made to fetch wood.
and water, to blow the fire, pluck the poultry, pick the herbs, sift the ashes, and do all the dirty work.
Thus Cat-skin lived for a long time very sorrowfully.
'Ah! pretty.
princess!
' thought she, 'what will now become of thee?' But it happened!
one day that a feast was to be held in the king's castle, so she said to the cook, 'May I go up a little while and see what is going on?
' And the cook said, 'Yes, you may.
Then she took her little lamp, and went into her cabin, and took off the fur skin, and washed the soot from off her face and hands, so that her beauty shone forth like the sun from behind the clouds.
She next opened her nutshell, and brought out of it the dress that shone like the sun, and so went to the feast.
When the dance was at an end she curtsied; and when the king looked round for her, she was gone, no one knew wither.
The truth was, that she had run into her little cabin, pulled off her dress, blackened her face and hands, put on the fur-skin cloak, and was Cat-skin again.
When she went into the kitchen to her work, and began to rake the ashes, the cook said, 'Let that alone till the morning, and heat the king's soup; I should like to run up now and give a peep: but take care you don't let a hair fall into it, or you will run a chance of never eating again.
As soon as the cook went away, Cat-skin heated the king's soup, and toasted a slice of bread first, as nicely as ever she could; and when it was ready, she went and looked in the cabin for her little golden ring, and put it into the dish in which the soup was.
When the dance was over, the king ordered his soup to be brought in; and it pleased him so well, that he thought he had never tasted any so good before.
At the bottom he saw a gold ring lying; and as he could not make out how it had got there, he ordered the cook to be sent for.
The cook was frightened when he heard the order, and said to Cat-skin, 'You must have let a hair fall into the soup; if it be so, you will have a good beating.
' Then he went.
before the king, and he asked him who had cooked the soup.
'I did,'.
But the king said, 'That is not true; it was better done than you could do it.
' Then he answered, 'To tell the truth I did.
not cook it, but Cat-skin did.
' 'Then let Cat-skin come up,' said the.
king: and when she came he said to her, 'Who are you?
in my palace?' asked he.
scullion-girl, and to have boots and shoes thrown at my head.
' 'But how.
did you get the ring that was in the soup?' asked the king.
Then she would not own that she knew anything about the ring; so the king sent her away again about her business.
After a time there was another feast, and Cat-skin asked the cook to let her go up and see it as before.
an hour, and cook the king the soup that he likes so much.
After the dance was at an end she managed to slip out, so slyly that the king did not see where she was gone; but she sprang into her little cabin, and made herself into Cat-skin again, and went into the kitchen to cook the soup.
Whilst the cook was above stairs, she got the golden necklace and dropped it into the soup; then it was brought to the king, who ate it, and it pleased him as well as before; so he sent for the cook, who was again forced to tell him that Cat-skin had cooked it.
Cat-skin was brought again before the king, but she still told him that she was only fit to have boots and shoes thrown at her head.
But when the king had ordered a feast to be got ready for the third time, it happened just the same as before.
'You must be a witch,.
Cat-skin,' said the cook; 'for you always put something into your soup, so that it pleases the king better than mine.
' However, he let her go up.
as before.
Then she put on her dress which sparkled like the stars, and went into the ball-room in it; and the king danced with her again, and thought she had never looked so beautiful as she did then.
So whilst he was dancing with her, he put a gold ring on her finger without her seeing it, and ordered that the dance should be kept up a long time.
When it was at an end, he would have held her fast by the hand, but she slipped away, and sprang so quickly through the crowd that he lost sight of her: and she ran as fast as she could into her little cabin under the stairs.
But this time she kept away too long, and stayed beyond the half-hour; so she had not time to take off her fine dress, and threw her fur mantle over it, and in her haste did not blacken herself all over with soot, but left one of her fingers white.
Then she ran into the kitchen, and cooked the king's soup; and as soon as the cook was gone, she put the golden brooch into the dish.
When the king got to the bottom, he ordered Cat-skin to be called once more, and soon saw the white finger, and the ring that he had put on it whilst they were dancing: so he seized her hand, and kept fast hold of it, and when she wanted to loose herself and spring away, the fur cloak fell off a little on one side, and the starry dress sparkled underneath it.
Then he got hold of the fur and tore it off, and her golden hair and beautiful form were seen, and she could no longer hide herself: so she washed the soot and ashes from her face, and showed herself to be the most beautiful princess upon the face of the earth.
But the king said, 'You are my beloved bride, and we will never more be parted from each other.
' And the wedding feast was held, and a merry day it was, as ever.
was heard of or seen in that country, or indeed in any other.
In front of the cottage was a garden wherein stood two rose-trees, one of which bore white and the other red roses.
She had two children who were like the two rose-trees, and one was called Snow-white, and the other Rose-red.
They were as good and happy, as busy and cheerful as ever two children in the world were, only Snow-white was more quiet and gentle than Rose-red.
Rose-red liked better to run about in the meadows and fields seeking flowers and catching butterflies; but Snow-white sat at home with her mother, and helped her with her housework, or read to her when there was nothing to do.
The two children were so fond of one another that they always held each other by the hand when they went out together, and when Snow-white said: 'We will not leave each other,' Rose-red answered: 'Never so long as we live,' and their mother would add: 'What one has she must share with the other.
They often ran about the forest alone and gathered red berries, and no beasts did them any harm, but came close to them trustfully.
The little hare would eat a cabbage-leaf out of their hands, the roe grazed by their side, the stag leapt merrily by them, and the birds sat still upon the boughs, and sang whatever they knew.
No mishap overtook them; if they had stayed too late in the forest, and night came on, they laid themselves down near one another upon the moss, and slept until morning came, and their mother knew this and did not worry on their account.
Once when they had spent the night in the wood and the dawn had roused them, they saw a beautiful child in a shining white dress sitting near their bed.
He got up and looked quite kindly at them, but said nothing and went into the forest.
And when they looked round they found that they had been sleeping quite close to a precipice, and would certainly have fallen into it in the darkness if they had gone only a few paces further.
Snow-white and Rose-red kept their mother's little cottage so neat that it was a pleasure to look inside it.
In the summer Rose-red took care of the house, and every morning laid a wreath of flowers by her mother's bed before she awoke, in which was a rose from each tree.
The kettle was of brass and shone like gold, so brightly was it polished.
And close by them lay a lamb upon the floor, and behind them upon a perch sat a white dove with its head hidden beneath its wings.
One evening, as they were thus sitting comfortably together, someone knocked at the door as if he wished to be let in.
The mother said: 'Quick, Rose-red, open the door, it must be a traveller who is seeking shelter.
' Rose-red went and pushed back the bolt, thinking that it was a.
poor man, but it was not; it was a bear that stretched his broad, black head within the door.
Rose-red screamed and sprang back, the lamb bleated, the dove fluttered, and Snow-white hid herself behind her mother's bed.
But the bear began to speak and said: 'Do not be afraid, I will do you no harm!
I am half-frozen, and only want to warm myself a little beside you.
'Poor bear,' said the mother, 'lie down by the fire, only take care that you do not burn your coat.
out, the bear will do you no harm, he means well.
It was not long before they grew quite at home, and played tricks with their clumsy guest.
They tugged his hair with their hands, put their feet upon his back and rolled him about, or they took a hazel-switch and beat him, and when he growled they laughed.
' As soon as day dawned the two children.
let him out, and he trotted across the snow into the forest.
Henceforth the bear came every evening at the same time, laid himself down by the hearth, and let the children amuse themselves with him as much as they liked; and they got so used to him that the doors were never fastened until their black friend had arrived.
When spring had come and all outside was green, the bear said one morning to Snow-white: 'Now I must go away, and cannot come back for the whole summer.
'I must go into the forest and guard my treasures from the wicked dwarfs.
In the winter, when the earth is frozen hard, they are obliged to stay below and cannot work their way through; but now, when the sun has thawed and warmed the earth, they break through it, and come out to pry and steal; and what once gets into their hands, and in their caves, does not easily see daylight again.
Snow-white was quite sorry at his departure, and as she unbolted the door for him, and the bear was hurrying out, he caught against the bolt and a piece of his hairy coat was torn off, and it seemed to Snow-white as if she had seen gold shining through it, but she was not sure about it.
The bear ran away quickly, and was soon out of sight behind the trees.
A short time afterwards the mother sent her children into the forest to get firewood.
There they found a big tree which lay felled on the ground, and close by the trunk something was jumping backwards and forwards in the grass, but they could not make out what it was.
When they came nearer they saw a dwarf with an old withered face and a snow-white beard a yard long.
The end of the beard was caught in a crevice of the tree, and the little fellow was jumping about like a dog tied to a rope, and did not know what to do.
He glared at the girls with his fiery red eyes and cried: 'Why do you stand there?
Can you not come here and help me?
' 'What are you up to,?
little man?' asked Rose-red.
'You stupid, prying goose!' answered the.
dwarf: 'I was going to split the tree to get a little wood for cooking.
The little bit of food that we people get is immediately burnt up with heavy logs; we do not swallow so much as you coarse, greedy folk.
I had just driven the wedge safely in, and everything was going as I wished; but the cursed wedge was too smooth and suddenly sprang out, and the tree closed so quickly that I could not pull out my beautiful white beard; so now it is tight and I cannot get away, and the silly, sleek, milk-faced things laugh!
how odious you are!
The children tried very hard, but they could not pull the beard out, it was caught too fast.
'I will run and fetch someone,' said Rose-red.
'You.
senseless goose!
You are already two too many for me; can you not think of something better?
'Don't be impatient,' said Snow-white, 'I will help you,' and she pulled her scissors out of her pocket, and cut off the end of the beard.
As soon as the dwarf felt himself free he laid hold of a bag which lay amongst the roots of the tree, and which was full of gold, and lifted it up, grumbling to himself: 'Uncouth people, to cut off a piece of my fine beard.
Bad luck to you!
' and then he swung the bag upon his back, and!
They ran to it and found it was the dwarf.
'Where are you going?' said.
Rose-red; 'you surely don't want to go into the water?
' 'I am not such?
a fool!
to pull me in?
' The little man had been sitting there fishing, and?
unluckily the wind had tangled up his beard with the fishing-line; a moment later a big fish made a bite and the feeble creature had not strength to pull it out; the fish kept the upper hand and pulled the dwarf towards him.
He held on to all the reeds and rushes, but it was of little good, for he was forced to follow the movements of the fish, and was in urgent danger of being dragged into the water.
The girls came just in time; they held him fast and tried to free his beard from the line, but all in vain, beard and line were entangled fast together.
There was nothing to do but to bring out the scissors and cut the beard, whereby a small part of it was lost.
When the dwarf saw that he screamed out: 'Is that civil, you toadstool, to disfigure a man's face?
Now you have cut off the best part of it.
I cannot let myself be seen by my people.
I wish you had been made to run the soles off your shoes!
' Then he took!
The road led them across a heath upon which huge pieces of rock lay strewn about.
Immediately they heard a loud, piteous cry.
They ran up and saw with horror that the eagle had seized their old acquaintance the dwarf, and was going to carry him off.
As soon as the dwarf had recovered from his first fright he cried with his shrill voice: 'Could you not have done it more carefully!
You dragged at my brown coat so that it is all torn and full of holes, you clumsy creatures!
' Then he took up a sack full of precious stones, and!
slipped away again under the rock into his hole.
The girls, who by this time were used to his ingratitude, went on their way and did their business in town.
As they crossed the heath again on their way home they surprised the dwarf, who had emptied out his bag of precious stones in a clean spot, and had not thought that anyone would come there so late.
The evening sun shone upon the brilliant stones; they glittered and sparkled with all colours so beautifully that the children stood still and stared at them.
'Why do you stand gaping there?' cried the dwarf, and his.
ashen-grey face became copper-red with rage.
He was still cursing when a loud growling was heard, and a black bear came trotting towards them out of the forest.
The dwarf sprang up in a fright, but he could not reach his cave, for the bear was already close.
Then in the dread of his heart he cried: 'Dear Mr Bear, spare me, I will give you all my treasures; look, the beautiful jewels lying there!
Grant me my life; what do you want with such a slender little fellow as I?
you would not feel me?
Come, take these two wicked girls, they are tender morsels for you, fat as young quails; for mercy's sake eat them!
' The!
bear took no heed of his words, but gave the wicked creature a single blow with his paw, and he did not move again.
recognized his voice and waited, and when he came up to them suddenly his bearskin fell off, and he stood there a handsome man, clothed all in gold.
dwarf, who had stolen my treasures; I have had to run about the forest as a savage bear until I was freed by his death.
Now he has got his well-deserved punishment.
Snow-white was married to him, and Rose-red to his brother, and they divided between them the great treasure which the dwarf had gathered together in his cave.
The old mother lived peacefully and happily with her children for many years.
She took the two rose-trees with her, and they stood before her window, and every year bore the most beautiful roses, white and red.
***** The Brothers Grimm, Jacob (1785-1863) and Wilhelm (1786-1859), were born in Hanau, near Frankfurt, in the German state of Hesse.
Throughout their lives they remained close friends, and both studied law at Marburg University.
Jacob was a pioneer in the study of German philology, and although Wilhelm's work was hampered by poor health the brothers collaborated in the creation of a German dictionary, not completed until a century after their deaths.
But they were best (and universally) known for the collection of over two hundred folk tales they made from oral sources and published in two volumes of 'Nursery and Household Tales' in 1812 and 1814.
This was in part due to Edgar Taylor, who made the first English translation in 1823, selecting about fifty stories 'with the amusement of some young friends principally in view.
' They have been an essential ingredient of children's reading ever.
since.
End of Project Gutenberg's Grimms' Fairy Tales, by The Brothers Grimm *** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK GRIMMS' FAIRY TALES *** ***** This file should be named 2591.
zip *****.
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in: http://www.gutenberg.org/2/5/9/2591/.
Produced by Emma Dudding, John Bickers, and Dagny Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions will be renamed.
Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation (and you!
) can copy and distribute it in the United States without!
permission and without paying copyright royalties.
Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.
If you do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the rules is very easy.
You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and research.
They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.
Redistribution is subject to the trademark license, especially commercial redistribution.
*** START: FULL LICENSE *** THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work (or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at http://gutenberg.org/license).
Section 1.
General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works 1.
A.
By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm.
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property (trademark/copyright) agreement.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.
8.
B.
There are a few things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.
C below.
There are a lot of things you can do with Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works.
E below.
C.
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works.
If an individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg are removed.
Of course, we hope that you will support the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with the work.
You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.
D.
The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern.
what you can do with this work.
Copyright laws in most countries are in a constant state of change.
If you are outside the United States, check the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project Gutenberg-tm work.
The Foundation makes no representations concerning the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United States.
Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:.
The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed, copied or distributed: This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with almost no restrictions whatsoever.
You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org.
2.
If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees or charges.
If you are redistributing or providing access to a work with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.
through 1.
7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the.
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.
8 or.
If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution must comply with both paragraphs 1.
1 through 1.
7 and any additional.
terms imposed by the copyright holder.
5.
Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.
1 with.
6.
You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary, compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any word processing or hypertext form.
However, if you provide access to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org).
8 or 1.
8.
The fee is owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.
Royalty payments must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax returns.
Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.
- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm License.
You must require such a user to return or destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg-tm works.
- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.
3, a full refund of any.
If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.
Contact the Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.
Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm collection.
Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain "Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by your equipment.
2.
3, the Project.
YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.
YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.
If you received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with your written explanation.
The person or entity that provided you with the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a refund.
If you received the work electronically, the person or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.
If the second copy is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further opportunities to fix the problem.
Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth in paragraph 1.
3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER.
5.
Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by the applicable state law.
The invalidity or unenforceability of any provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.
6.
INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production, promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works, harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.
Section 2.
It exists because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from people in all walks of life.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4 and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.
Section 3.
The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification number is 64-6221541.
federal laws and your state's laws.
The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr.
, but its volunteers and employees are scattered.
throughout numerous locations.
Its business office is located at 809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email business@pglaf.
org.
Email contact links and up to date contact information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official page at http://pglaf.org.
For additional contact information: Dr.
Gregory B.
Newby.
Chief Executive and Director gbnewby@pglaf.
org.
Section 4.
Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest array of equipment including outdated equipment.
The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United States.
Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up with these requirements.
We do not solicit donations in locations where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.
While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who approach us with offers to donate.
International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from outside the United States.
U.
laws alone swamp our small staff.
Donations are accepted in a number of other ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate.
General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works.
Professor Michael S.
Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm.
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared with anyone.
For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.
Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.
